Works of Karl Marx 1850

 

The Class Struggles in France,

1848 to 1850

 

Written: by Marx, January - October 1850 for the Neue Rheinische Zeitung
Revue;

Published: as a booklet by Engels in 1895;

Source: Selected Works, Volume 1, Progress Publishers, Moscow 1969;

Proofed: and corrected by Matthew Carmody, 2009, Mark Harris 2010;

Transcribed: by Louis Proyect.

 

“Great importance must be attached to one of the historical documents of
the German labour movement: the Preface written by Fredrick Engels for
the 1895 re-issue of Marx’s Class Struggles in France … looking back
upon the year 1848, he showed that the belief that the socialist
revolution was imminent had become obsolete … Engels demonstrated, as an
expert in military science, that it was a pure illusion to believe that
the workers could, in the existing state of military technique and of
industry, and in view of the characteristics of the great towns of
today, successfully bring about a revolution by street fighting.” Rosa
Luxemburg, 1918.

Introduction to the 1895 Edition, Engels

 

With the exception of only a few chapters, every important part of the
revolutionary annals from 1848 to 1849 bear the heading: Defeat of the
revolution!

What succumbed in these defeats was not the revolution. It was the
pre-revolutionary traditional appendages, results of social
relationships which had not yet come to the point of sharp class
antagonisms — persons, illusions, conceptions, projects from which the
revolutionary party before the February Revolution was not free, from
which it could be freed not by the victory of February, but only by a
series of defeats.

In a word: The revolution made progress, forged ahead, not by its
immediate tragicomic achievements but, on the contrary, by the creation
of a powerful, united counterrevolution, by the creation of an opponent
in combat with whom the party of overthrow ripened into a really
revolutionary party.

To prove this is the task of the following pages.

Contents

Part I: The Defeat of June, 1848

Part II: From June 1848 to June 13, 1849

Part III: Consequences of June 13, 1849

Part IV: The Abolition of Universal Suffrage in 1850

 

Marx’s The Class Struggles in France, 1848 to 1850 consists of a series
of articles written between January and October 1850 specially for the
Neue Rheinische Zeitung. Politisch-ökonomische Revue and published in it
under the general title “1848-1849.” This is a most important work
summing up the results of the 1848-49 revolution. In preparation for
this work, Marx used French newspaper reports, reports published in the
Neue Rheinische Zeitung, and accounts given by witnesses – French and
German revolutionary refugees, among them Ferdinand Wolff, the Neue
Rheinische Zeitung Paris correspondent, and another Communist League
member, Sebastian Seiler, who was a stenographer to the French National
Assembly in 1848 and 1849 and wrote a pamphlet on the events of June 13,
1849, which he presented to Marx. Marx was also probably familiar with
Ledru-Rollin’s pamphlet on the same subject.

According to the original plan the work was to consist of four articles:
“The Defeat of June 1848,” “June 13, 1849,” “Repercussions of June 13 on
the Continent” and “Current Situation; England.” However, in Nos. 1, 2
and 3 of the journal only three articles were published: “The Defeat of
June 1848,” “June 13, 1849” and “Consequences of June 13, 1849.” The
influence of the June 1849 events on the Continent and the situation in
England were treated in other items of the journal. particularly in the
international reviews written jointly by Marx and Engels.

The work was not reprinted in full during Marx’s lifetime. In 1895 it
came out in book form in Berlin, with an Introduction by Engels. The
title The Class Struggles in France, 1848 to 1850 was given by Engels
and the work has since appeared under this title in various languages.
In the 1895 edition, Engels added the fourth chapter, which included the
sections of the third international review dealing with events in
France. Engels entitled this chapter “The Abolition of Universal
Suffrage in 1850.” Engels wrote to Richard Fischer on February 13, 1895,
that the fourth chapter “will serve as a factual conclusion to the work
as a whole, without which it would have remained a fragment.” At the
same time, the headings of the first three chapters were changed: I.
“From February to June 1848,” II. “From June 1848 to June 13, 1849,”
III. “From June 13, 1849, to March 10, 1850.” In the present edition,
the headings of the first three chapters are given according to the
journal, while the heading of the fourth chapter is given as in the 1895
edition.

The publication of the series of Marx’s articles drew the attention of
the press. A short announcement of No. 1 of the Neue Rheinische Zeitung.
Politisch-ökonomische Revue and quotations from Marx’s work were
published in the Freischütz. Hamburg, No. 40, April 2, 1850; a review in
the Wochenblatt der Hornisse, Cassel, No. 3, April 15, 1850~ The preface
and the first article were reprinted in the Deutsche Londoner Zeitung
Nos. 262, 263 and 264, April 5, 12 arid 19, 1850. On January 1, 1852,
the Turn-Zeitung, published by German socialist emigrants in the USA,
carried an article by Joseph Weydemeyer “On the Dictatorship of the
Proletariat,” written under the direct influence of Marx’s work, the
first work by Marx and Engels in which the term “the dictatorship of the
proletariat” was used. On the other hand, the idea of the dictatorship
of the proletariat brought criticism of the author from the
petty-bourgeois democrats. The Neue Deutsche Zeitung, whose editor was a
former “true socialist,” Otto Luning, published a review (Nos. 148-51,
June 22-23, 25 and 26. 1850) of the four numbers of the Neue Rheinische
Zeitung. Politisch-ökonomische Revue with unfavourable comments on this
proposition and an incorrect interpretation of it. Marx was obliged to
write Lüning a special letter rebuffing attempts to distort and dispute
the idea of the dictatorship of the proletariat.

Marx and Engels attached great importance to the popularisation of the
ideas contained in The Class Struggles in France among the English
workers. Engels used this work in his Letters from France published in
The Democratic Review and, on the basis of the first article in the
series, wrote Two Years of a Revolution, which was published in the same
journal. Excerpts from Marx’s work were cited by his contemporaries
(Hermann Becker, Proudhon).

Excerpts from The Class Struggles in France were first published in
English in the journal The Marxian, New York, 1921, Vol. 1, No. 2, and
it appeared in full as a separate edition by Labour News Company, New
York, 1924.

In this volume, the work is published after the Neue Rheinische Zeitung.
Politisch-ökonomische Revue text, checked with that of the 1895 edition
prepared by Engels. The Revue published it from the manuscript and since
Marx’s handwriting was difficult to decipher, mistakes cropped up. In
the present edition, all changes in style, spelling, punctuation and
other corrections made by Engels have been taken into account, as well
as errata printed in the Neue Rheinische Zeitung. Politisch-ökonomische
Revue (to the first number in the second, and to the second and third in
the fourth).

Account has also been taken of the analysis, carried out by the
editorial commission working on the Marx/EngeIs, Gesamtausgabe (MEGA),
erste Abteilung, 10. Bd. and kindly made available to us, of the marks
and corrections made by Marx and Engels in their copies of the journal.
Engels’ corrections apparently date f torn 1895 when he republished The
Class Struggles (in the 1895 edition, however, they were only partly
taken into account). It is also probable that Engels intended to
republish the Revue in full. Some corrections by Marx and Engels
coinciding with the errata printed in the Revue have been silently
inserted in the text of the present edition. Changes in meaning are
indicated in footnotes.

Besides this, obviously inaccurate dates and factual data, including
those in the 1850 and 1895 editions, have also been silently corrected.
Comments are not usually made on Marx’s free translation of quotations,
except when the words Marx puts in quotation marks are not true
quotations but convey the general meaning of the cited passages.

 

Footnotes | The June Revolution (Marx’s in Neue Rheinische Zeitung at
the time)

18th Brumaire of Louis Napoleon (same material written 2 years later)

Selected Works | Marx/Engels Archive

The Class Struggles in France, 1848 to 1850


Part I

The Defeat of June, 1848

After the July Revolution [of 1830], when the liberal banker Laffitte
led his compčre, the Duke of Orléans, in triumph to the Hôtel de Ville,
he let fall the words: “From now on the bankers will rule”. Laffitte had
betrayed the secret of the revolution.

It was not the French bourgeoisie that ruled under Louis Philippe, but
one faction of it: bankers, stock-exchange kings, railway kings, owners
of coal and iron mines and forests, a part of the landed proprietors
associated with them – the so-called financial aristocracy. It sat on
the throne, it dictated laws in the Chambers, it distributed public
offices, from cabinet portfolios to tobacco bureau posts.

The industrial bourgeoisie proper formed part of the official
opposition, that is, it was represented only as a minority in the
Chambers. Its opposition was expressed all the more resolutely the more
unalloyed the autocracy of the finance aristocracy became, and the more
it imagined that its domination over the working class was insured after
the revolts of 1832, 1834, and 1839, which had been drowned in
blood.[64] Grandin, a Rouen manufacturer and the most fanatical
instrument of bourgeois reaction in the Constituent as well as in the
Legislative National Assembly, was the most violent opponent of Guizot
in the Chamber of Deputies. Léon Faucher, later known for his impotent
efforts to climb into prominence as the Guizot of the French
counterrevolution, in the last days of Louis Philippe waged a war of the
pen for industry against speculation and its train bearer, the
government. Bastiat agitated in the name of Bordeaux and the whole of
wine-producing France against the ruling system.

The petty bourgeoisie of all gradations, and the peasantry also, were
completely excluded from political power. Finally, in the official
opposition or entirely outside the pays légal [electorate], there were
the ideological representatives and spokesmen of the above classes,
their savants, lawyers, doctors, etc., in a word, their so-called men of
talent.

Owing to its financial straits, the July Monarchy was dependent from the
beginning on the big bourgeoisie, and its dependence on the big
bourgeoisie was the inexhaustible source of increasing financial
straits. It was impossible to subordinate the administration of the
state to the interests of national production without balancing the
budget, without establishing a balance between state expenditures and
revenues. And how was this balance to be established without limiting
state expenditures – that is, without encroaching on interests which
were so many props of the ruling system – and without redistributing
taxes – that is, without shifting a considerable share of the burden of
taxation onto the shoulders of the big bourgeoisie itself?

On the contrary, the faction of the bourgeoisie that ruled and
legislated through the Chambers had a direct interest in the
indebtedness of the state. The state deficit was really the main object
of its speculation and the chief source of its enrichment. At the end of
each year a new deficit. After the lapse of four or five years a new
loan. And every new loan offered new opportunities to the finance
aristocracy for defrauding the state, which was kept artificially on the
verge of bankruptcy – it had to negotiate with the bankers under the
most unfavorable conditions. Each new loan gave a further opportunity,
that of plundering the public which invested its capital in state bonds
by means of stock-exchange manipulations, the secrets of which the
government and the majority in the Chambers were privy to. In general,
the instability of state credit and the possession of state secrets gave
the bankers and their associates in the Chambers and on the throne the
possibility of evoking sudden, extraordinary fluctuations in the
quotations of government securities, the result of which was always
bound to be the ruin of a mass of smaller capitalists and the fabulously
rapid enrichment of the big gamblers. As the state deficit was in the
direct interest of the ruling faction of the bourgeoisie, it is clear
why the extraordinary state expenditure in the last years of Louis
Philippe’s reign was far more than double the extraordinary state
expenditure under Napoleon, indeed reached a yearly sum of nearly
400,000,000 francs, whereas the whole average annual export of France
seldom attained a volume amounting to 750,000,000 francs. The enormous
sums which in this way flowed through the hands of the state
facilitated, moreover, swindling contracts for deliveries, bribery,
defalcations, and all kinds of roguery.

The defrauding of the state, practiced wholesale in connection with
loans, was repeated retail in public works. What occurred in the
relations between Chamber and government became multiplied in the
relations between individual departments and individual entrepreneurs.

The ruling class exploited the building of railways in the same way it
exploited state expenditures in general and state loans. The Chambers
piled the main burdens on the state, and secured the golden fruits to
the speculating finance aristocracy. One recalls the scandals in the
Chamber of Deputies when by chance it leaked out that all the members of
the majority, including a number of ministers, had been interested as
shareholders in the very railway constructions which as legislators they
had carried out afterward at the cost of the state.

On the other hand, the smallest financial reform was wrecked through the
influence of the bankers. For example, the postal reform. Rothschild
protested. Was it permissible for the state to curtail sources of
revenue out of which interest was to be paid on its ever increasing
debt?

The July Monarchy was nothing other than a joint stock company for the
exploitation of France’s national wealth, whose dividends were divided
among ministers, Chambers, 240,000 voters, and their adherents. Louis
Philippe was the director of this company – Robert Macaire[65] on the
throne. Trade, industry, agriculture, shipping, the interests of the
industrial bourgeoisie, were bound to be continually endangered and
prejudiced under this system. Cheap government, governement ŕ bon
marché, was what it had inscribed on its banner in the July days.

Since the finance aristocracy made the laws, was at the head of the
administration of the state, had command of all the organized public
authorities, dominated public opinion through the actual state of
affairs and through the press, the same prostitution, the same shameless
cheating, the same mania to get rich was repeated in every sphere, from
the court to the Café Borgne[2] to get rich not by production, but by
pocketing the already available wealth of others, Clashing every moment
with the bourgeois laws themselves, an unbridled assertion of unhealthy
and dissolute appetites manifested itself, particularly at the top of
bourgeois society – lusts wherein wealth derived from gambling naturally
seeks its satisfaction, where pleasure becomes crapuleux [debauched],
where money, filth, and blood commingle. The finance aristocracy, in its
mode of acquisition as well as in its pleasures, is nothing but the
rebirth of the lumpenproletariat on the heights of bourgeois society.

And the nonruling factions of the French bourgeoisie cried: Corruption!
The people cried: Ŕ bas les grands voleurs! Ŕ bas les assassins! [Down
with the big thieves! Down with the assassins!] when in 1847, on the
most prominent stages of bourgeois society, the same scenes were
publicly enacted that regularly lead the lumpenproletariat to brothels,
to workhouses and lunatic asylums, to the bar of justice, to the
dungeon, and to the scaffold. The industrial bourgeoisie saw its
interests endangered, the petty bourgeoisie was filled with moral
indignation, the imagination of the people was offended, Paris was
flooded with pamphlets – “The Rothschild Dynasty,” “Usurers Kings of the
Epoch,” _etc._ – in which the rule of the finance aristocracy was
denounced and stigmatized with greater or less wit.

Rien pour la gloire! [Nothing for glory!] Glory brings no profit! La
paix partout et toujours! [Peace everywhere and always!] War depresses
the quotations of the 3 and 4 percents which the France of the Bourse
jobbers had inscribed on her banner. Her foreign policy was therefore
lost in a series of mortifications to French national sentiment, which
reacted all the more vigorously when the rape of Poland was brought to
its conclusion with the incorporation of Cracow by Austria, and when
Guizot came out actively on the side of the Holy Alliance in the Swiss
separatist war.[66] The victory of the Swiss liberals in this mimic war
raised the self-respect of the bourgeois opposition in France; the
bloody uprising of the people in Palermo worked like an electric shock
on the paralyzed masses of the people and awoke their great
revolutionary memories and passions. [Annexation of Cracow by Austria in
agreement with Russia and Prussia on November 11, 1846. – Swiss
Sonderbund war: November 4 to 28, 1847. – Rising in Palermo: January 12,
1848; at the end of January, nine days’ bombardment of the town by the
Neapolitans. Note by Engels to the edition of 1895.]

The eruption of the general discontent was finally accelerated and the
mood for revolt ripened by two economic world events.

The potato blight and the crop failures of 1845 and 1846 increased the
general ferment among the people. The famine of 1847 called forth bloody
conflicts in France as well as on the rest of the Continent. As against
the shameless orgies of the finance aristocracy, the struggle of the
people for the prime necessities of life! At Buzançais, hunger rioters
executed[67]; in Paris, oversatiated escrocs [swindlers] snatched from
the courts by the royal family!

The second great economic event that hastened the outbreak of the
revolution was a general commercial and industrial crisis in England.
Already heralded in the autumn of 1845 by the wholesale reverses of the
speculators in railway shares, staved off during 1846 by a number of
incidents such as the impending abolition of the Corn Laws, the crisis
finally burst in the autumn of 1847 with the bankruptcy of the London
wholesale grocers, on the heels of which followed the insolvencies of
the land banks and the closing of the factories in the English
industrial districts. The aftereffect of this crisis on the Continent
had not yet spent itself when the February Revolution broke out.

The devastation of trade and industry caused by the economic epidemic
made the autocracy of the finance aristocracy still more unbearable.
Throughout the whole of France the bourgeois opposition agitated at
banquets for an electoral reform which should win for it the majority in
the Chambers and overthrow the Ministry of the Bourse. In Paris the
industrial crisis had, moreover, the particular result of throwing a
multitude of manufacturers and big traders, who under the existing
circumstances could no longer do any business in the foreign market,
onto the home market. They set up large establishments, the competition
of which ruined the small épiciers [grocers] and boutiquiers
[shopkeepers] en masse. Hence the innumerable bankruptcies among this
section of the Paris bourgeoisie, and hence their revolutionary action
in February. It is well known how Guizot and the Chambers answered the
reform proposals with an unambiguous challenge, how Louis Philippe too
late resolved on a ministry led by Barrot, how things went as far as
hand-to-hand fighting between the people and the army, how the army was
disarmed by the passive conduct of the National Guard, how the July
Monarchy had to give way to a provisional government.

The Provisional Government which emerged from the February barricades
necessarily mirrored in its composition the different parties which
shared in the victory. It could not be anything but a compromise between
the different classes which together had overturned the July throne, but
whose interests were mutually antagonistic. The great majority of its
members consisted of representatives of the bourgeoisie. The republican
petty bourgeoisie was represented by Ledru-Rollin and Flocon, the
republican bourgeoisie by the people from the National[3], the dynastic
opposition by Crémieux, Dupont de l’Eure, etc.[68] The working class had
only two representatives, Louis Blanc and Albert. Finally, Lamartine in
the Provisional Government; this was at first no real interest, no
definite class; this was the February Revolution itself, the common
uprising with its illusions, its poetry, its visionary content, and its
phrases. For the rest, the spokesman of the February Revolution, by his
position and his views, belonged to the bourgeoisie.

If Paris, as a result of political centralization, rules France, the
workers, in moments of revolutionary earthquakes, rule Paris. The first
act in the life of the Provisional Government was an attempt to escape
from this overpowering influence by an appeal from intoxicated Paris to
sober France. Lamartine disputed the right of the barricade fighters to
proclaim a republic on the ground that only the majority of Frenchmen
had that right; they must await their votes, the Paris proletariat must
not besmirch its victory by a usurpation. [From Lamartine’s speech of 24
February] The bourgeoisie allows the proletariat only one usurpation –
that of fighting.

Up to noon of February 25 the republic had not yet been proclaimed; on
the other hand, all the ministries had already been divided among the
bourgeois elements of the Provisional Government and among the generals,
bankers, and lawyers of the National. But the workers were determined
this time not to put up with any bamboozlement like that of July, 1830.
They were ready to take up the fight anew and to get a republic by force
of arms. With this message, Raspail betook himself to the Hôtel de
Ville. In the name of the Paris proletariat he commanded the Provisional
Government to proclaim a republic; if this order of the people were not
fulfilled within two hours, he would return at the head of 200,000 men.
The bodies of the fallen were scarcely cold, the barricades were not yet
disarmed, and the only force that could be opposed to them was the
National Guard. Under these circumstances the doubts born of
considerations of state policy and the juristic scruples of conscience
entertained by the Provisional Government suddenly vanished. The time
limit of two hours had not yet expired when all the walls of Paris were
resplendent with the gigantic historical words:

République français! Liberté, Egalité, Fraternité!

Even the memory of the limited alms and motives which drove the
bourgeoisie into the February Revolution was extinguished by the
proclamation of the republic on the basis of universal suffrage. Instead
of only a few factions of the bourgeoisie, all classes of French society
were suddenly hurled into the orbit of political power, forced to leave
the boxes, the stalls, and the gallery and to act in person upon the
revolutionary stage! With the constitutional monarchy vanished also the
semblance of a state power independently confronting bourgeois society,
as well as the whole series of subordinate struggles which this
semblance of power called forth!

By dictating the republic to the Provisional Government, and through the
Provisional Government to the whole of France, the proletariat
immediately stepped into the foreground as an independent party, but at
the same time challenged the whole of bourgeois France to enter the
lists against it. What it won was the terrain for the fight for its
revolutionary emancipation, but by no means this emancipation itself.

The first thing the February Republic had to do was, rather, to complete
the rule of the bourgeoisie by allowing, besides the finance
aristocracy, all the propertied classes to enter the orbit of political
power. The majority of the great landowners, the Legitimists, were
emancipated from the political nullity to which they had been condemned
by the July Monarchy. Not for nothing had the Gazette de France agitated
in common with the opposition papers; not for nothing had La
Roche-Jaquelein taken the side of the revolution in the session of the
Chamber of Deputies on February 24. The nominal proprietors, the
peasants, who form the great majority of the French people, were put by
universal suffrage in the position of arbiters of the fate of France.
The February Republic finally brought the rule of the bourgeoisie
clearly into view, since it struck off the crown behind which capital
had kept itself concealed.

Just as the workers in the July days had fought for and won the
bourgeois monarchy, so in the February days they fought for and won the
bourgeois republic. Just as the July Monarchy had to proclaim itself a
monarchy surrounded by republican institutions, so the February Republic
was forced to proclaim itself a republic surrounded by social
institutions. The Paris proletariat compelled this concession, too.

Marche, a worker, dictated the decree [decree on the right to work, 25
February 1848] by which the newly formed Provisional Government pledged
itself to guarantee the workers a livelihood by means of labor, to
provide work for all citizens, _etc._ And when a few days later it
forgot its promises and seemed to have lost sight of the proletariat, a
mass of 20,000 workers marched on the Hôtel de Ville with the cry:
Organize labor! Form a special Ministry of labor! Reluctantly and after
long debate, the Provisional Government nominated a permanent special
commission charged with lending means of improving the lot of the
working classes! This commission consisted of delegates from the
corporations [guilds] of Paris artisans and was presided over by Louis
Blanc and Albert. The Luxembourg Palace was assigned to it as its
meeting place. In this way the representatives of the working class were
banished from the seat of the Provisional Government, the bourgeois part
of which retained the real state power and the reins of administration
exclusively in its hands; and side by side with the ministries of
finance, trade, and public works, side by side with the Bank and the
Bourse, there arose a socialist synagogue whose high priests, Louis
Blanc and Albert, had the task of discovering the promised land, of
preaching the new gospel, and of providing work for the Paris
proletariat. Unlike any profane state power, they had no budget, no
executive authority at their disposal. They were supposed to break the
pillars of bourgeois society by dashing their heads against them. While
the Luxembourg sought the philosopher’s stone, in the Hôtel de Ville
they minted the current coinage.

And yet the claims of the Paris proletariat, so far as they went beyond
the bourgeois republic, could win no other existence than the nebulous
one of the Luxembourg.

In common with the bourgeoisie the workers had made the February
Revolution, and alongside the bourgeoisie they sought to secure the
advancement of their interests, just as they had installed a worker in
the Provisional Government itself alongside the bourgeois majority.
Organize labor! But wage labor, that is the existing, the bourgeois
organization of labor. Without it there is no capital, no bourgeoisie,
no bourgeois society. A special Ministry of Labor! But the ministries of
finance, of trade, of public works – are not these the bourgeois
ministries of labor? And alongside these a proletariat Ministry of Labor
had to be a ministry of impotence, a ministry of pious wishes, a
Luxembourg Commission. Just as the workers thought they would be able to
emancipate themselves side by side with the bourgeoisie, so they thought
they would be able to consummate a proletarian revolution within the
national walls of France, side by side with the remaining bourgeois
nations. But French relations of production are conditioned by the
foreign trade of France, by her position on the world market and the
laws thereof; how was France to break them without a European
revolutionary war, which would strike back at the despot of the world
market, England?

As soon as it has risen up, a class in which the revolutionary interests
of society are concentrated finds the content and the material for its
revolutionary activity directly in its own situation: foes to be laid
low, measures dictated by the needs of the struggle to be taken; the
consequences of its own deeds drive it on. It makes no theoretical
inquiries into its own task. The French working class had not attained
this level; it was still incapable of accomplishing its own revolution.

The development of the industrial proletariat is, in general,
conditioned by the development of the industrial bourgeoisie. Only under
its rule does the proletariat gain that extensive national existence
which can raise its revolution to a national one, and only thus does the
proletariat itself create the modern means of production, which become
just so many means of its revolutionary emancipation. Only bourgeois
rule tears up the material roots of feudal society and levels the ground
on which alone a proletarian revolution is possible. French industry is
more developed and the French bourgeoisie more revolutionary than that
of the rest of the Continent. But was not the February Revolution aimed
directly against the finance aristocracy? This fact proved that the
industrial bourgeoisie did not rule France. The industrial bourgeoisie
can rule only where modern industry shapes all property relations to
suit itself, and industry can win this power only where it has conquered
the world market, for national bounds are inadequate for its
development. But French industry, to a great extent, maintains its
command even of the national market only through a more or less modified
system of prohibitive duties. While, therefore, the French proletariat,
at the moment of a revolution, possesses in Paris actual power and
influence which spur it on to a drive beyond its means, in the rest of
France it is crowded into separate, scattered industrial centers, almost
lost in the superior number of peasants and petty bourgeois. The
struggle against capital in its developed, modern form – in its decisive
aspect, the struggle of the industrial wage worker against the
industrial bourgeois – is in France a partial phenomenon, which after
the February days could so much the less supply the national content of
the revolution, since the struggle against capital’s secondary modes of
exploitation, that of the peasant against usury and mortgages or of the
petty bourgeois against the wholesale dealer, banker, and manufacturer –
in a word, against bankruptcy – was still hidden in the general uprising
against the finance aristocracy. Nothing is more understandable, then,
than that the Paris proletariat sought to secure the advancement of its
own interests side by side with those of the bourgeoisie, instead of
enforcing them as the revolutionary interests of society itself, that it
let the red flag be lowered to the tricolor[70]. The French workers
could not take a step forward, could not touch a hair of the bourgeois
order, until the course of the revolution had aroused the mass of the
nation, peasants and petite bourgeois, standing between the proletariat
and the bourgeoisie, against this order, against the rule of capital,
and had forced it to attach itself to the proletarians as its
protagonists. The workers could buy this victory only through the
tremendous defeat in June.

The Luxembourg Commission, this creation of the Paris workers, must be
given the credit of having disclosed, from a Europe-wide tribune, the
secret of the revolution of the nineteenth century: the emancipation of
the proletariat. The Moniteur blushed when it had to propagate
officially the “wild ravings”[71] which up to that time had lain buried
in the apocryphal writings of the socialists and reached the ear of the
bourgeoisie only from time to time as remote, half-terrifying,
half-ludicrous legends. Europe awoke astonished from its bourgeois doze.
Therefore, in the minds of the proletarians, who confused the finance
aristocracy with the bourgeoisie in general; in the imagination of the
good old republicans who denied the very existence of classes or, at
most, admitted them as a result of the constitutional monarchy; in the
hypocritical phrases of the factions of the bourgeoisie which up to now
had been excluded from power, the rule of the bourgeoisie was abolished
with the introduction of the republic. At that time all the royalists
were transformed into republicans and all the millionaires of Paris into
workers. The phrase which corresponded to this imaginary abolition of
class relations was fraternité, universal fraternization and
brotherhood. This pleasant abstraction from class antagonisms, this
sentimental reconciliation of contradictory class interests, this
visionary elevation above the class struggle, this fraternite, was the
real catchword of the February Revolution. The classes were divided by a
mere misunderstanding, and on February 24 Lamartine christened the
Provisional Government “une gouvernement qui suspends ce malentendu
terrible qui existe entre les différentes classes” [a government that
removes this terrible misunderstanding which exists between the
different classes, from Lamartine’s speech, 24 February 1848]. The Paris
proletariat reveled in this magnanimous intoxication of fraternity.

The Provisional Government, for its part, once it was compelled to
proclaim the republic, did everything to make it acceptable to the
bourgeoisie and to the provinces. The bloody terror of the first French
republic was disavowed by the abolition of the death penalty for
political offenses; the press was opened to all opinions – the army, the
courts, the administration remained with a few exceptions in the hands
of their old dignitaries; none of the July Monarchy’s great offenders
was brought to book. The bourgeois republicans of the National amused
themselves by exchanging monarchist names and costumes for old
republican ones. To them the republic was only a new ball dress for the
old bourgeois society. The young republic sought its chief merit not in
frightening, but rather in constantly taking fright itself, and in
winning existence and disarming resistance by soft compliance and
nonresistance. At home to the privileged classes, abroad to the despotic
powers, it was loudly announced that the republic was of a peaceful
nature. Live and let live was its professed motto. In addition to that,
shortly after the February Revolution the Germans, Poles, Austrians,
Hungarians, and Italians revolted, each people in accordance with its
immediate situation. Russia and England – the latter itself agitated,
the former cowed – were not prepared. The republic, therefore, had no
national enemy to face. Consequently there were no great foreign
complications which could fire the energies, hasten the revolutionary
process, drive the Provisional Government forward or throw it overboard.
The Paris proletariat, which looked upon the republic as its own
creation, naturally acclaimed each act of the Provisional Government
which facilitated the firm emplacement of the latter in bourgeois
society. It willingly allowed itself to be employed on police service by
Caussidičre in order to protect property in Paris, just as it allowed
Louis Blanc to arbitrate wage disputes between workers and masters. It
made it a point d’honneur [point of honor] to preserve the bourgeois
honor of the republic unblemished in the eyes of Europe.

The republic encountered no resistance either abroad or at home. This
disarmed it. Its task was no longer the revolutionary transformation of
the world, but consisted only in adapting itself to the relations of
bourgeois society. As to the fanaticism with which the Provisional
Government undertook this task there is no more eloquent testimony than
its financial measures.

Public credit and private credit were naturally shaken. Public credit
rests on confidence that the state will allow itself to be exploited by
the wolves of finance. But the old state had vanished and the revolution
was directed above all against the finance aristocracy. The vibrations
of the last European commercial crisis had not yet ceased. Bankruptcy
still followed bankruptcy.

Private credit was therefore paralyzed, circulation restricted,
production at a standstill before the February Revolution broke out. The
revolutionary crisis increased the commercial crisis. And if private
credit rests on confidence that bourgeois production in the entire scope
of its relations – the bourgeois order – will not be touched, will
remain inviolate, what effect must a revolution have had which
questioned the basis of bourgeois production, the economic slavery of
the proletariat, which set up against the Bourse the sphinx of the
Luxembourg? The uprising of the proletariat is the abolition of
bourgeois credit, for it is the abolition of bourgeois production and
its order. Public credit and private credit are the economic thermometer
by which the intensity of a revolution can be measured. The more they
fall, the more the fervor and generative power of the revolution rises.

The Provisional Government wanted to strip the republic of its
antibourgeois appearance. And so it had, above all, to try to peg the
exchange value of this new form of state, its quotation on the Bourse.
Private credit necessarily rose again, together with the current Bourse
quotation of the republic.

In order to allay the very suspicion that it would not or could not
honor the obligations assumed by the monarchy, in order to build up
confidence in the republic’s bourgeois morality and capacity to pay, the
Provisional Government took refuge in braggadocio as undignified as it
was childish. In advance of the legal date of payment it paid out the
interest on the 5-percent, 4 ˝-percent and 4-percent bonds to the state
creditors. The bourgeois aplomb, the self-assurance of the capitalists,
suddenly awoke when they saw the anxious haste with which this
government sought to buy their confidence.

The financial embarrassment of the Provisional Government was naturally
not lessened by a theatrical stroke which robbed it of its stock of
ready cash. The financial pinch could no longer be concealed and petty
bourgeois, domestic servants, and workers had to pay for the pleasant
surprise which had been prepared for the state creditors.

It was announced that no more money could be drawn on savings bank books
for an amount of over a hundred francs. The sums deposited in the
savings banks were confiscated and by decree transformed into an
irredeemable state debt. This embittered the already hard-pressed petty
bourgeois against the republic. Since he received state debt
certificates in place of his savings bank books, he was forced to go to
the Bourse in order to sell them and thus deliver himself directly into
the hands of the Bourse jobbers against whom he had made the February
Revolution.

The finance aristocracy, which ruled under the July Monarchy, had its
high church in the Bank. Just as the Bourse governs state credit, the
Bank governs commercial credit.

Directly threatened not only in its rule but in its very existence by
the February Revolution, the Bank tried from the outset to discredit the
republic by making the lack of credit general. It suddenly stopped the
credits of the bankers, the manufacturers, and the merchants. As it did
not immediately call forth a counterrevolution, this maneuver
necessarily reacted on the Bank itself. The capitalists drew out the
money they had deposited in the vaults of the Bank. The possessors of
bank notes rushed to the pay office in order to exchange them for gold
and silver.

The Provisional Government could have forced the Bank into bankruptcy
without forcible interference, in a legal manner; it would have had only
to remain passive and leave the Bank to its fate. The bankruptcy of the
Bank would have been the deluge which in an instant would have swept
from French soil the finance aristocracy, the most powerful and
dangerous enemy of the republic, the golden pedestal of the July
Monarchy. And once the Bank was bankrupt, the bourgeoisie itself would
have had to regard it as a last desperate attempt at rescue, if the
government had formed a national bank and subjected national credit to
the control of the nation.

The Provisional Government, on the contrary, fixed a compulsory
quotation for the notes of the Bank. It did more. It transformed all
provincial banks into branches of the Banque de France and allowed it to
cast its net over the whole of France. Later it pledged the state
forests to the Bank as a guarantee for a loan contracted from it. In
this way the February Revolution directly strengthened and enlarged the
bankocracy which it should have overthrown.

Meanwhile the Provisional Government was writhing under the incubus of a
growing deficit. In vain it begged for patriotic sacrifices. Only the
workers threw it their alms. Recourse had to be had to a heroic measure,
to the imposition of a new tax. But who was to be taxed? The Bourse
wolves, the bank kings, the state creditors, the rentiers, the
industrialists? That was not the way to ingratiate the republic with the
bourgeoisie. That would have meant, on the one hand, to endanger state
credit and commercial credit, while on the other, attempts were made to
purchase them with such great sacrifices and humiliations. But someone
had to fork over the cash. Who was sacrificed to bourgeois credit?
Jacques le bonhomme, the peasant.

The Provisional Government imposed an additional tax of 45 centimes to
the franc on the four direct taxes. The government press cajoled the
Paris proletariat into believing that this tax would fall chiefly on the
big landed proprietors, on the possessors of the milliard granted by the
Restoration.[72] But in truth it hit the peasant class above all, that
is, the large majority of the French people. They had to pay the costs
of the February Revolution; in them the counterrevolution gained its
main material. The 45-centime tax was a question of life and death for
the French peasant. He made it a life and death question for the
republic. From that moment the republic meant to the French peasant the
45 centime tax, and he saw in the Paris proletariat the spendthrift who
did himself well at his expense.

Whereas the Revolution of 1789 began by shaking the feudal burdens off
the peasants, the Revolution of 1848 announced itself to the rural
population by the imposition of a new tax, in order not to endanger
capital and to keep its state machine going.

There was only one means by which the Provisional Government could set
aside all these inconveniences and jerk the state out of its old rut – a
declaration of state bankruptcy. Everyone recalls how Ledru-Rollin in
the National Assembly subsequently described the virtuous indignation
with which he repudiated this presumptuous proposal of the Bourse Jew,
Fould [from Ledru-Rollin’s speech 21 April 1849], now French Finance
Minister. Fould had handed him the apple from the tree of knowledge.

By honoring the bills drawn on the state by the old bourgeois society,
the Provisional Government succumbed to the latter. It had become the
hard-pressed debtor of bourgeois society instead of confronting it as
the pressing creditor that had to collect the revolutionary debts of
many years. It had to consolidate the shaky bourgeois relationships in
order to fulfill obligations which are only to be fulfilled within these
relationships. Credit became a condition of life for it, and the
concessions to the proletariat, the promises made to it, became so many
fetters which had to be struck off. The emancipation of the workers –
even as a phrase – became an unbearable danger to the new republic, for
it was a standing protest against the restoration of credit, which rests
on undisturbed and untroubled recognition of the existing economic class
relations. Therefore, it was necessary to have done with the workers.

The February Revolution had cast the army out of Paris. The National
Guard, that is, the bourgeoisie in its different gradations, constituted
the sole power. Alone, however, it did not feel itself a match for the
proletariat. Moreover, it was forced gradually and piecemeal to open its
ranks and admit armed proletarians, albeit after the most tenacious
resistance and after setting up a hundred different obstacles. There
consequently remained but one way out: to play off part of the
proletariat against the other.

For this purpose the Provisional Government formed twenty–four
battalions of Mobile Guards, each a thousand strong, composed of young
men from fifteen to twenty years old.[73] They belonged for the most
part to the lumpen proletariat, which in all big towns forms a mass
sharply differentiated from the industrial proletariat, a recruiting
ground for thieves and criminals of all kinds living on the crumbs of
society, people without a definite trade, vagabonds, gens sans feu et
sans aveu [men without hearth or home], varying according to the degree
of civilization of the nation to which they belong, but never renouncing
their lazzaroni[74] character – at the youthful age at which the
Provisional Government recruited them, thoroughly malleable, as capable
of the most heroic deeds and the most exalted sacrifices as of the
basest banditry and the foulest corruption. The Provisional Government
paid them 1 franc 50 centimes a day; that is, it bought them. It gave
them their own uniform; that is, it made them outwardly distinct from
the blouse-wearing workers. In part it assigned officers from the
standing army as their leaders; in part they themselves elected young
sons of the bourgeoisie whose rodomontades about death for the
fatherland and devotion to the republic captivated them.

And so the Paris proletariat was confronted with an army, drawn from its
own midst, of 24,000 young, strong, foolhardy men. it gave cheers for
the Mobile Guard on its marches through Paris. It acknowledged it to be
its foremost fighters on the barricades. It regarded it as the
proletarian guard in contradistinction to the bourgeois National Guard.
Its error was pardonable.

Besides the Mobile Guard, the government decided to rally around itself
an army of industrial workers. A hundred thousand workers, thrown on the
streets by the crisis and the revolution, were enrolled by the Minister
Marie in so-called national ateliers [workshops]. Under this grandiose
name was hidden nothing else than the employment of the workers on
tedious, monotonous, unproductive earthworks at a wage of 23 sous.
English workhouses[75] in the open – that is what these national
ateliers were. The Provisional Government believed that it had formed,
in them, a second proletarian army against the workers themselves. This
time the bourgeoisie was mistaken in the national ateliers, just as the
workers were mistaken in the Mobile Guard. It had created an army for
mutiny.

But one purpose was achieved.

National ateliers was the name of the people’s workshops which Louis
Blanc preached in the Luxembourg Palace. Marie’s ateliers [workshops],
devised in direct antagonism to the Luxembourg, offered occasion, thanks
to the common label, for a comedy of errors worthy of the Spanish
servant farce. The Provisional Government itself surreptitiously spread
the report that these national ateliers were the discovery of Louis
Blanc, and this seemed the more plausible because Louis Blanc, the
prophet of the national ateliers, was a member of the Provisional
Government. And in the half-naive, half-intentional confusion of the
Paris bourgeoisie, in the artificially molded opinion of France, of
Europe, these workhouses were the first realization of socialism, which
was put in the pillory, with them.

In their appellation, though not in their content, the national ateliers
were the embodied protest of the proletariat against bourgeois industry,
bourgeois credit, and the bourgeois republic. The whole hate of the
bourgeoisie was therefore turned upon them. It had found in them,
simultaneously, the point against which it could direct the attack, as
soon as it was strong enough to break openly with the February
illusions. All the discontent, all the ill humor of the petty bourgeois
too was directed against these national ateliers, the common target.
With real fury they totted up the money the proletarian loafers
swallowed up while their own situation was becoming daily more
unbearable. A state pension for sham labor, so that’s socialism! they
grumbled to themselves. They sought the reason for their misery in the
national ateliers, the declamations of the Luxembourg, the processions
of the workers through Paris. And no one was more fanatic about the
alleged machinations of the communists than the petty bourgeoisie, who
hovered hopelessly on the brink of bankruptcy.

Thus in the approaching melee between bourgeoisie and proletariat, all
the advantages, all the decisive posts, all the middle strata of society
were in the hands of the bourgeoisie, at the same time as the waves of
the February Revolution rose high over the whole Continent, and each new
post brought a new bulletin of revolution, now from Italy, now from
Germany, now from the remotest parts of southeastern Europe, and
maintained the general ecstasy of the people, giving it constant
testimony of a victory that it had already forfeited.

March 17 and April 16 were the first skirmishes in the big class
struggle which the bourgeois republic hid under its wing.

March 17 revealed the proletariat’s ambiguous situation, which permitted
no decisive act. Its demonstration originally pursued the purpose of
pushing the Provisional Government back onto the path of revolution, of
effecting the exclusion of its bourgeois members, according to
circumstances, and of compelling the postponement of the elections for
the National Assembly and the National Guard.[76] But on March 16 the
bourgeoisie represented in the National Guard staged a hostile
demonstration against the Provisional Government. With the cry Ŕ bas
Ledru-Rollin [Down with Ledru-Rollin]! it surged to the Hôtel de Ville.
And the people were forced, on March 17, to shout: Long live
Ledru-Rollin! Long live the Provisional Government! They were forced to
take sides against the bourgeoisie in support of the bourgeois republic,
which seemed to them to be in danger. They strengthened the Provisional
Government, instead of subordinating it to themselves. March 17 went off
in a melodramatic scene, and whereas the Paris proletariat on this day
once more displayed its giant body, the bourgeoisie both inside and
outside the Provisional Government was all the more determined to smash
it.

April 16 was a misunderstanding engineered by the Provisional Government
in alliance with the bourgeoisie. The workers had gathered in great
numbers in the Champ de Mars and in the Hippodrome to choose their
nominees to the general staff of the National Guard. Suddenly throughout
Paris, from one end to the other, a rumor spread as quick as lightning,
to the effect that the workers had met armed in the Champ de Mars, under
the leadership of Louis Blanc, Blanqui, Cabet, and Raspail, in order to
march thence on the Hôtel de Ville, overthrow the Provisional
Government, and proclaim a communist government. The general alarm is
sounded – Ledru-Rollin, Marrast, and Lamartine later contended for the
honor of having initiated this – and in an hour 100,000 men are under
arms; the Hôtel de Ville is occupied at all points by the National
Guard; the cry Down with the Communists! Down with Louis Blanc, with
Blanqui, with Raspail, with Cabet! thunders throughout Paris.
Innumerable deputations pay homage to the Provisional Government, all
ready to save the fatherland and society. When the workers finally
appear before the Hôtel de Ville, in order to hand over to the
Provisional Government a patriotic collection they had made in the Champ
de Mars, they learn to their amazement that bourgeois Paris has defeated
their shadow in a very carefully calculated sham battle. The terrible
attempt of April 16 furnished the excuse for recalling the army to Paris
– the real purpose of the clumsily staged comedy and for the reactionary
federalist demonstrations in the provinces.

On May 4 the National Assembly[4] met the result of the direct general
elections, convened. Universal suffrage did not possess the magic power
which republicans of the old school had ascribed to it. They saw in the
whole of France, at least in the majority of Frenchmen, citoyens
[citizens] with the same interests, the same understanding, _etc._ This
was their cult of the people. Instead of their imaginary people, the
elections brought the real people to the light of day; that is,
representatives of the different classes into which it falls. We have
seen why peasants and petty bourgeois had to vote under the leadership
of a bourgeoisie spoiling for a fight and of big landowners frantic for
restoration. But if universal suffrage was not the miracle – working
magic wand the republican worthies had taken it for, it possessed the
incomparable higher merit of unchaining the class struggle, of letting
the various middle strata of bourgeois society rapidly get over their
illusions and disappointments, of tossing all the sections of the
exploiting class at one throw to the apex of the state, and thus tearing
from them their deceptive mask, whereas the monarchy with its property
qualifications had let only certain factions of the bourgeoisie
compromise themselves, allowing the others to lie hidden behind the
scenes and surrounding them with the halo of a common opposition.

In the Constituent National Assembly, which met on May 4, the bourgeois
republicans, the republicans of the National, had the upper hand. Even
Legitimists and Orléanists at first dared to show themselves only under
the mask of bourgeois republicanism. The fight against the proletariat
could be undertaken only in the name of the republic.

The republic dates from May 4, not from February 25 – that is, the
republic recognized by the French people; it is not the republic which
the Paris proletariat thrust upon the Provisional Government, not the
republic with social institutions, not the vision that hovered before
the fighters on the barricades. The republic proclaimed by the National
Assembly, the sole legitimate republic, is a republic which is no
revolutionary weapon against the bourgeois order, but rather its
political reconstitution, the political reconsolidation of bourgeois
society; in a word, a bourgeois republic. This contention resounded from
the tribune of the National Assembly, and in the entire republican and
anti-republican bourgeois press it found its echo.

And we have seen how the February Republic in reality was not and could
not be other than a bourgeois republic; how the Provisional Government,
nevertheless, was forced by the immediate pressure of the proletariat to
announce it as a republic with social institutions; how the Paris
proletariat was still incapable of going beyond the bourgeois republic
otherwise than in its fancy, in imagination; how even where the republic
acted in the service of the bourgeoisie when it really came to action;
how the promises made to it became an unbearable danger for the new
republic; how the whole life process of the Provisional Government was
comprised in a continuous fight against the demands of the proletariat.

In the National Assembly all France sat in judgment upon the Paris
proletariat. The Assembly broke immediately with the social illusions of
the February Revolution; it roundly proclaimed the bourgeois republic,
nothing but the bourgeois republic. It at once excluded the
representatives of the proletariat, Louis Blanc and Albert, from the
Executive Commission[78] it had appointed; it threw out the proposal of
a special Labor Ministry and received with acclamation the statement of
Minister Trélat: “The question now is merely one of bringing labor back
to its old conditions.” [from Trélat’s speech of 20 June 1848]

But all this was not enough. The February Republic was won by the
workers with the passive support of the bourgeoisie. The proletarians
rightly regarded themselves as the victors of February, and they made
the arrogant claims of victors. They had to be vanquished in the
streets, they had to be shown that they were worsted as soon as they did
not fight with the bourgeoisie, but against the bourgeoisie. Just as the
February Republic, with its socialist concessions, required a battle of
the proletariat, united with the bourgeoisie, against the monarchy, so a
second battle was necessary to sever the republic from socialist
concessions, to officially work out the bourgeois republic as dominant.
The bourgeoisie had to refute, arms in hand, the demands of the
proletariat. And the real birthplace of the bourgeois republic is not
the February victory; it is the June defeat.

The proletariat hastened the decision when, on the fifteenth of May, it
pushed its way into the National Assembly sought in vain to recapture
its revolutionary influence, and only delivered its energetic leaders to
the jailers of the bourgeoisie. Il faut en finir! This situation must
end! With this cry the National Assembly gave vent to its determination
to force the proletariat into a decisive struggle. The Executive
Commission issued a series of provocative decrees, such as that
prohibiting congregations of people,[80] _etc._ The workers were
directly provoked, insulted, and derided from the tribune of the
Constituent National Assembly. But the real point of the attack was, as
we have seen, the national ateliers. The Constituent Assembly
imperiously pointed these out to the Executive Commission, which waited
only to hear its own plan proclaimed the command of the National
Assembly.

The Executive Commission began by making admission to the national
ateliers more difficult, by turning the day wage into a piece wage, by
banishing workers not born in Paris to the Sologne, ostensibly for the
construction of earthworks. These earthworks were only a rhetorical
formula with which to embellish their exile, as the workers, returning
disillusioned, announced to their comrades. Finally, on June 21, a
decree appeared in the Moniteur which ordered the forcible expulsion of
all unmarried workers from the national ateliers or their enrollment in
the army.[81]

The workers were left no choice; they had to starve or let fly. They
answered on June 22 with the tremendous insurrection in which the first
great battle was fought between the two classes that split modern
society. It was a fight for the preservation or annihilation of the
bourgeois order. The veil that shrouded the republic was torn asunder.

It is well known how the workers, with unexampled bravery and ingenuity,
without leaders, without a common plan, without means and, for the most
part, lacking weapons, held in check for five days the army, the Mobile
Guard, the Paris National Guard, and the National Guard that streamed in
from the provinces. It is well known how the bourgeoisie compensated
itself for the mortal anguish it suffered by unheard–of brutality,
massacring over 3000 prisoners. The official representatives of French
democracy were steeped in republican ideology to such an extent that it
was only some weeks later that they began to have an inkling of the
significance of the June fight. They were stupefied by the gunpowder
smoke in which their fantastic republic dissolved.

The immediate impression which the news of the June defeat made on us,
the reader will allow us to describe in the words of the “Neue
Rheinische Zeitung.” [5]

“The Executive Committee,[116] that last official vestige of the
February revolution, vanished like a ghost in the face of these grave
events. Lamartine’s fireworks have turned into the incendiary shells of
Cavaignac.

“Fraternité, the brotherhood of antagonistic classes, one of which
exploits the other, this fraternity which in February was proclaimed and
inscribed in large letters on the facades of Paris, on every prison and
every barracks – this fraternity found its true, unadulterated and
prosaic expression in civil war, civil war in its most terrible aspect,
the war of labor against capital. This brotherhood blazed in front of
the windows of Paris on the evening of June 25, when the Paris of the
bourgeoisie held illuminations while the Paris of the proletariat was
burning, bleeding, groaning in the throes of death.

“This fraternité lasted only as long as there was a consanguinity of
interests between the bourgeoisie and the proletariat. Pedants sticking
to the old revolutionary tradition of 1793; socialist doctrinaires who
begged alms for the people from the bourgeoisie and who were allowed to
deliver lengthy sermons and compromise themselves so long as the
proletarian lion had to be lulled to sleep; republicans who wanted to
keep the old bourgeois order in toto, but without the crowned head;
members of the Dynastic Opposition [117] on whom chance imposed the task
of bringing about the downfall of a dynasty instead of a change of
government; legitimists, [118] who did not want to cast off their livery
but merely to change its style – these were the allies with whom the
people had fought their February revolution. What the people
instinctively hated in Louis Philip was not Louis Philip himself, but
the crowned rule of a class, the capital on the throne. But magnanimous
as always, the people thought they had destroyed their enemy when they
had overthrown the enemy of their enemies, their common enemy.

“The February revolution was the nice revolution, the revolution of
universal sympathies, because the contradictions which erupted in it
against the monarchy were still undeveloped and peacefully dormant,
because the social struggle which formed their background had only
achieved an ephemeral existence, an existence in phrases, in words. The
June revolution is the ugly revolution, the nasty revolution, because
the phrases have given place to the real thing, because the republic has
bared the head of the monster by knocking off the crown which shielded
and concealed it.

“Order! was Guizot’s war-cry. Order! shouted Sebastiani, the Guizotist,
when Warsaw became Russian. Order! shouts Cavaignac, the brutal echo of
the French National Assembly and of the republican bourgeoisie. Order!
thundered his grape-shot as it tore into the body of the proletariat.

“None of the numerous revolutions of the French bourgeoisie since 1789
assailed the existing order, for they retained the class rule, the
slavery of the workers, the bourgeois system, even though the political
form of this rule and this slavery changed frequently. The June uprising
did assail this system. Woe to the June uprising!”

Woe to that June! Re-echoes Europe.

The Paris proletariat was forced into the June insurrection by the
bourgeoisie. This sufficed to mark its doom. Its immediate, avowed needs
did not drive it to engage in a fight for the forcible overthrow of the
bourgeoisie, nor was it equal to this task. The Moniteur had to inform
it officially that the time was past when the republic saw any occasion
to bow and scrape to its illusions, and only its defeat convinced it of
the truth that the slightest improvement in its position remains a
utopia within the bourgeois republic, a utopia that becomes a crime as
soon as it wants to become a reality. In place of the demands, exuberant
in form but still limited and even bourgeois in content, whose
concession the proletariat wanted to wring from the February Republic,
there appeared the bold slogan of revolutionary struggle: Overthrow of
the bourgeoisie! Dictatorship of the Working class!

By making its burial place the birthplace of the bourgeois republic, the
proletariat compelled the latter to come out forthwith in its pure form
as the state whose admitted object it is to perpetuate the rule of
capital, the slavery of labor. Having constantly before its eyes the
scarred, irreconcilable, invincible enemy – invincible because its
existence is the condition of its own life – bourgeois rule, freed from
all fetters, was bound to turn immediately into bourgeois terrorism.
With the proletariat removed for the time being from the stage and
bourgeois dictatorship recognized officially, the middle strata of
bourgeois society, the petty bourgeoisie and the peasant class, had to
adhere more and more closely to the proletariat as their position became
more unbearable and their antagonism to the bourgeoisie more acute. Just
as earlier they had to find the cause of their distress in its upsurge,
so now in its defeat.

If the June insurrection raised the self-assurance of the bourgeoisie
all over the Continent, and caused it to league itself openly with the
feudal monarchy against the people, who was the first victim of this
alliances The continental bourgeoisie itself. The June defeat prevented
it from consolidating its rule and from bringing the people, half
satisfied and half out of humor, to a standstill at the lowest stage of
the bourgeois revolution.

Finally, the defeat of June divulged to the despotic powers of Europe
the secret that France must maintain peace abroad at any price in order
to be able to wage civil war at home. Thus the people’s who had begun
the fight for their national independence were abandoned to the superior
power of Russia, Austria, and Prussian, but at the same time the fate of
these national revolutions was made subject to the fate of the
proletarian revolution, and they were robbed of their apparent autonomy,
their independence of the great social revolution. The Hungarian shall
not be free, nor the Pole, nor the Italian, as long as the worker
remains a slave!

Finally, with the victories of the Holy Alliance, Europe has taken on a
form that makes every fresh proletarian upheaval in France directly
coincide with a world war. The new French revolution is forced to leave
its national soil forthwith and conquer the European terrain, on which
alone the social revolution of the nineteenth century can be
accomplished.

Thus only the June defeat has created all the conditions under which
France can seize the initiative of the European revolution. Only after
being dipped in the blood of the June insurgents did the tricolor become
the flag of the European revolution – the red flag!

And we exclaim: The revolution is dead! Long live the revolution!

 

Notes

1. Robert Macaire, a swindler, is a character in Robert and Bertrand, a
comedy by B. Antier and F. Lemaitre (1834).

2. A term applied to cafes of dubious reputation.

3. Le National, a liberal Paris daily produced by A. Marrast and L. A.
Garnier-Pagčs.

4. The Constituent National Assembly, in power from May 4 1848 to May
1849.

5. Marx’s article, in the Neue Rheinische Zeitung of June 29, 1848, from
which he quotes here, appears on pages 147-150.

 

Contents | Part II: From June 1848 to June 13, 1849 | Marx/Engels
Archive

The Class Struggles in France, 1848 to 1850


Part II

From June 1848 to June 13, 1849

February 25, 1848, granted the republic to France, June 25 thrust the
revolution upon her. And revolution, after June, meant: overthrow of
bourgeois society, whereas before February it meant: overthrow of the
form of government.

The June fight was led by the republican faction of the bourgeoisie;
with victory political power necessarily fell to its share. The state of
siege laid, gagged Paris, unresisting, at its feet, and in the provinces
there prevailed a moral state of siege, the threatening, brutal
arrogance of victorious bourgeoisie and the unleashed property
fanaticism of the peasants. No danger, therefore, from below!

The crash of the revolutionary might of the workers was simultaneously a
crash of the political influence of the democratic republicans; that is,
of the republicans in the sense of the petty bourgeoisie, represented in
the Executive Commission by Ledru-Rollin, in the Constituent National
Assembly by the part of the Montagne and in the press by the “Réforme.”
Together with the bourgeois republicans, they had conspired on April 16
against the proletariat, together with them they had warred against it
in the June days. Thus they themselves blasted the background against
which their party stood out as a power, for the petty bourgeoisie can
preserve a revolutionary attitude toward the bourgeoisie only as long as
the proletariat stands behind it. The proletarians were dismissed. The
sham alliance which the bourgeois republicans, reluctantly and with
reservations, concluded with them during the epoch of the Provisional
Government and the Executive Commission was openly broken by the
bourgeois republicans. Spurned and repulsed as allies, they sank down to
subordinate henchmen of the tricolor men, from whom they could not wring
any concessions but whose domination they had to support whenever it,
and with it the republic, seemed to be put in jeopardy by the
anti-republican bourgeois factions. Lastly, these factions, the
Orléanists and the Legitimists, were from the very beginning in a
minority in the Constituent National Assembly. Before the June days they
dared to react only under the mask of bourgeois republicanism – the June
victory allowed for a moment the whole of bourgeois France to greet its
savior in Cavaignac; and when, shortly after the June days, the
anti-republican party regained independence, the military dictatorship
and the state of siege in Paris permitted it to put out its antennae
only very timidly and cautiously.

Since 1830 the bourgeois republican faction, in the person of its
writers, its spokesmen, its men of talent and ambition, its deputies,
generals, bankers, and lawyers, had grouped itself around a Parisian
journal, the National. In the provinces this journal had its branch
newspapers. The coterie of the National was the dynasty of the tricolor
republic. It immediately took possession of all state offices – of the
ministries, the prefecture of police, the post-office directorship, the
prefectures, the higher army officer posts – which had now become
vacant. At the head of the executive power stood its general, Cavaignac;
its editor in chief, Marrast, became permanent president of the
Constituent National Assembly. As master of ceremonies he at the same
time did the honors, in his salons, of the respectable republic.

Even revolutionary French writers, awed, as it were, by the republican
tradition, have strengthened the mistaken belief that the royalists
dominated the Constituent National Assembly. On the contrary, after the
June days, the Constituent Assembly remained the exclusive
representative of bourgeois republicanism, and it emphasized this aspect
all the more resolutely, the more the influence of the tricolor
republicans collapsed outside the Assembly. If the question was one of
maintaining the form of the bourgeois republic, then the Assembly had
the votes of the democratic republicans at its disposal; if one of
maintaining the content, then even its mode of speech no longer
separated it from the royalist bourgeois factions, for it is the
interests of the bourgeoisie, the material conditions of its class rule
and class exploitation, that form the content of the bourgeois republic.

Thus it was not royalism but bourgeois republicanism that was realized
in the life and work of this Constituent Assembly, which in the end did
not die, nor was killed, but decayed.

For the entire duration of its rule, for as long as it gave its grand
performance of state on the proscenium,[83] an unbroken sacrificial
feast was being staged in the background – the continual sentencing by
courts–martial of the captured June insurgents or their deportation
without trial. The Constituent Assembly had the tact to admit that in
the June insurgents it was not judging criminals but wiping out enemies.

The first act of the Constituent National Assembly was to set up a
commission of inquiry into the events of June and of May 15, and into
the part played by the socialist and democratic party leaders during
these days. The inquiry was directly aimed at Louis Blanc, Ledru-Rollin,
and Caussidičre. The bourgeois republicans burned with impatience to rid
themselves of these rivals. They could have entrusted the venting of
their spleen to no more suitable object than M. Odilon Barrot, the
former chief of the dynastic opposition, the incarnation of liberalism,
the nullité grave [self-important non-entity], the thoroughly shallow
person who not only had a dynasty to revenge, but even had to settle
accounts with the revolutionists for thwarting his premiership. A sure
guarantee of his relentlessness. This Barrot was therefore appointed
chairman of the commission of inquiry, and he constructed a complete
legal process against the February Revolution which may be summarized
thus: March 17, demonstration; April 16, conspiracy; May 15, attempt;
June 23, civil war! Why did he not stretch his erudite criminologist’s
researches as far back as February 24? The Journal des Débats inquired –
that is, to the foundation of Rome. The origin of states gets lost in a
myth that one may believe but may not discuss. Louis Blanc and
Caussidičre were handed over to the courts. The National Assembly
completed the work of purging itself which it had begun on May 15.

The plan formed by the Provisional Government, and again taken up by
Goudchaux, of taxing capital – in the form of a mortgage tax was
rejected by the Constituent Assembly; the law that limited the working
day to ten hours was repealed; imprisonment for debt was once more
introduced; the large section of the French population that can neither
read nor write was excluded from jury service. Why not from the
franchise also? Journals again had to deposit caution money. The right
of association was restricted.

No one had fought more fanatically in the June days for the salvation of
property and the restoration of credit than the Parisian petty bourgeois
– keepers of cafes and restaurants, marchands de vins [wine merchants],
small traders, shopkeepers, handicraftsman, _etc._ The shopkeeper had
pulled himself together and marched against the barricades in order to
restore the traffic which leads from the streets into the shop. But
behind the barricade stood the customers and the debtors; before it the
creditors of the shop. And when the barricades were thrown down and the
workers were crushed and the shopkeepers, drunk with victory, rushed
back to their shops, they found the entrance barred by a savior of
property, an official agent of credit, who presented them with
threatening notices: Overdue promissory note! Overdue house rent!
Overdue bond! Doomed shop! Doomed shopkeeper!

Salvation of property! But the house they lived in was not their
property; the shop they kept was not their property; the commodities
they dealt in were not their property. Neither their business, nor the
plate they ate from, nor the bed they slept on belonged to them any
longer. It was precisely from them that this property had to be saved –
for the house-owner who let the house, for the banker who discounted the
promissory note, for the capitalist who made the advances in cash, for
the manufacturer who entrusted the sale of his commodities to these
retailers, for the wholesale dealer who had credited the raw materials
to these handicraftsman. Restoration of credit! But credit, having
regained strength, proved itself a vigorous and jealous god; it turned
the debtor who could not pay out of his four walls, together with wife
and child, surrendered his sham property to capital, and threw the man
himself into the debtors’ prison, which had once more reared its head
threateningly over the corpses of the June insurgents.

The petty bourgeois saw with horror that by striking down the workers
they had delivered themselves without resistance into the hands of their
creditors. Their bankruptcy, which since February had been dragging on
in chronic fashion and had apparently been ignored, was openly declared
after June.

Their nominal property had been left unassailed as long as it was of
consequence to drive them to the battlefield in the name of property.
Now that the great issue with the proletariat had been settled, the
small matter of the épicier could in turn be settled. In Paris the mass
of overdue paper amounted to over 21,000,000 francs; in the provinces to
over 1,000,000. The proprietors of more than 7,000 Paris firms had not
paid their rent since February.

While the National Assembly had instituted an inquiry into political
guilt, going as far back as the end of February, the petty bourgeois on
their part now demanded an inquiry into civil debts up to February 24.
They assembled en masse in the Bourse hall and threateningly demanded,
on behalf of every businessman who could prove that his insolvency was
due solely to the stagnation caused by the revolution and that his
business had been in good condition on February 24, an extension of the
term of payment by order of a commerce court and the compulsory
liquidation of creditors claims in consideration of a moderate
percentage payment. As a legislative proposal, this question was dealt
with in the National Assembly in the form of concordats ŕ l’amiable
[amicable agreements]. The Assembly vacillated; then it suddenly learned
that at the same time, at the Porte St. Denis, thousands of wives and
children of the insurgents had prepared an amnesty petition.

In the presence of the resurrected specter of June, the petty
bourgeoisie trembled and the National Assembly retrieved its
implacability. The concordats ŕ l’amiable, the amicable settlements
between debtor and creditor, were rejected in their most essential
points.

Thus long after the democratic representatives of the petty bourgeois
had been repulsed within the National Assembly by the republican
representatives of the bourgeoisie, this parliamentary breach received
its civil, its real economic meaning by the petty bourgeois as debtors
being handed over to the bourgeois as creditors. A large part of the
former were completely ruined and the remainder were allowed to continue
their businesses only under conditions which made them absolute serfs of
capital. On August 22, 1848, the National Assembly rejected the
concordats ŕ l’amiable; on September 19, 1848, in the midst of the state
of siege, Prince Louis Bonaparte and the prisoner of Vincennes, the
Communist Raspail, were elected representatives of Paris.[84] The
bourgeoisie, however, elected the usurious moneychanger and Orléanist
Fould. From all sides at once, therefore, open declaration of war
against the Constituent National Assembly, against bourgeois
republicanism, against Cavaignac.

It needs no argument to show how the mass bankruptcy of the Paris petty
bourgeois was bound to produce aftereffects far transcending the circle
of its immediate victims, and to convulse bourgeois commerce once more,
while the state deficit was swollen anew by the costs of the June
insurrection, and state revenues sank continuously through the hold-up
of production, the restricted consumption, and the decreasing imports.
Cavaignac and the National Assembly could have recourse to no other
expedient than a new loan, which forced them still further under the
yoke of the finance aristocracy.

While the petty bourgeois had harvested bankruptcy and liquidation by
order of court as the fruit of the June victory, Cavaignac’s
Janisseries, the Mobile Guards, found their reward in the soft arms of
the courtesans, and as “the youthful saviors of society” they received
all kinds of homage in the salons of Marrast, the knight of the
tricolor, who served simultaneously as the Amphitryon and the troubadour
of the respectable republic. Meantime, this social favoritism and the
disproportionately higher pay of the Mobile Guard embittered the army,
while all those national illusions with which bourgeois republicanism,
through its journal, the National, had been able to attach to itself a
part of the army and peasant class under Louis Philippe vanished at the
same time. The role of mediator which Cavaignac and the National
Assembly played in North Italy in order, together with England, to
betray it to Austria – this one day of rule destroyed eighteen years of
opposition on the part of the National. No government was less national
than that of the National, none more dependent on England, and, under
Louis Philippe, the National lived by paraphrasing daily Cato’s dictum:
Carthaginem esse delendam [Carthage must be destroyed], none was more
servile toward the Holy Alliance, and from a Guizot the National had
demanded the tearing up of the Treaties of Vienna.[85] The irony of
history made Bastide, the ex-editor for foreign affairs of the National,
Minister of Foreign Affairs of France, so that he might refute every one
of his articles in every one of his dispatches.

For a moment, the army and the peasant class had believed that,
simultaneously with the military dictatorship, war abroad and gloire had
been placed on the order of the day in France. But Cavaignac was not the
dictatorship of the saber over bourgeois society; he was the
dictatorship of the bourgeoisie by the saber. And of the soldier they
now required only the gendarme. Under the stern features of
antique-republican resignation Cavaignac concealed humdrum submission to
the humiliating conditions of his bourgeois office. L’argent n’a pas de
maître! Money has no master! He, as well as the Constituent Assembly in
general, idealized this old election cry of the Third Estate by
translating it into political speech: The bourgeoisie has no king; the
true form of its rule is the republic.

And the “great organic work” of the Constituent National Assembly
consisted in working out this form, in producing a republican
constitution. The rechristening of the Christian calendar as a
republican one, of the saintly Bartholomew as the saintly Robespierre,
made no more change in the wind and weather than this constitution made
or was supposed to make in bourgeois society. Where it went beyond a
change of costume, it put on record the existing facts. Thus it solemnly
registered the fact of the republic, the fact of universal suffrage, the
fact of a single sovereign National Assembly in place of two limited
constitutional chambers. Thus it registered and regulated the fact of
the dictatorship of Cavaignac by replacing the stationary, irresponsible
hereditary monarchy with an ambulatory, responsible, elective monarchy,
with a quadrennial presidency. Thus it elevated no less to an organic
law the fact of the extraordinary powers with which the National
Assembly, after the horrors of May 15 and June 25, had prudently
invested its president in the interest of its own security. The
remainder of the constitution was a work of terminology. The royalist
labels were torn off the mechanism of the old monarchy and republican
labels stuck on. Marrast, former editor in chief of the National, now
editor in chief of the constitution, acquitted himself of this academic
task not without talent.

The Constituent Assembly resembled the Chilean official who wanted to
regulate property relations in land more firmly by a cadastral survey
just at the moment when subterranean rumblings announced the volcanic
eruption that was to hurl away the land from under his very feet. While
in theory it accurately marked off the forms in which the rule of the
bourgeoisie found republican expression, in reality it held its own only
by the abolition of all formulas, by force sans phrase [without any
exceptions], by the state of siege. Two days before it began its work on
the constitution, it proclaimed an extension of the state of siege.
Formerly constitutions had been made and adopted as soon as the social
process of revolution had reached a point of rest, the newly formed
class relationships had established themselves, and the contending
factions of the ruling class had had recourse to a compromise which
allowed them to continue the struggle among themselves and at the same
time to keep the exhausted masses of the people out of it. This
constitution, on the contrary, did not sanction any social revolution –
it sanctioned the momentary victory of the old society over the
revolution.

The first draft of the constitution,[86] made before the June days,
still contained the droit au travail, the right to work, the first
clumsy formula wherein the revolutionary demands of the proletariat are
summarized. It was transformed into the droit ŕ l’assistance, the right
to public relief, and what modern state does not feed its paupers in
some form or other? The right to work is, in the bourgeois sense, an
absurdity, a miserable, pious wish. But behind the right to work stands
the power over capital; behind the power over capital, the appropriation
of the means of production, their subjection to the associated working
class, and therefore the abolition of wage labor, of capital, and of
their mutual relations. Behind the “right to work” stood the June
insurrection. The Constituent Assembly, which in fact put the
revolutionary proletariat hors la loi, outside the law, had on principle
to throw the proletariat’s formula out of the constitution, the law of
laws; had to pronounce its anathema upon the “right to work.” But it did
not stop there. As Plato banned the poets from his republic, so it
banished forever from its republic the progressive tax. And the
progressive tax is not only a bourgeois measure, which can be carried
out within the existing relations of production to a greater or less
degree, it was the only means of binding the middle strata of bourgeois
society to the “respectable” republic, of reducing the state debt, of
holding the anti-republican majority of the bourgeoisie in check.

In the matter of the concordats ŕ l’amiable, the tricolor republicans
had actually sacrificed the petty bourgeoisie to the big bourgeoisie.
They elevated this isolated fact to a principle by the legal prohibition
of a progressive tax. They put bourgeois reform on the same level as
proletarian revolution. But what class then remained as the mainstay of
their republic? The big bourgeoisie. And its mass was anti-republican.
While it exploited the republicans of the National in order to
consolidate again the old relations of economic life, it thought, on the
other hand, of exploiting the once more consolidated social relations in
order to restore the political forms that corresponded to them. As early
as the beginning of October, Cavaignac felt compelled to make Dufaure
and Vivien, previously ministers of Louis Philippe, ministers of the
republic, however much the brainless puritans of his own party growled
and blustered.

While the tricolor constitution rejected every compromise with the petty
bourgeoisie and was unable to win the attachment of any new social
element to the new form of government, it hastened, on the other hand,
to restore its traditional inviolability to a body that constituted the
most hard–bitten and fanatical defender of the old state. It raised the
irremovability of judges, which had been questioned by the Provisional
Government, to an organic law. The one king whom it had removed rose
again, by the score, in these irremovable inquisitors of legality.

The French press has analyzed from numerous aspects the contradictions
of M. Marrast’s constitution, for example, the coexistence of two
sovereigns, the National Assembly and the President, etc., _etc._

The comprehensive contradiction of this constitution, however, consists
in the following: The classes whose social slavery the constitution is
to perpetuate – proletariat, peasantry, petty bourgeoisie – it puts in
possession of political power through universal suffrage. And from the
class whose old social power it sanctions, the bourgeoisie, it withdraws
the political guarantees of this power. It forces the political rule of
the bourgeoisie into democratic conditions, which at every moment help
the hostile classes to victory and jeopardize the very foundations of
bourgeois society. From the first group it demands that they should not
go forward from political to social emancipation; from the others that
they should not go back from social to political restoration.

These contradictions perturbed the bourgeois republicans little. To the
extent that they ceased to be indispensable – and they were
indispensable only as the protagonists of the old society against the
revolutionary proletariat – they fell, a few weeks after their victory,
from the position of a party to that of a coterie. And they treated the
constitution as a big intrigue. What was to be constituted in it was,
above all, the rule of the coterie. The President was to be a protracted
Cavaignac; the Legislative Assembly a protracted Constituent Assembly.
They hoped to reduce the political power of the masses of the people to
a semblance of power, and to be able to make sufficient play with this
sham power itself to keep continually hanging over the majority of the
bourgeoisie the dilemma of the June days: realm of the National or realm
of anarchy.

The work on the constitution, which was begun on September 4, was
finished on October 23. On September 2 the Constituent Assembly had
decided not to dissolve until the organic laws supplementing the
constitution were enacted. Nonetheless, it now decided to bring to life
the creation that was most peculiarly its own, the President, on
December 4, long before the circle of its own activity was closed. So
sure was it of hailing, in the homunculus of the constitution, the son
of his mother. As a precaution it was provided that if none of the
candidates received two million votes, the election should pass over
from the nation to the Constituent Assembly.

Futile provisions! The first day of the realization of the constitution
was the last day of the rule of the Constituent Assembly. In the abyss
of the ballot box lay its sentence of death. It sought the “son of his
mother” and found the “nephew of his uncle”. Saul Cavaignac slew one
million votes, but David Napoleon slew six million. Saul Cavaignac was
beaten six times over.

December 10, 1848, was the day of the peasant insurrection. Only from
this day does the February of the French peasants date. The symbol that
expressed their entry into the revolutionary movement, clumsily cunning,
knavishly naive, doltishly sublime, a calculated superstition, a
pathetic burlesque, a cleverly stupid anachronism, a world-historic
piece of buffoonery and an indecipherable hieroglyphic for the
understanding of the civilized – this symbol bore the unmistakable
physiognomy of the class that represents barbarism within civilization.
The republic had announced itself to this class with the tax collector;
it announced itself to the republic with the emperor. Napoleon was the
only man who had exhaustively represented the interests and the
imagination of the peasant class, newly created in 1789. By writing his
name on the frontispiece of the republic, it declared war abroad and the
enforcing of its class interests at home. Napoleon was to the peasants
not a person but a program. With banners, with beat of drums and blare
of trumpets, they marched to the polling booths shouting: Plus d’impôts,
ŕ bas les riches, ŕ bas la république, vive l’Empereur! No more taxes,
down with the rich, down with the republic, long live the emperor!
Behind the emperor was hidden the peasant war. The republic that they
voted down was the republic of the rich.

December 10 was the coup d’état of the peasants, which overthrew the
existing government. And from that day on, when they had taken a
government from France and given a government to her, their eyes were
fixed steadily on Paris. For a moment active heroes of the revolutionary
drama, they could no longer be forced back into the inactive and
spineless role of the chorus.

The other classes helped to complete the election victory of the
peasants. To the proletariat, the election of Napoleon meant the
deposition of Cavaignac, the overthrow of the Constituent Assembly, the
dismissal of bourgeois republicanism, the cessation of the June victory.
To the petty bourgeoisie, Napoleon meant the rule of the debtor over the
creditor. For the majority of the big bourgeoisie, the election of
Napoleon meant an open breach with the faction of which it had had to
make use, for a moment, against the revolution, but which became
intolerable to it as soon as this faction sought to consolidate the
position of the moment into a constitutional position. Napoleon in place
of Cavaignac meant to this majority the monarch, in place of the
republic, the beginning of the royalist restoration, a sly hint at
Orléans, the fleur-de-lis hidden beneath the violets.[87] Lastly, the
army voted for Napoleon against the Mobile Guard, against the peace
idyll, for war.

Thus it happened, as the Neue Rheinische Zeitung stated, that the most
simple-minded man in France acquired the most multifarious significance.
Just because he was nothing, he could signify everything save himself.
Meanwhile, different as the meaning of the name Napoleon might be in the
mouths of the different classes, with this name each wrote on his
ballot: Down with the party of the National, down with Caivaignac, down
with the Constituent Assembly, down with the bourgeois republic.
Minister Dufaure publicly declared in the Constituent Assembly: December
10 is a second February 24.

Petty bourgeoisie and proletariat had voted en bloc for Napoleon, in
order to vote against Cavaignac and, by pooling their votes, to wrest
the final decision from the Constituent Assembly. The more advanced
sections of the two classes, however, put forward their own candidates.
Napoleon was the collective name of all parties in coalition against the
bourgeois republic; Ledru-Rollin and Raspail were the proper names, the
former of the democratic petty bourgeoisie, the latter of the
revolutionary proletariat. The votes for Raspail – the proletarians and
their socialist spokesmen declared it loudly – were to be merely a
demonstration, so many protests against any presidency, that is, against
the constitution itself, so many votes against Ledru-Rollin, the first
act by which the proletariat, as an independent political party,
declared its separation from the democratic party. This party, on the
other hand – the democratic petty bourgeoisie and its parliamentary
representative, the Montagne[6] – treated the candidature of
Ledru-Rollin with all the seriousness with which it is in the habit of
solemnly duping itself. For the rest, this was its last attempt to set
itself up as an independent party, as against the proletariat. Not only
the republican bourgeois party, but also the democratic petty
bourgeoisie and its Montagne were beaten on December 10.

France now possessed a Napoleon side by side with a Montagne, proof that
both were only the lifeless caricatures of the great realities whose
names they bore. Louis Napoleon, with the emperor’s hat and the eagle,
parodied the old Napoleon no more miserably than the Montagne, with its
phrases borrowed from 1793 and its demagogic poses, parodied the old
Montagne. Thus the traditional 1793 superstition was stripped off at the
same time as the traditional Napoleon superstition. The revolution had
come into its own only when it had won its own, its original name, and
it could do that only when the modern revolutionary class, the
industrial proletariat, came dominatingly into its foreground. One can
say that December 10 dumbfounded the Montagne and caused it to grow
confused in its own mind, if for no other reason than because that day
laughingly cut short with a contemptuous peasant jest the classical
analogy to the old revolution.

On December 20 Cavaignac laid down his office and the Constituent
Assembly proclaimed Louis Napoleon President of the Republic, On
December 19, the last day of its sole rule, it rejected the proposal for
amnesty for the June insurgents. Would revoking the decree of June 27,
under which it had condemned 15,000 insurgents to deportation without
judicial sentence, not have meant revoking the June battle itself.

Odilon Barrot, the last minister of Louis Philippe, became the first
minister of Louis Napoleon. Just as Louis Napoleon dated his rule, not
from December 10, but from a decree of the Senate of 1804, so he found a
prime minister who did not date his ministry from December 20, but from
a royal decree of February 24.[88] As the legitimate heir of Louis
Philippe, Louis Napoleon mollified the change of government by retaining
the old ministry, which, moreover, had not had time to be worn out,
since it had not found time to embark upon life.

The leaders of the royalist bourgeois factions advised him in this
choice. The head of the old dynastic opposition, who had unconsciously
constituted the transition to the republicans of the National, was still
more fitted to constitute with full consciousness the transition from
the bourgeois republic to the monarchy.

Odilon Barrot was the leader of the one old opposition party which,
always fruitlessly struggling for ministerial portfolios, had not yet
been used up. In rapid succession the revolution hurled all the old
opposition parties to the top of the state, so that they would have to
deny, to repudiate their old phrases not only in deeds but even in
words, and might finally be flung all together, combined in a repulsive
commixture, on the dung heap of history by the people. And no apostasy
was spared this Barrot, this incarnation of bourgeois liberalism, who
for eighteen years had hidden the rascally vacuity of his mind behind
the serious demeanor of his body. If at certain moments the far too
striking contrast between the thistles of the present and the laurels of
the past startled the man himself, one glance in the mirror gave him
back his ministerial composure and human self-admiration. What beamed at
him from the mirror was Guizot, whom he had always envied, who had
always mastered him, Guizot himself, but Guizot with the Olympian
forehead of Odilon. What he overlooked were the ears of Midas.

The Barrot of February 24 first became manifest in the Barrot of
December 20. Associated with him, the Orléanist and Voltairean, was the
Legitimist and Jesuit Falloux, as Minister of Public Worship.

A few days later, the Ministry of Home Affairs was given to Léon
Faucher, the Malthusian. Law, religion, and political economy! The
ministry of Barrot contained all this and, in addition, a combination of
Legitimists and Orléanists. Only the Bonapartist was lacking. Bonaparte
still hid his longing to signify Napoleon, for Soulouque did not yet
play Toussaint Louverture.

The party of the National was immediately relieved of all the higher
posts, where it had entrenched itself. The prefecture of police, the
post-office directorship, the procuratorship general, the mairie
[mayor’s office] of Paris were all filled with old creatures of the
monarchy. Changarnier, the Legitimist, received the unified supreme
command of the National Guard of the Department of the Seine, of the
Mobile Guard and the troops of the line of the first military division;
Bugeaud, the Orléanist, was appointed commander in chief of the Alpine
Army. This change of officials continued uninterrupted under the Barrot
government. The first act of his ministry was the restoration of the old
royalist administration. The official scene was at once transformed –
scenery, costumes, speech, actors, supers, mutes, prompters, the
position of the parties, the theme of the drama, the content of the
conflict, the whole situation. Only the premundane Constituent Assembly
remained in its place. But from the hour when the National Assembly had
installed Bonaparte, Bonaparte Barrot, and Barrot Changarnier, France
stepped out of the period of republican constitution into the period of
the constituted republic. And what place was there for a Constituent
Assembly in a constituted republic? After the earth had been created,
there was nothing else for its creator to do but flee to heaven. The
Constituent Assembly was determined not to follow his example; the
National Assembly was the last asylum of the party of the bourgeois
republicans. If all levers of executive power had been wrested from it,
was there not left to it constituent omnipotence? Its first thought was
to hold under all circumstances the position of sovereignty it occupied,
and thence to reconquer the lost ground. Once the Barrot Ministry was
displaced by a ministry of the National, the royalist personnel would
have to vacate the palaces of the administration forthwith and the
tricolor personnel would triumphantly move in again. The National
Assembly resolved on the overthrow of the ministry and the ministry
itself offered an opportunity for the attack, a better one than the
Constituent Assembly itself could have invented.

It will be remembered that for the peasants Louis Bonaparte signified:
No more taxes! Six days he sat in the President’s chair, and on the
seventh, on December 27, his ministry proposed the retention of the salt
tax, whose abolition the Provisional Government had decreed. The salt
tax shares with the wine tax the privilege of being the scapegoat of the
old French financial system, particularly in the eyes of the country
folk. The Barrot Ministry could not have put into the mouth of the
peasants’ choice a more mordant epigram on his electors than the words:
Restoration of the salt tax! With the salt tax, Bonaparte lost his
revolutionary salt – the Napoleon of the peasant insurrection dissolved
like an apparition, and nothing remained but the great unknown of
royalist bourgeois intrigue. And not without intention did the Barrot
Ministry make this act of tactlessly rude disillusionment the first
governmental act of the President.

The Constituent Assembly, for its part, eagerly seized the double
opportunity of overthrowing the ministry and, as against the elected
choice of the peasantry, setting itself up as the representative of
peasant interests. It rejected the proposal of the finance minister,
reduced the salt tax to a third of its former amount, thus increasing by
sixty millions a state deficit of five hundred and sixty millions, and,
after this vote of no confidence, calmly awaited the resignation of the
ministry. So little did it comprehend the new world that surrounded it
and its own changed position. Behind the ministry stood the President
and behind the President stood six millions who had placed in the ballot
box as many votes of no confidence in the Constituent Assembly. The
Constituent Assembly gave the nation back its no-confidence vote. Absurd
exchange! It forgot that its votes were no longer legal tender. The
rejection of the salt tax only matured the decision of Bonaparte and his
ministry to finish the Constituent Assembly. There began that long duel
which lasted the entire latter half of the life of the Constituent
Assembly. January 29, March 31, and May 8 are the journées, the great
days of this crisis, just so many forerunners of June 13.

Frenchmen, for example Louis Blanc, have construed January 29 as the
date of the emergence of a constitutional contradiction, the
contradiction between a sovereign, indissoluble National Assembly born
of universal suffrage and a President who, to go by the wording, was
responsible to the Assembly, but who, to go by reality, was not only
similarly sanctioned by universal suffrage and in addition united in his
own person all the votes that were split up a hundred times and
distributed among the individual members of the National Assembly, but
who was also in full possession of the whole executive power, above
which the National Assembly hovered as a merely moral force. This
interpretation of January 29 confuses the language of the struggle on
the platform, through the press, and in the clubs with its real content.
Louis Bonaparte as against the Constituent National Assembly – that was
not one unilateral constitutional power as against another; that was not
the executive power as against the legislative. That was the constituted
bourgeois republic itself as against the intrigues and ideological
demands of the revolutionary faction of the bourgeoisie that had founded
it and was now amazed to find that its constituted republic looked like
a restored monarchy, and now desired forcibly to prolong the constituent
period with its conditions, its illusions, its language, and its
personages and to prevent the mature bourgeois republic from emerging in
its complete and peculiar form. As the Constituent National Assembly
represented Cavaignac, who had fallen back into its midst, so Bonaparte
represented the Legislative National Assembly that had not yet been
divorced from him, that is, the National Assembly of the constituted
bourgeois republic.

The election of Bonaparte could become explicable only, by putting in
the place of the one name its manifold meanings, by repeating itself in
the election of the new National Assembly. The mandate of the old was
annulled by December 10. Thus on January 29 it was not the President and
the National Assembly of the same republic that were face to face; it
was the National Assembly of the republic that was coming into being and
the President of the republic that had come into being, two powers that
embodied quite different periods in the life process of the republic;
the one, the small republican faction of the bourgeoisie that alone
could proclaim the republic, wrest it from the revolutionary proletariat
by street fighting and a reign of terror, and draft its ideal basic
features in the constitution; and the other, the whole royalist mass of
the bourgeoisie that alone could rule in this constituted bourgeois
republic, strip the constitution of its ideological trimmings, and
realize by its legislation and administration the indispensable
conditions for the subjugation of the proletariat.

The storm which broke on January 29 gathered its elements during the
whole month of January. The Constituent Assembly wanted to drive the
Barrot Ministry to resign by its no-confidence vote. The Barrot
Ministry, on the other hand, proposed to the Constituent Assembly that
it should give itself a definitive no-confidence vote, decide on
suicide, and decree its own dissolution. On January 6, Rateau, one of
the most obscure deputies, at the order of the ministry brought this
motion before the Constituent Assembly that in August had determined not
to dissolve until it had enacted a whole series of organic laws
supplementing the constitution. Fould, the ministerialist, bluntly
declared to it that its dissolution was necessary “for the restoration
of the deranged credit.” And did it not derange credit when it prolonged
the provisional stage and, with Barrot, again called Bonaparte in
question, and, with Bonaparte, the constituted republic Barrot the
Olympian became a raving Roland at the prospect of seeing the
premiership he had finally pocketed, which the republicans had already
withheld from him for ten months, again torn from him after scarcely two
weeks’ enjoyment of it. Barrot, confronting this wretched Assembly,
out–tyrannized the tyrant. His mildest words were, “No future is
possible with it.” And actually it did represent only the past. “It is
incapable,” he added ironically, “of providing the republic with the
institutions which are necessary for its consolidation.” Incapable
indeed! Its bourgeois energy was broken simultaneously with its
exceptional antagonism to the proletariat, and with its antagonism to
the royalists its republican exuberance lived anew. Thus it was doubly
incapable of consolidating the bourgeois republic, which it no longer
comprehended, by means of the corresponding institutions.

Simultaneously with Rateau’s motion the ministry evoked a storm of
petitions throughout the land, and from all corners of France came
flying daily at the head of the Constituent Assembly bundles of
billets-doux [love-letters] in which it was more or less categorically
requested to dissolve and make its will. The Constituent Assembly, on
its side, called forth counter-petitions in which it caused itself to be
requested to remain alive. The election struggle between Bonaparte and
Cavaignac was renewed as a petition struggle for and against the
dissolution of the National Assembly; the petitions were to be belated
commentaries on December 10. This agitation continued during the whole
of January.

In the conflict between the Constituent Assembly and the President, the
former could not refer back to the general election as its origin, for
the appeal was from the Assembly to universal suffrage. It could base
itself on no regularly constituted power, for the issue was the struggle
against the legal power. It could not overthrow the ministry by
no-confidence votes, as it again essayed to do on January 6 and 26, for
the ministry did not ask for its confidence. Only one possibility was
left to it, that of insurrection. The fighting forces of the
insurrection were the republican part of the National Guard, the Mobile
Guard, and the centers of the revolutionary proletariat, the clubs. The
Mobile Guard, those heroes of the June days, in December formed the
organized fighting force of the republican faction of the bourgeoisie,
just as before June the national ateliers had formed the organized
fighting force of the revolutionary proletariat. As the Executive
Commission of the Constituent Assembly directed its brutal attack on the
national ateliers, when it had to put an end to the now unbearable
pretensions of the proletariat, so the ministry of Bonaparte directed
its attack on the Mobile Guard, when it had to put an end to the now
unbearable pretensions of the republican faction of the bourgeoisie. It
ordered the disbanding of the Mobile Guard. One half of it was dismissed
and thrown on the street, the other was organized on monarchist instead
of democratic lines, and its pay was reduced to the usual pay of troops
of the line. The Mobile Guard found itself in the position of the June
insurgents and every day the press carried public confessions in which
it admitted its blame for June and implored the proletariat to forgive
it.

And the clubs? From the moment when the Constituent Assembly in the
person of Barrot called in question the President, and in the person of
the President the constituted bourgeois republic, and in the person of
the constituted bourgeois republic the bourgeois republic in general,
all the constituent elements of the February Republic necessarily ranged
themselves around it – all the parties that wished to overthrow the
existing republic and by a violent retrograde process to transform it
into a republic of their class interests and principles. The scrambled
eggs were unscrambled, the crystallisations of the revolutionary
movement had again become fluid, the republic that was being fought for
was again the indefinite republic of the February days, the defining of
which each party reserved to itself. For a moment the parties again took
up their old February positions, without sharing the illusions of
February. The tricolor republicans on the National again leaned on the
democratic republicans of the Réforme and pushed them as protagonists
into the foreground of the parliamentary struggle. The democratic
republicans again leaned on the socialist republicans – on January 27 a
public manifesto announced their reconciliation and union – and prepared
their insurrectional background in the clubs. The ministerial press
rightly treated the tricolor republicans of the National as the
resurrected insurgents of June. In order to maintain themselves at the
head of the bourgeois republic, they called in question the bourgeois
republic itself. On January 26 Minister Faucher proposed a law on the
right of association,[89] the first paragraph of which read: “Clubs are
forbidden.” He moved that this bill immediately be discussed as urgent.
The Constituent Assembly rejected the motion of urgency, and on January
27 Ledru-Rollin put forward a proposition, with 230 signatures appended
to it, to impeach the ministry for violation of the constitution. The
impeachment of the ministry at times when such an act was a tactless
disclosure of the impotence of the judge, to wit, the majority of the
Chamber, or an impotent protest of the accuser against this majority
itself – that was the great revolutionary trump that the latter-day
Montagne played from now on at each high spot of the crisis. Poor
Montagne! crushed by the weight of its own name!

On May 15 Blanqui, Barbčs, Raspall, etc., had attempted to break up the
Constituent Assembly by forcing an entrance into its hall at the head of
the Paris proletariat. Barrot prepared a moral May 15 for the same
Assembly when he wanted to dictate its self-dissolution and close the
hall. The same Assembly had commissioned Barrot to make the inquiry
against the May accused, and now, at the moment when he appeared before
it like a royalist Blanqui, when it sought for allies against him in the
clubs, among the revolutionary proletarians, in the party of Blanqui –
at this moment the relentless Barrot tormented it with the proposal to
withdraw the May prisoners from the Court of Assizes with its jury and
hand them over to the High Court, the haute cour devised by the party of
the National. Remarkable how wild fear for a ministerial portfolio could
pound out of the head of a Barrot points worthy of a Beaumarchais! After
much vacillation the National Assembly accepted his proposal. As against
the makers of the May attempt, it reverted to its normal character.

If the Constituent Assembly, as against the President and the ministers,
was driven to insurrection, the President and the ministers, as against
the Constituent Assembly, were driven to a coup d’etat, for they had no
legal means of dissolving it. But the Constituent Assembly was the
mother of the constitution and the constitution was the mother of the
President. With the coup d’etat the President tore up the constitution
and extinguished his republican legal title. He was then forced to pull
out his imperial legal title, but the imperial legal title woke up the
Orléanist legal title and both paled before the Legitimist legal title.
The downfall of the legal republic could shoot to the top only its
extreme antipode, the Legitimist monarchy, at a moment when the
Orléanist party was still only the vanquished of February and Bonaparte
was still only the victor of December 10, when both could oppose to
republican usurpation only their likewise usurped monarchist titles. The
Legitimists were aware of the propitiousness of the moment; they
conspired openly. They could hope to find their Monk[90] in General
Changarnier. The imminence of the white monarchy was as openly announced
in their clubs as was that of the red republic in the proletarian clubs.

The ministry would have escaped all difficulties by a happily suppressed
rising. “Legality is the death of us,” cried Odilon Barrot. A rising
would have allowed it, under the pretext of salut public [public
safety], to dissolve the Constituent Assembly, to violate the
constitution in the interests of the constitution itself. The brutal
behavior of Odilon Barrot in the National Assembly, the motion for the
dissolution of the clubs, the tumultuous removal of fifty tricolor
prefects and their replacement by royalists, the dissolution of the
Mobile Guard, the ill treatment of their chiefs by Changarnier, the
reinstatement of Lerminier, the professor who was impossible even under
Guizot, the toleration of the Legitimist braggadocio – all these were
just so many provocations to mutiny. But the mutiny remained mute. It
expected its signal from the Constituent Assembly and not from the
ministry.

Finally came January 29, the day the decision was to be taken on the
motion of Mathieu (de la Drôme) for unconditional rejection of Rateau’s
motion. Legitimists, Orléanists, Bonapartists, Mobile Guard, Montagne,
clubs – all conspired on this day, each just as much against the
ostensible enemy as against the ostensible ally. Bonaparte, on
horseback, mustered a part of the troops on the Place de la Concorde;
Changarnier play-acted with a display of strategic maneuvers; the
Constituent Assembly found its building occupied by the military. This
Assembly, the center of all the conflicting hopes, fears, expectations,
ferments, tensions, and conspiracies, this lionhearted Assembly did not
falter for a moment when it came nearer to the Weltgeist [world spirit]
than ever. It was like the fighter who not only feared to make use of
his own weapons but also felt himself obliged to maintain the weapons of
his opponent unimpaired. Scorning death, it signed its own death warrant
and rejected the unconditional rejection of the Rateau motion. Itself in
a state of siege, it set limits to a constituent activity whose
necessary frame had been the state of siege of Paris. It revenged itself
worthily when on the following day it instituted an inquiry into the
fright that the ministry had given it on January 29. In this great
comedy of intrigues the Montagne showed its lack of revolutionary energy
and political understanding by allowing itself to be used by the party
of the National as the crier in the contest. The party of the National
had made its last attempt to continue to maintain, in the constituted
republic, the monopoly of rule it had possessed during the inchoate
period of the bourgeois republic. It was shipwrecked.

While in the January crisis it was a question of the existence of the
Constituent Assembly, in the crisis of March 21 it was a question of the
existence of the constitution – there of the personnel of the National
party, here of its ideal. There is no need to point out that the
respectable republicans surrendered the exaltation of their ideology
more cheaply than the worldly enjoyment of governmental power.

On March 21 Faucher’s bill against the right of association: the
suppression of the clubs was on the order of the day in the National
Assembly. Article 8 of the constitution guarantees to all Frenchmen the
right to associate. The prohibition of the clubs was therefore an
unequivocal violation of the constitution, and the Constituent Assembly
itself was to canonize the profanation of its holy of holies. But the
clubs – these were the gathering points, the conspiratorial seats of the
revolutionary proletariat. The National Assembly had itself forbidden
the coalition of the workers against its bourgeois. And the clubs – what
were they but a coalition of the whole working class against the whole
bourgeois class, the formation of a workers’ state against the bourgeois
state? Were they not just so many constituent assemblies of the
proletariat and just so many military detachments of revolt in fighting
trim – what the constitution was to constitute above all else was the
rule of the bourgeoisie. By the right of association the constitution,
therefore, could manifestly mean only associations that harmonized with
the rule of the bourgeoisie, that is, with bourgeois order. If for
reasons of theoretical propriety it expressed itself in general terms,
were not the government and the National Assembly there to interpret and
apply it in a special case? And if in the primeval epoch of the republic
the clubs actually were forbidden by the state of siege, had they not to
be forbidden in the ordered, constituted republic by the law? The
tricolor republicans had nothing to oppose to this prosaic
interpretation of the constitution but the high-flown phraseology of the
constitution. A section of them, Pagnerre, Duclerc, etc., voted for the
ministry and thereby gave it a majority. The others, with the archangel
Cavaignac and the father of the church Marrast at their head, retired,
after the article on the prohibition of the clubs had gone through, to a
special committee room, jointly with Ledru-Rollin and the Montagne –
“and held a council.” The National Assembly was paralyzed; it no longer
had a quorum. At the right time, M. Crémieux remembered in the committee
room that the way from here led directly to the street and that it was
no longer February, 1848, but March, 1849. The party of the National,
suddenly enlightened, returned to the National Assembly’s hall of
session, behind it the Montagne, duped once more. The latter, constantly
tormented by revolutionary longings, just as constantly clutched at
constitutional possibilities, and still felt itself more in place behind
the bourgeois republicans than in front of the revolutionary
proletariat. Thus the comedy was played. And the Constituent Assembly
itself had decreed that the violation of the letter of the constitution
was the only appropriate realization of its spirit.

There was only one point left to settle, the relation of the constituted
republic to the European revolution, its foreign policy. On May 8, 1849,
unwonted excitement prevailed in the Constituent Assembly, whose term of
life was due to end in a few days. The attack of the French army on
Rome, its repulse by the Romans,[91] its political infamy and military
disgrace, the foul assassination of the Roman republic by the French
republic – the first Italian campaign of the second Bonaparte – was on
the order of the day. The Montagne had once more played its great trump;
Ledru-Rollin had laid on the President’s table the inevitable bill of
impeachment against the ministry, and this time also against Bonaparte,
for violation of the constitution.

The motive of May 8 was repeated later as the motive of June 13. Let us
get clear about the expedition to Rome.

As early as the middle of November, 1848, Cavaignac had sent a battle
fleet to Civita Vecchia in order to protect the Pope, to take him on
board and ship him over to France. The Pope was to consecrate the
respectable republic, and to insure the election of Cavaignac as
President. With the Pope, Cavaignac wanted to angle for the priests,
with the priests for the peasants, and with the peasants for the
presidency. The expedition of Cavaignac, an election advertisement in
its immediate purpose, was at the same time a protest and a threat
against the Roman revolution. It contained in embryo France’s
intervention in favor of the Pope.

This intervention on behalf of the Pope, in association with Austria and
Naples against the Roman republic, was decided at the first meeting of
Bonaparte’s ministerial council, on December 23. Falloux in the ministry
– that meant the Pope in Rome – and in the Rome of the Pope. Bonaparte
no longer needed the Pope in order to become the President of the
peasants; but he needed the conservation of the Pope in order to
conserve the peasants of the President. Their credulity had made him
President. With faith they would lose credulity, and with the Pope,
faith. And the Orléanists and Legitimists in coalition, who ruled in
Bonaparte’s name! Before the king was restored, the power that
consecrates kings had to be restored. Apart from their royalism: without
the old Rome, subject to his temporal rule, no Pope; without the Pope,
no Catholicism; without Catholicism, no French religion, and without
religion, what would become of the old French society? The mortgage the
peasant has on heavenly possessions guarantees the mortgage the
bourgeois has on peasant possessions. The Roman revolution was therefore
an attack on property, on the bourgeois order, dreadful as the June
Revolution. Reestablished bourgeois rule in France required the
restoration of papal rule in Rome. Finally, to smite the Roman
revolutionists was to smite the allies of the French revolutionists; the
alliance of the counterrevolutionary classes in the constituted French
republic was necessarily supplemented by the alliance of the French
republic with the Holy Alliance, with Naples and Austria.

The decision of the ministerial council on December 23 was no secret to
the Constituent Assembly. On January 8 Ledru-Rollin had interpellated
the ministry about it; the ministry had denied it and the National
Assembly had proceeded to the order of the day. Did it trust the word of
the ministry? We know it spent the whole month of January giving the
ministry no-confidence votes. But if it was part of the ministry’s role
to lie, it was part of the National Assembly’s role to feign belief in
its lie and thereby save republican dehors [face].

Meanwhile Piedmont was beaten, Charles-Albert had abdicated, and the
Austrian army knocked at the gates of France.[92] Ledru-Rollin
vehemently interpellated. The ministry proved that it had only continued
in North Italy the policy of Cavaignac and Cavaignac only the policy of
the Provisional Government, that is, of Ledru-Rollin. This time it even
reaped a vote of confidence from the National Assembly and was
authorized to occupy temporarily a suitable point in Upper Italy to give
support to peaceful negotiations with Austria concerning the integrity
of Sardinian territory and the question of Rome. It is known that the
fate of Italy is decided on the battlefields of North Italy. Hence Rome
would fall with Lombardy and Piedmont, or France would have to declare
war on Austria and thereby on the European counterrevolution. Did the
National Assembly suddenly take the Barrot Ministry for the old
Committee of Public Safety?[93] Or itself for the Convention? Why, then,
the military occupation of a point in Upper Italy? This transparent veil
covered the expedition against Rome.

On April 14, 14,000 men sailed under Oudinot for Civita Vecchia; on
April 16 the National Assembly voted the ministry a credit Of 1,200,000
francs for the maintenance of a fleet of intervention in the
Mediterranean Sea for three months. Thus it gave the ministry every
means of intervening against Rome, while it adopted the pose of letting
it intervene against Austria. It did not see what the ministry did; it
only heard what it said. Such faith was not found in Israel; the
Constituent Assembly had fallen into the position of not daring to know
what the constituted republic had to do.

Finally, on May 8, the last scene of the comedy was played; the
Constituent Assembly urged the ministry to take swift measures to bring
the Italian expedition back to the aim set for it. Bonaparte that same
evening inserted a letter in the Moniteur in which he lavished the
greatest appreciation on Oudinot. On May 11 the National Assembly
rejected the bill of impeachment against this same Bonaparte and his
ministry. And the Montagne, which instead of tearing this web of deceit
to pieces took the parliamentary comedy tragically in order to play in
it the role of Fouquier-Tinville, did not betray its natural petty
bourgeois calf’s hide under the borrowed lion’s skin of the Convention!

The latter half of the life of the Constituent Assembly is summarized
thus: on January 29 it admits that the royalist bourgeois factions are
the natural superiors of the republic constituted by it; on March 21,
that the violation of the constitution is its realization; and on May
11, that the bombastically proclaimed passive alliance of the French
republic with the struggling peoples means its active alliance with the
European counterrevolution.

This miserable Assembly left the stage after it had given itself the
satisfaction, two days before its first birthday, May 4, of rejecting
the motion of amnesty for the June insurgents. Its power shattered, held
in deadly hatred by the people, repulsed, maltreated, contemptuously
thrown aside by the bourgeoisie, whose tool it was, forced in the second
half of its life to disavow the first, robbed of its republican
illusions, without having created anything great in the past, without
hope in the future, and with its living body dying bit by bit, it was
able to galvanize its own corpse into life only by continually recalling
and living through the June victory over and over again, affirming
itself by constantly repeated damnation of the damned. A vampire living
on the blood of the June insurgents!

It left behind a state deficit increased by the costs of the June
insurrection, by the loss of the salt tax, by the compensation it paid
the plantation owners for abolishing Negro slavery, by the costs of the
Roman expedition, by the loss of the wine tax, whose abolition it
resolved upon when already at its last gasp – a malicious old man, happy
to impose on his laughing heir a compromising debt of honor.

With the beginning of March the agitation for the election of the
Legislative National Assembly had commenced. Two main groups opposed
each other, the party of Order and the democratic socialist, or Red,
party; between the two stood the Friends of the Constitution, under
which name the tricolor republicans of the National sought to put
forward a party. The party of Order was formed directly after the June
days; only after December 10 had allowed it to cast off the coterie of
the National, of the bourgeois republicans, was the secret of its
existence, the coalition of Orléanists and Legitimists into one party,
disclosed. The bourgeois class fell apart into two big factions which
alternately – the big landed proprietors under the restored monarchy and
the finance aristocracy and the industrial bourgeoisie under the July
Monarchy – had maintained a monopoly of power. Bourbon was the royal
name for the predominant influence of the interests of the one faction,
Orléans the royal name for the predominant influence of the interests of
the other faction – the nameless realm of the republic was the only one
in which both factions could maintain with equal power the common class
interest without giving up their mutual rivalry. If the bourgeois
republic could not be anything but the perfected and clearly expressed
rule of the whole bourgeois class, could it be anything but the rule of
the Orléanists supplemented by the Legitimists, and of the Legitimists
supplemented by the Orléanists, the synthesis of the Restoration and the
July Monarchy. The bourgeois republicans of the National did not
represent any large faction of their class resting on economic
foundations. They possessed only the importance and the historical claim
of having asserted, under the monarchy, as against the two bourgeois
factions that understood only their particular regime, the general
regime of the bourgeois class, the nameless realm of the republic, which
they idealized and embellished with antique arabesques, but in which
above all they hailed the rule of their coterie. If the party of the
National grew confused in its own mind when it descried the royalists in
coalition at the top of the republic founded by it, these royalists
deceived themselves no less concerning the fact of their united rule.
They did not comprehend that if each of their factions, regarded
separately, by itself, was royalist, the product of their chemical
combination had necessarily to be republican, that the white and the
blue monarchy had to neutralize each other in the tricolor republic.
Forced by antagonism to the revolutionary proletariat and the transition
classes thronging more and more around it as their center to summon
their united strength and to conserve the organization of this united
strength, each faction of the party of Order had to assert, as against
the desire for restoration and the overweening presumption of the other,
their joint rule, that is, the republican form of bourgeois rule. Thus
we find these royalists in the beginning believing in an immediate
restoration, later preserving the republican form with foaming rage and
deadly invective against it on their lips, and finally confessing that
they can endure each other only in the republic and postponing the
restoration indefinitely. The enjoyment of the united rule itself
strengthened each of the two factions, and made each of them still more
unable and unwilling to subordinate itself to the other, that is, to
restore the monarchy.

The party of Order directly proclaimed in its election program the rule
of the bourgeois class, that is, the preservation of the life conditions
of its rule: property, family, religion, order! Naturally it represented
its class rule and the conditions of its class rule as the rule of
civilization and as the necessary conditions of material production as
well as of the relations of social intercourse arising from it. The
party of Order had enormous money and resources at its command; it
organized its branches throughout France – it had all the ideologists of
the old society in its pay – it had the influence of the existing
governmental power at its disposal; it possessed an army of unpaid
vassals in the whole mass of petty bourgeois and peasants, who, still
removed from the revolutionary movement, found in the high dignitaries
of property the natural representatives of their petty prejudices. This
party, represented throughout the country by countless petty kings,
could punish the rejection of their candidates as insurrection, dismiss
the rebellious workers, the recalcitrant farm hands, domestic servants,
clerks, railway officials, copyists, all the functionaries civilly
subordinate to it. Finally, here and there it could maintain the
delusion that the republican Constituent Assembly had prevented the
Bonaparte of December 10 from manifesting his wonderworking powers. We
have not mentioned the Bonapartists in connection with the party of
Order. They were not a serious faction of the bourgeois class, but a
collection of old, superstitious invalids and young, unbelieving
soldiers of fortune. The party of Order was victorious in the elections;
it sent a large majority to the Legislative Assembly.

As against the coalesced counterrevolutionary bourgeois class, the
sections of the petty bourgeoisie and peasant class already
revolutionized naturally had to ally themselves with the high dignitary
of revolutionary interests, the revolutionary proletariat. We have seen
how the democratic spokesmen of the petty bourgeoisie in parliament,
that is, the Montagne, were driven by parliamentary defeats to the
socialist spokesmen of the proletariat, and how the actual petty
bourgeoisie, outside of parliament, was driven by the concordats ŕ
l’amiable [friendly agreements], by the brutal enforcement of bourgeois
interests, and by bankruptcy to the actual proletarians. On January 27
Montagne and the socialists had celebrated their reconciliation; at the
great banquet of February, 1849, they repeated their act of union. The
social and the democratic party, the party of the workers and that of
the petty bourgeois, united to form the Social-Democratic party, that
is, the Red party.

Paralyzed for a moment by the agony that followed the June days, the
French republic had lived through a continuous series of feverish
excitements since the raising of the state of siege, since October 14.
First the struggle for the presidency, then the struggle between the
President and the Constituent Assembly; the struggle for the clubs; the
trial of Bourges which, in contrast with the petty figures of the
President, the coalesced royalists, the respectable republicans, the
democratic Montagne, and the socialist doctrines of the proletariat,
caused the proletariat’s real revolutionists to appear as primordial
monsters such as only a deluge leaves behind on the surface of society,
or such as could only precede a social deluge; the election agitation;
the execution of the Bréa murderers;[95] the continual proceedings
against the press; the violent interference of the government with the
banquets by police action; the insolent royalist provocations; the
exhibition of the portraits of Louis Blanc and Caussidičre on the
pillory; the unbroken struggle between the constituted republic and the
Constituent Assembly, which each moment drove the revolution back to its
starting point, which each moment made the victors the vanquished and
the vanquished the victors and in an instant changed around the
positions of the parties and the classes, their separations and
connections; the rapid march of the European counterrevolution; the
glorious Hungarian fight; the armed uprisings in Germany;[96] the Roman
expedition; the ignominious defeat of the French army before Rome – in
this vortex of the movement, in this torment of historical unrest, in
this dramatic ebb and flow of revolutionary passions, hopes, and
disappointments, the different classes of French society had to count
their epochs of development in weeks when they had previously counted
them in half-centuries. A considerable part of the peasants and of the
provinces was revolutionized. Not only were they disappointed in
Napoleon, but the Red party offered them, instead of the name, the
content, instead of illusory freedom from taxation, repayment of the
milliard paid to the Legitimists, the adjustment of mortgages, and the
abolition of usury.

The army itself was infected with the revolutionary fever. In voting for
Bonaparte it had voted for victory, and he gave it defeat. In him it had
voted for the Little Corporal [Napoleon] behind whom the great
revolutionary general is concealed, and he once more gave it the great
generals behind whom the pipe-clay corporal shelters himself. There was
no doubt that the Red party, that is, the coalesced democratic party,
was bound to celebrate, if not victory, still, great triumphs; that
Paris, the army, and a great part of the provinces would vote for it.
Ledru-Rollin, the leader of the Montagne, was elected by five
departments; no leader of the party of Order carried off such a victory,
no candidate belonging to the proletarian party proper. This election
reveals to us the secret of the democratic-socialist party. If, on the
one hand, the Montagne, the parliamentary champion of the democratic
petty bourgeoisie, was forced to unite with the socialist doctrinaires
of the proletariat – the proletariat, forced by the terrible material
defeat of June to raise itself up again through intellectual victories
and not yet enabled through the development of the remaining classes to
seize the revolutionary dictatorship, had to throw itself into the arms
of the doctrinaires of its emancipation, the founders of socialist sects
– the revolutionary peasants, the army, and the provinces, on the other
hand, ranged themselves behind the Montagne, which thus became lord and
master in the revolutionary army camp and through the understanding with
the socialists eliminated every antagonism in the revolutionary party.
In the latter half of the life of the Constituent Assembly it
represented the Assembly’s republican fervor and caused to be buried in
oblivion its sins during the Provisional Government, during the
Executive Commission, during the June days. In the same measure as the
party of the National, in accordance with its half-and-half nature, had
allowed itself to be put down by the royalist ministry, the party of the
Mountain, which had been brushed aside during the omnipotence of the
National, rose and asserted itself as the parliamentary representative
of the revolution. In fact, the party of the National had nothing to
oppose to the other, royalist factions but ambitious personalities and
idealistic humbug. The party of the Mountain, on the contrary,
represented a mass hovering between the bourgeoisie and the proletariat,
a mass whose material interests demanded democratic institutions. In
comparison with the Cavaignacs and the Marrasts, Ledru-Rollin and the
Montagne, therefore, represented the true revolution, and from the
consciousness of this important situation they drew the greater courage
the more the expression of revolutionary energy limited itself to
parliamentary attacks, bringing in bills of impeachment, threats, raised
voices, thundering speeches, and extremes which were pushed only as far
as phrases. The peasants were in about the same position as the petty
bourgeoisie; they had more or less the same social demands to put
forward. All the middle strata of society, so far as they were driven
into the revolutionary movement, were therefore bound to find their hero
in Ledru-Rollin. Ledru-Rollin was the personage of the democratic petty
bourgeoisie. As against the party of Order, the half-conservative,
half-revolutionary, and wholly utopian reformers of this order had first
to be pushed to the forefront.

The party of the National, “the Friends of the Constitution quand męme
[as is],” the républicains purs et simples [republicans pure and
simple], were completely defeated in the elections. A tiny minority of
them was sent into the Legislative Chamber; their most noted leaders
vanished from the stage, even Marrast, the editor in chief and the
Orpheus of the respectable republic.

On May 28 the Legislative Assembly convened; on June 11 the collision of
May 8 was renewed and, in the name of the Montagne, Ledru-Rollin brought
in a bill of impeachment against the President and the ministry for
violation of the constitution, for the bombardment of Rome. On June 12
the Legislative Assembly rejected the bill of impeachment, just as the
Constituent Assembly had rejected it on May 11, but the proletariat this
time drove the Montagne onto the streets – not to a street battle,
however, but only to a street procession. It is enough to say that the
Montagne was at the head of this movement to know that the movement was
defeated, and that June, 1849, was a caricature, as ridiculous as it was
vile, of June, 1848. The great retreat of June 13 was eclipsed only by
the still greater battle report of Changarnier, the great man that the
party of Order improvised. Every social epoch needs its great men, and
when it does not find them, it invents them, as Helvétius says.

On December 20 only one half of the constituted bourgeois republic was
in existence: the President; on May 28 it was completed by the other
half, the Legislative Assembly. In June, 1848, the constituent bourgeois
republic, by an unspeakable battle against the proletariat, and in June,
1849, the constituted bourgeois republic, by an unutterable comedy with
the petty bourgeoisie, engraved their names in the birth register of
history. June, 1849, was the nemesis of June, 1848. In June, 1849, it
was not the workers that were vanquished; it was the petty bourgeois,
who stood between them and the revolution, that were felled. June, I849,
was not a bloody tragedy between wage labor and capital, but a
prison-filling and lamentable play of debtors and creditors. The party
of Order had won, it was all-powerful; it had now to show what it was.

 

Notes

6. The Jacobins, who sat in the “Montagne,” or raised seats at the back,
in the French National Convention, which met in Paris in September,
1792.

 

Contents | Part III: Consequences of June 13, 1849 | Marx/Engels Archive

The Class Struggles in France, 1848 to 1850


Part III

Consequences of June 13, 1849

On December 20 the Janus head of the constitutional republic had still
shown only one face, the executive face with the indistinct, plain
features of L. Bonaparte; on May 28, 1849, it showed its second face,
the legislative, pitted with the scars that the orgies of the
Restoration and the July Monarchy had left behind. With the Legislative
National Assembly the phenomenon of the constitutional republic was
completed, that is, the republican form of government in which the rule
of the bourgeois class is constituted, the common rule, therefore, of
the two great royalist factions that form the French bourgeoisie, the
coalesced Legitimists and Orléanists, theparty of Order. While the
French republic thus became the property of the coalition of the
royalist parties, the European coalition of the counterrevolutionary
powers embarked simultaneously upon a general crusade against the last
places of refuge of the March revolutions. Russia invaded Hungary,
Prussia marched against the army defending the Reich constitution and
Oudinot bombarded Rome. The European crisis was evidently approaching a
decisive turning point; the eyes of all Europe were turned on Paris, and
the eyes of all Paris on the Legislative Assembly.

On June 11 Ledru-Rollin mounted its tribune. He made no speech; he
formulated an indictment of the ministers, naked, unadorned, factual,
concentrated, forceful.

The attack on Rome is an attack on the constitution; the attack on the
Roman republic is an attack on the French republic. Article 5 of the
constitution[98] reads: “The French republic never employs its forces
against the liberty of any people whatsoever” – and the President
employs the French army against Roman liberty. Article 54 Of the
constitution forbids the executive power to declare any war whatsoever
without the consent of the National Assembly. The Constituent Assembly’s
resolution of May 8 expressly commands the ministers to make the Rome
expedition conform with the utmost speed to its original mission; it
therefore just as expressly prohibits war on Rome – and Oudinot bombards
Rome. Thus Ledru-Rollin called the constitution itself as a witness for
the prosecution against Bonaparte and his ministers. At the royalist
majority of the National Assembly, he, the tribune of the constitution,
hurled the threatening declaration: “The republicans will know how to
command respect for the constitution by every means, be it even by force
of arms!” “By force of arms!” came the hundredfold echo of the Montagne.
The majority answered with a terrible tumult; the President of the
National Assembly called Ledru-Rollin to order – Ledru-Rollin repeated
the challenge, and finally laid on the President’s table a motion for
the impeachment of Bonaparte and his ministers. By 361 votes to 203, the
National Assembly resolved to pass on from the bombardment of Rome to
the next item on the agenda.

Did Ledru-Rollin believe he could beat the National Assembly by means of
the constitution, and the President by means of the National Assembly?

To be sure, the constitution forbade any attack on the liberty of
foreign peoples, but what the French army attacked in Rome was,
according to the ministry, not “liberty” but the “despotism of anarchy.”
Had the Montagne still not comprehended, all experiences in the
Constituent Assembly notwithstanding, that the interpretation of the
constitution did not belong to those who had made it, but only to those
who had accepted it? That its wording must be construed in its viable
meaning and that the bourgeois meaning was its only viable meaning That
Bonaparte and the royalist majority of the National Assembly were the
authentic interpreters of the constitution, as the priest is the
authentic interpreter of the Bible, and the judge the authentic
interpreter of the laws Should the National Assembly, freshly emerged
from the general elections, feel itself bound by the testamentary
provisions of the dead Constituent Assembly, whose will an Odilon Barrot
had broken while it was alive? When Ledru-Rollin cited the Constituent
Assembly’s resolution of May 8, had he forgotten that the same
Constituent Assembly on May 11 had rejected his first motion for the
impeachment of Bonaparte and the ministers; that it had acquitted the
President and the ministers; that it had thus sanctioned the attack on
Rome as “constitutional”; that he only lodged an appeal against a
judgment already delivered – that he, lastly, appealed from the
republican Constituent Assembly to the royalist Legislative Assembly?
The constitution itself calls insurrection to its aid by summoning, in a
special article, every citizen to protect it. Ledru-Rollin based himself
on this article. But at the same time, are not the public authorities
organized for the defense of the constitution, and does not the
violation of the constitution begin only from the moment when one of the
constitutional public authorities rebels against the other? And the
President of the republic, the ministers of the republic, and the
National Assembly of the republic were in the most harmonious agreement.

What the Montagne attempted on June 11 was “an insurrection within the
limits of pure reason,” that is, a purely parliamentary insurrection.
The majority of the Assembly, intimidated by the prospect of an armed
rising of the popular masses, was, in Bonaparte and the ministers, to
destroy its own power and the significance of its own election. Had not
the Constituent Assembly similarly attempted to annul the election of
Bonaparte, when it insisted so obstinately on the dismissal of the
Barrot-Falloux Ministry?

Neither were there lacking from the time of the Convention models for
parliamentary insurrections which had suddenly transformed completely
the relation between the majority and the minority – and should the
young Montagne not succeed where the old had succeeded? – nor did
relations at the moment seem unfavorable for such an undertaking.
Popular unrest in Paris had reached an alarmingly high point – the army,
according to its vote at the election, did not seem favorably inclined
toward the government; the legislative majority itself was still too
young to have become consolidated, and in addition it consisted of old
gentlemen. If the Montagne were successful in a parliamentary
insurrection, the helm of state would fall directly into its hands. The
democratic petty bourgeoisie, for its part, wished, as always, for
nothing more fervently than to see the battle fought out in the clouds
over its head between the departed spirits of parliament. Finally, both
of them, the democratic petty bourgeoisie and its representatives, the
Montagne, would, through a parliamentary insurrection, achieve their
great purpose, that of breaking the power of the bourgeoisie without
unleashing the proletariat or letting it appear otherwise than in
perspective; the proletariat would have been used without becoming
dangerous.

After the vote of the National Assembly on June 11, a conference took
place between some members of the Montagne and delegates of the secret
workers’ societies. The latter urged that the attack be started the same
evening. The Montagne decisively rejected this plan. On no account did
it want to let the leadership slip out of its hands; its allies were as
suspect to it as its antagonists, and rightly so. The memory of June,
1848, surged through the ranks of the Paris proletariat more vigorously
than ever. Nevertheless it was chained to the alliance with the
Montagne. The latter represented the largest part of the departments –
it had increased its influence in the army; it had at its disposal the
democratic section of the National Guard; it had the moral power of the
shopkeepers behind it. To begin the revolution at this moment against
the will of the Montagne would have meant for the proletariat, decimated
moreover by cholera and driven out of Paris in considerable numbers by
unemployment, to repeat uselessly the June days of 1848, without the
situation which had forced this desperate struggle. The proletarian
delegates did the only rational thing. They obligated the Montagne to
compromise itself, that is, to come out beyond the confines of the
parliamentary struggle, in the event that its bill of impeachment was
rejected. During the whole of June 13 the proletariat maintained this
same skeptically watchful attitude, and awaited a seriously engaged
irrevocable melee between the democratic National Guard and the army, in
order then to plunge into the fight and push the revolution forward
beyond the petty bourgeois aim set for it. In the event of victory a
proletarian commune was already formed which would take its place beside
the official government. The Parisian workers had learned in the bloody
school of June, 1848.

On June 12 Minister Lacrosse himself brought forward in the Legislative
Assembly the motion to proceed at once to the discussion of the bill of
impeachment. During the night the government had made every provision
for defense and attack; the majority of the National Assembly was
determined to drive the rebellious minority out into the streets; the
minority itself could no longer retreat; the die was cast; the bill of
impeachment was rejected by 377 votes to 8. The “Mountain,” which had
abstained from voting, rushed resentfully into the propaganda halls of
the “pacific democracy,” the newspaper offices of the Démocratie
Pacifique.[99]

Its withdrawal from the parliament building broke its strength as
withdrawal from the earth broke the strength of Antaeus, her giant son.
Samsons in the precincts of the Legislative Assembly, the Montagnards
were only Philistines in the precincts of the “pacific democracy.” A
long, noisy, rambling debate ensued. The Montagne was determined to
compel respect for the constitution by every means, “only not by force
of arms.” In this decision it was supported by a manifesto[100] and by a
deputation of “Friends of the Constitution.” “Friends of the
Constitution” was what the wreckage of the coterie of the National, the
bourgeois-republican party, called itself. While six of its remaining
parliamentary representatives had voted against, the others in a body
voting for, the rejection of the bill of impeachment, while Cavaignac
placed his saber at the disposal of the party of Order, the larger,
extra-parliamentary part of the coterie greedily seized the opportunity
to emerge from its position of a political pariah and to press into the
ranks of the democratic party. Did they not appear as the natural shield
bearers of this party, which hid itself behind their shield, behind
their principles, behind the constitution?

Till break of day the “Mountain” was in labor. It gave birth to “a
proclamation to the people,” which on the morning of June occupied a
more or less shamefaced place in two socialist journals.[101] It
declared the President, the ministers, and the majority of the
Legislative Assembly “outside the constitution” and summoned the
National Guard, the army, and finally also the people “to arise.” “Long
live the Constitution!” was the slogan it put forward, a slogan that
signified nothing other than “Down with the revolution!”

In conformity with the constitutional proclamation of the Mountain,
there was a so-called peaceful demonstration of the petty bourgeois on
June 13, that is, a street procession from the Chateau d’Eau through the
Boulevards, 30,000 strong, mainly National Guardsmen, unarmed, with an
admixture of members of the secret workers’ sections, moving along with
the cry: “Long live the Constitution!” which was uttered mechanically,
icily, and with a bad conscience by the members of the procession
itself, and thrown back ironically by the echo of the people that surged
along the sidewalks, instead of swelling up like thunder. From the
many-voiced song the chest notes were missing. And when the procession
swung by the meeting hall of the “Friends of the Constitution” and a
hired herald of the constitution appeared on the housetop, violently
cleaving the air with his claquer hat and from tremendous lungs letting
the catch – cry “Long live the Constitution!” fall like hail on the
heads of the pilgrims, they themselves seemed overcome for a moment by
the comedy of the situation. It is known how the procession, having
arrived at the termination of the Rue de la Paix, was received in the
Boulevards by the dragoons and chasseurs of Changarnier in an altogether
unparliamentary way, how in a trice it scattered in all directions, and
how it threw behind it a few shouts of “To arms” only in order that the
parliamentary call to arms of June 11 might be fulfilled.

The majority of the Montagne assembled in the Rue du Hasard scattered
when this violent dispersion of the peaceful procession, the muffled
rumors of murder of unarmed citizens on the Boulevards, and the growing
tumult in the streets seemed to herald the approach of a
rising.Ledru-Rollin at the head of a small band of deputies saved the
honor of the Mountain. Under the protection of the Paris Artillery,
which had assembled in the Palais National, they betook themselves to
the Conservatoire des Arts et Métiers [Museum of arts and trades, an
educational institution in Paris], where the fifth and sixth legions of
the National Guard were to arrive. But the Montagnards waited in vain
for the fifth and sixth legions; these discreet National Guards left
their representatives in the lurch; the Paris Artillery itself prevented
the people from throwing up barricades; chaotic disorder made any
decision impossible; the troops of the line advanced with fixed
bayonets; some of the representatives were taken prisoner, while others
escaped. Thus ended June 13.

If June 23, 1848, was the insurrection of the revolutionary proletariat,
June 13, I849, was the insurrection of the democratic petty bourgeois,
each of these two insurrections being the classically pure expression of
the class which had been its vehicle.

Only in Lyons did it come to an obstinate, bloody conflict.[102] Here,
where the industrial bourgeoisie and the industrial proletariat stand
directly opposed to one another, where the workers’ movement is not, as
in Paris, included in and determined by the general movement, June 13,
in its repercussion, lost its original character. Wherever else it broke
out in the provinces it did not kindle fire – acold lightning flash.

June 13 closes the first period in the life of the constitutional
republic, which had attained its normal existence on May 28, 1849, with
the meeting of the Legislative Assembly. The whole period of this
prologue is filled with vociferous struggle between the party of Order
and the Montagne, between the big bourgeoisie and the petty bourgeoisie,
which strove in vain against the consolidation of the bourgeois
republic, for which it had itself continuously conspired in the
Provisional Government and in the Executive Commission, and for which,
during the June days, it had fought fanatically against the proletariat.
The thirteenth of June breaks its resistance and makes thelegislative
dictatorship of the united royalists a fait accompli. From this moment
the National Assembly is only a Committee of Public Safety of the party
of Order.

Paris had put the President, the ministers, and the majority of the
National Assembly in a “state of impeachment”; they put Paris in a
“state of siege.” The Mountain had declared the majority of the
Legislative Assembly “outside the constitution”; for violation of the
constitution the majority handed over the Mountain to the haute cour and
proscribed everything in it that still had vital force.[103] It was
decimated to a rump without head or heart. The minority had gone so far
as to attempt aparliamentary insurrection – the majority elevated its
parliamentary despotism to law. It decreed new “standing orders,” which
annihilate the freedom of the tribune and authorize the president of the
National Assembly to punish representatives for violation of the
standing orders with censure, with fines, with stoppage of their
salaries, with suspension of membership, with incarceration. Over the
rump of the Montagne it hung the rod instead of the sword. The remainder
of the deputies of the Montagne owed it to their honor to make a mass
exit. By such an act the dissolution of the party of Order would have
been hastened. It would have had to break up into its original component
parts the moment not even the semblance of an opposition would hold it
together any longer.

Simultaneously with their parliamentary power, the democratic petty
bourgeois were robbed of their armed power through the dissolution of
the Paris Artillery and the eighth, ninth, and twelfth legions of the
National Guard. On the other hand, the legion of high finance, which on
June 13 had raided the print shops of Boule and Roux, demolished the
presses, played havoc with the offices of the republican journals, and
arbitrarily arrested editors, compositors, printers, shipping clerks,
and errand boys, received encouraging approval from the tribune of the
National Assembly. All over France the disbanding of National Guards
suspected of republicanism was repeated.

A new press law, a new law of association, a new law on the state of
siege, the prisons of Paris overflowing, the political refugees driven
out, all the journals that go beyond the limits of the National
suspended, Lyons and the five departments surrounding it abandoned to
the brutal persecution of military despotism, the courts ubiquitous, and
the army of officials, so often purged, purged once more – these were
the inevitable, the constantly recurring commonplaces of victorious
reaction, worth mentioning after the massacres and the deportations of
June only because this time they were directed not only against Paris
but also against the departments, not only against the proletariat but,
above all, against the middle classes.

The repressive laws by which the declaration of a state of siege was
left to the discretion of the government, the press still more firmly
muzzled, and the right of association annihilated, absorbed the whole of
the legislative activity of the National Assembly during the months of
June, July, and August.

However, this epoch is characterized not by the exploitation of victory
in fact, but in principle; not by the resolutions of the National
Assembly, but by the grounds advanced for these resolutions; not by the
thing but by the phrase; not by the phrase but by the accent and the
gesture which enliven the phrase. The brazen, unreserved expression of
royalist sentiments, the contemptuously aristocratic insults to the
republic, the coquettishly frivolous babbling of restoration aims in a
word, the boastful violation of republican decorum – give its peculiar
tone and color to this period. Long live the Constitution! was the
battle cry of the vanquished of June 13. The victors were therefore
absolved from the hypocrisy of constitutional, that is, republican,
speech. The counterrevolution subjugated Hungary, Italy, and Germany,
and they believed that the restoration was already at the gates of
France. Among the masters of ceremonies of the factions of Order there
ensued a real competition to document their royalism in the Moniteur,
and to confess, repent, and crave pardon before God and man for liberal
sins perchance committed by them under the monarchy. No day passed
without the February Revolution being declared a national calamity from
the tribune of the National Assembly, without some Legitimist provincial
cabbage-junker solemnly stating that he had never recognized the
republic, without one of the cowardly deserters of and traitors to the
July Monarchy relating the belated deeds of heroism in the performance
of which only the philanthropy of Louis Philippe or other
misunderstandings had hindered him. What was admirable in the February
days was not the magnanimity of the victorious people, but the
self-sacrifice and moderation of the royalists, who had allowed it to be
victorious. One Representative of the People proposed to divert part of
the money destined for the relief of those wounded in February to the
Municipal Guards,[104] who alone in those days had deserved well of the
fatherland. Another wanted to have an equestrian statue decreed to the
Duke of Orléans in the Place du Carrousel. Thiers called the
constitution a dirty piece of paper. There appeared in succession on the
tribune Orléanists, to repent of their conspiracy against the legitimate
monarchy by Legitimists, who reproached themselves with having hastened
the overthrow of monarchy in general by resisting the illegitimate
monarchy; Thiers, who repented of having intrigued against Molé; Molé,
who repented of having intrigued against Guizot; Barrot, who repented of
having intrigued against all three. The cry “Long live the
Social-Democratic Republic!” was declared unconstitutional; the cry
“Long live the Republic!” was prosecuted as social-democratic. On the
anniversary of the Battle of Waterloo,[105] a representative declared:
“I fear an invasion of the Prussians less than the entry of the
revolutionary refugees into France.” To the complaints about the
terrorism organized in Lyons and the neighboring departments, Baraguay
d’Hilliers answered: “I prefer the white terror to the red terror.” And
the Assembly applauded frantically every time an epigram against the
republic, against the revolution, against the constitution, for the
monarchy, or for the Holy Alliance fell from the lips of its orators.
Every infringement of the minutest republican formality – for example,
that of addressing the representatives as citoyens – filled the knights
of order with enthusiasm.

The by-elections in Paris on July 8, held under the influence of the
state of siege and of the abstention of a great part of the proletariat
from the ballot box, the taking of Rome by the French army, the entry
into Rome of the red eminences[106] and, in their train, of inquisition
and monkish terrorism, added fresh victories to the victory of June and
increased the intoxication of the party of Order.

Finally, in the middle of August, half with the intention of attending
the Department Councils just assembled, half through exhaustion from the
tendentious orgy of many months, the royalists decreed a two – month
recess of the National Assembly. With transparent irony they left behind
a commission of twenty-five representatives, the cream of the
Legitimists and the Orléanists, a Molé and a Changarnier, as proxies for
the National Assembly and as guardians of the republic. The irony was
more profound than they suspected. They, condemned by history to help to
overthrow the monarchy they loved, were destined by it to conserve the
republic they hated.

The second period in the life of the constitutional republic, its
royalist period of sowing wild oats, closes with the recess of the
Legislative Assembly.

The state of siege in Paris had again been raised, the activities of the
press had again begun. During the suspension of the Social-Democratic
papers, during the period of repressive legislation and royalist
bluster, the Sičcle, the old literary representative of the
monarchist-constitutional petty bourgeois, republicanized itself; the
Presse, the old literary exponent of the bourgeois reformers,
democratized itself; while the National, the old classic organ of the
republican bourgeois, socialized itself.

The secret societies grew in extent and intensity in the same degree
that the public clubs became impossible. The workers’ industrial
cooperatives, tolerated as purely commercial societies, while of no
account economically, became politically so many means of cementing the
proletariat. June 13 had struck off the official heads of the various
semirevolutionary parties; the masses that remained won a head of their
own. The knights of order had practiced intimidation by prophecies of
the terror of the red republic; the base excesses, the hyperborean
atrocities of the victorious counterrevolution in Hungary, in Baden, and
in Rome washed the “red republic” white. And the malcontent intermediate
classes of French society began to prefer the promises of the red
republic with its problematic terrors to the terrors of the red monarchy
with its actual hopelessness. No socialist in France spread more
revolutionary propaganda than Haynau. A chaque capacité selon ses
oeuvres! [To each man of talent according to his work!]

In the meantime Louis Bonaparte exploited the recess of the National
Assembly to make princely tours of the provinces, the most hot-blooded
Legitimists made pilgrimages to Ems, to the grandchild of the saintly
Louis, and the mass of the popular representatives on the side of order
intrigued in the Department Councils, which had just met. It was
necessary to make them pronounce what the majority of the National
Assembly did not yet dare pronounce, an urgent motion for immediate
revision of the constitution. According to the constitution, it could
not be revised before 1852, and then only by a National Assembly called
together expressly for this purpose. If, however, the majority of the
Department Councils expressed themselves to this effect, was not the
National Assembly bound to sacrifice the virginity of the constitution
to the voice of France? The National Assembly entertained the same hopes
in regard to these provincial assemblies as the nuns in Voltaire’s
Henriade entertained in regard to the pandours. But, some exceptions
apart, the Potiphars of the National Assembly had to deal with just so
many Josephs of the provinces. The vast majority did not want to
understand the importunate insinuation. The revision of the constitution
was frustrated by the very instruments which were to have called it into
being, by the votes of the Department Councils. The voice of France, and
indeed of bourgeois France, had spoken and had spoken against revision.

At the beginning of October the Legislative National Assembly met once
more – tantum mutatus ab illo.[7] Its physiognomy was completely
changed. The unexpected rejection of revision on the part of the
Department Councils had put it back within the limits of the
constitution and indicated the limits of its term of life. The
Orléanists had become mistrustful because of the pilgrimages of the
Legitimists to Ems; the Legitimists had grown suspicious because of the
Orléanists’ negotiations with London; the journals of the two factions
had fanned the fire and weighed the reciprocal claims of their
pretenders. Orléanists and Legitimists grumbled in unison at the
machinations of the Bonapartists, which showed themselves in the
princely tours, in the more or less transparent emancipatory attempts of
the President, in the presumptuous language of the Bonapartist
newspapers; Louis Bonaparte grumbled at a National Assembly which found
only the Legitimist-Orléanist conspiracy legitimate, at a ministry which
betrayed him continually to this National Assembly. Finally the ministry
was itself divided on the Roman policy and on the income tax proposed by
Minister Passy, decried as socialistic by the conservatives.

One of the first bills of the Barrot Ministry in the reassembled
Legislative Assembly was a demand for a credit of 300,000 francs for the
payment of a widow’s pension to the Duchess of Orléans! The National
Assembly granted it and added to the list of debts of the French nation
a sum of seven million francs. Thus while Louis Philippe continued to
play successfully the role of the pauvre honteux, the shamefaced beggar,
the ministry dared not move an increase of salary for Bonaparte nor did
the Assembly appear inclined to grant it. And Louis Bonaparte, as ever,
vacillated in the dilemma: Aut Caesar aut Clichy! [8]

The minister’s second demand for a credit, one of nine million francs
for the costs of the Rome expedition, increased the tension between
Bonaparte on the one hand and the ministers and the National Assembly on
the other. Louis Bonaparte had inserted a letter to his military aide,
Edgar Ney, in the Moniteur, in which he bound the papal government to
constitutional guarantees. The Pope, on his part, had published an
address, motu proprio[110], in which he rejected any limitation of his
restored rule. Bonaparte’s letter, with studied indiscretion, raised the
curtain on his cabinet in order to expose himself to the eyes of the
gallery as a benevolent genius who was, however, misunderstood and
shackled in his own house. It was not the first time that he had
coquetted with the “furtive flights of a free soul.”[9] Thiers, the
reporter of the commission, completely ignored Bonaparte’s flight and
contented himself with translating the papal allocution into French. It
was not the ministry but Victor Hugo who sought to save the President
through an order of the day in which the National Assembly was to
express its agreement with Napoleon’s letter.Allons donc! Allons donc!
[Let’s go then!] With this disrespectful, frivolous interjection the
majority buried Hugo’s motion. The policy of the President? The letter
of the President? The President himself? Allons donc! Allons donc! Who
the devil takes Monsieur Bonaparte seriously? Do you believe, Monsieur
Victor Hugo, that we believe you that you believe in the
president?Allons donc! Allons donc!

Finally, the breach between Bonaparte and the National Assembly was
hastened by the discussion on the recall of the Orléans and the
Bourbons. In default of the ministry, the President’s cousin [Joseph
Bonaparte], son of the ex-king of Westphalia, had put forward this
motion, which had no other purpose than to push the Legitimist and the
Orléanist pretenders down to the same level, or rather a lower level
than the Bonapartist pretender, who at least stood in fact at the
pinnacle of the state.

Napoleon Bonaparte was disrespectful enough to make the recall of the
expelled royal families and the amnesty of the June insurgents parts of
one and the same motion. The indignation of the majority compelled him
to apologize immediately for this sacrilegious concatenation of the holy
and the impious, of the royal races and the proletarian brood, of the
fixed stars of society and of its swamp lights, and to assign each of
the two motions to its proper place. The majority energetically rejected
the recall of the royal family, and Berryer, the Demosthenes of the
Legitimists, left no doubt about the meaning of the vote. The civic
degradation of the pretenders, that is what is intended! It is desired
to rob them of their halo, of the last majesty that is left to them, the
majesty of exile! What, cried Berryer, would the pretenders think of the
President, who, forgetting his august origin, came here to live as a
simple private individual? It could not have been more clearly intimated
to Louis Bonaparte that he had not gained the day by his presence, that
whereas the royalists in coalition needed him here in France as a
“neutral man” in the presidential chair, the serious pretenders to the
throne had to be kept out of profane sight by the fog of exile.

On November 1, Louis Bonaparte answered the Legislative Assembly with a
message which in quite brusque words announced the dismissal of the
Barrot Ministry and the formation of a new ministry. The Barrot-Falloux
Ministry was the ministry of the royalist coalition, the Hautpoul
Ministry was the ministry of Bonaparte, the organ of the President as
against the Legislative Assembly, the ministry of the clerks.

Bonaparte was no longer the merely neutral man of December 10, 1848. His
possession of the executive power had grouped a number of interests
around him, the struggle with anarchy forced the party of Order itself
to increase his influence, and if he was no longer popular, the party of
Order was unpopular. Could he not hope to compel the Orléanists and the
Legitimists, through their rivalry as well as through the necessity of
some sort of monarchist restoration, to recognize the neutral pretender?

From November 1, 1849, dates the third period in the life of the
constitutional republic, a period which closes with March 10, I850. The
regular game, so much admired by Guizot, of the constitutional
institutions, the wrangling between executive and legislative power, now
begins. More, as against the hankering for restoration on the part of
the united Orléanists and Legitimists, Bonaparte defends his title to
his actual power, the republic; as against the hankering for restoration
on the part of Bonaparte, the party of Order defends its title to its
common rule, the republic; as against the Orléanists, the Legitimists,
and as against the Legitimists, the Orléanists, defend the status quo,
the republic. All these factions of the party of Order, each of which
has its own king and its own restoration in petto [secretly], mutually
enforce, as against their rivals’ hankering for usurpation and revolt,
the common rule of the bourgeoisie, the form in which the special claims
remain neutralized and reserved the republic.

Just as Kant makes the republic, so these royalists make the monarchy
the only rational form of state, a postulate of practical reason whose
realization is never attained, but whose attainment must always be
striven for and mentally adhered to as the goal.

Thus the constitutional republic had gone forth from the hands of the
bourgeois republicans as a hollow ideological formula to become a form
full of content and life in the hands of the royalists in coalition. And
Thiers spoke more truly than he suspects when he said: “We, the
royalists, are the true pillars of the constitutional republic.”

The overthrow of the ministry of the coalition and the appearance of the
ministry of the clerks has a second significance. Its Finance Minister
was Fould. Fould as Finance Minister signifies the official surrender of
France’s national wealth to the Bourse, the management of the state’s
property by the Bourse and in the interests of the Bourse. With the
nomination of Fould, the finance aristocracy announced its restoration
in the Moniteur. This restoration necessarily supplemented the other
restorations, which form just so many links in the chain of the
constitutional republic.

Louis Philippe had never dared to make a genuine loup-cervier
[stock-exchange wolf] finance minister. Just as his monarchy was the
ideal name for the rule of the big bourgeoisie, so in his ministries the
privileged interests had to bear ideologically disinterested names. The
bourgeois republic every where pushed into the forefront what the
different monarchies, Legitimist as well as Orléanist, had kept
concealed in the background. It made earthly what they had made
heavenly. In place of the names of the saints it put the bourgeois
proper names of the dominant class interests.

Our whole exposition has shown how the republic, from the first day of
its existence, did not overthrow but consolidated the finance
aristocracy. But the concessions made to it were a fate to which
submission was made without the desire to bring it about. With Fould,
the initiative in the government returned to the finance aristocracy.

The question will be asked how the coalesced bourgeoisie could bear and
suffer the rule of finance, which under Louis Philippe depended on the
exclusion or subordination of the remaining bourgeois factions.

The answer is simple.

First of all, the finance aristocracy itself forms a weighty,
authoritative part of the royalist coalition, whose common governmental
power is denominated republic. Are not the spokesmen and leading lights
among the Orléanists the old confederates and accomplices of the finance
aristocracy? Is it not itself the golden phalanx of Orleanism? As far as
the Legitimists are concerned, under Louis Philippe they had already
participated in practice in all the orgies of the Bourse, mine, and
railway speculations. In general, the combination of large landed
property with high finance is a normal fact. Proof: England; proof: even
Austria.

In a country like France, where the volume of national production stands
at a disproportionately lower level than the amount of the national
debt, where government bonds form the most important subject of
speculation and the Bourse the chief market for the investment of
capital that wants to turn itself to account in an unproductive way – in
such a country a countless number of people from all bourgeois or
semi-bourgeois classes must have an interest in the state debt, in the
Bourse gamblings, in finance. Do not all these interested subalterns
find their natural mainstays and commanders in the faction which
represents this interest in its vastest outlines, which represents it as
a whole?

What conditions the accrual of state property to high finance? The
constantly growing indebtedness of the state. And the indebtedness of
the state? The constant excess of its expenditure over its income, a
disproportion which is simultaneously the cause and effect of the system
of state loans.

In order to escape from this indebtedness, the state must either
restrict its expenditure, that is, simplify and curtail the government
organism, govern as little as possible, employ as few personnel as
possible, enter as little as possible into relations with bourgeois
society. This path was impossible for the party of Order, whose means of
repression, official interference in the name of the state, and ubiquity
through organs of state were bound to increase in the same measure as
the number of quarters increased from which its rule and the conditions
for the existence of its class were threatened. The gendarmerie cannot
be reduced in the same measure as attacks on persons and property
increase.

Or the state must seek to evade the debts and produce an immediate but
transitory balance in its budget by putting extraordinary taxes on the
shoulders of the wealthiest classes. But was the party of Order to
sacrifice its own wealth on the altar of the fatherland to stop the
national wealth from being exploited by the Bourse? Pas si bęte! [Not so
stupid!]

Therefore, without a complete revolution in the French state, no
revolution in the French state budget. Along with this state budget
necessarily goes the lordship of the trade in state debts, of the state
creditors, the bankers, the money dealers, and the wolves of the Bourse.
Only one faction of the party of Order was directly concerned in the
overthrow of the finance aristocracy – the manufacturers. We are not
speaking of the middle, of the smaller people engaged in industry; we
are speaking of the reigning princes of the manufacturing interests, who
had formed the broad basis of the dynastic opposition under Louis
Philippe. Their interest is indubitably reduction of the costs of
production and hence reduction of the taxes, which enter into
production, and hence reduction of the state debts, the interest on
which enters into the taxes, hence the overthrow of the finance
aristocracy.

In England – and the largest French manufacturers are petty bourgeois
compared with their English rivals actually find the manufacturers, a
Cobden, a Bright, at the head of the crusade against the bank and the
stock-exchange aristocracy. Why not in France? In England industry
predominates – in France, agriculture. In England industry requires free
trade; in France, protective tariffs, national monopoly alongside the
other monopolies. French industry does not dominate French production;
the French industrialists, therefore, do not dominate the French
bourgeoisie. In order to secure the advancement of their interests as
against the remaining factions of the bourgeoisie, they cannot, like the
English, take the lead of the movement and simultaneously push their
class interests to the fore; they must follow in the train of the
revolution, and serve interests which are opposed to the collective
interests of their class. In February they had misunderstood their
position; February sharpened their wits. And who is more directly
threatened by the workers than the employer, the industrial capitalists?
The manufacturer, therefore, of necessity became in France the most
fanatical member of the party of Order. The reduction of his profit by
finance, what is that compared with the abolition of profit by the
proletariat?

In France, the petty bourgeois does what normally the industrial
bourgeois would have to do; the worker does what normally would be the
task of the petty bourgeois; and the task of the worker, who
accomplishes that? No one. In France it is not accomplished; in France
it is proclaimed. It is not accomplished anywhere within the national
boundaries.[111] The class war within French society turns into a world
war, in which the nations confront one another. Accomplishment begins
only at the moment when, through the world war, the proletariat is
pushed to the fore of the people that dominates the world market, to the
forefront in England. The revolution, which finds here not its end, but
its organizational beginning, is no short-lived revolution. The present
generation is like the Jews whom Moses led through the wilderness. It
not only has a new world to conquer, it must go under in order to make
room for the men who are able to cope with a new world.

Let us return to Fould.

On November 14, 1849, Fould mounted the tribune of the National Assembly
and expounded his system of finance: an apology for the old system of
taxes! Retention of the wine tax! Abandonment of Passy’s income tax!

Passy, too, was no revolutionist; he was an old minister of Louis
Philippe’s. He belonged to the Puritans of the Dufaure brand and to the
most intimate confidants of Teste[10], the scapegoat of the July
Monarchy. Passy, too, had praised the old tax system and recommended the
retention of the wine tax, but he had at the same time torn the veil
from the state deficit. He had declared the necessity for a new tax, the
income tax, if the bankruptcy of the state was to be avoided. Fould, who
had recommended state bankruptcy to Ledru-Rollin, recommended the state
deficit to the Legislative Assembly. He promised economies, the secret
of which later revealed itself in that, for example, expenditures
diminished by sixty millions while the floating debt increased by two
hundred millions – conjurers’ tricks in the grouping of figures, in the
drawing up of accounts, which all finally amounted to new loans.

Alongside the other jealous bourgeois factions, the finance aristocracy
naturally did not act in so shamelessly corrupt a manner under Fould as
under Louis Philippe. But once it existed, the system remained the same:
constant increase in the debts, masking of the deficit. And in time the
old Bourse swindling came out more openly. Proof: the law concerning the
Avignon Railway; the mysterious fluctuations in government securities,
for a brief time the topic of the day throughout Paris; finally, the
ill-starred speculations of Fould and Bonaparte on the elections of
March 10.

With the official restoration of the finance aristocracy, the French
people soon had to stand again before a February 24.

The Constituent Assembly, in an attack of misanthropy against its heir,
had abolished the wine tax for the year of our Lord 1850. New debts
could not be paid with the abolition of old taxes. Creton, a cretin of
the party of Order, had moved the retention of the wine tax even before
the Legislative Assembly recessed. Fould took up this motion in the name
of the Bonapartist ministry and on December 20, 1849, the anniversary of
the day Bonaparte was proclaimed President, the National Assembly
decreed the restoration of the wine tax.

The sponsor of this restoration was not a financier; it was the Jesuit
chief Montalembert. His argument was strikingly simple: Taxation is the
maternal breast on which the government is suckled. The government is
the instruments of repression; it is the organs of authority; it is the
army; it is the police; it is the officials, the judges, the ministers;
it is the priests. An attack on taxation is an attack by the anarchists
on the sentinels of order, who safeguard the material and spiritual
production of bourgeois society from the inroads of the proletarian
vandals. Taxation is the fifth god, side by side with property, the
family, order, and religion. And the wine tax is incontestably taxation
and, moreover, not ordinary, but traditional, monarchically disposed,
respectable taxation. Vive l’impôt des boissons! [Long live the tax on
drinks!] Three cheers and one cheer more!

When the French peasant paints the devil he paints him in the guise of a
tax collector. From the moment when Montalembert elevated taxation to a
god, the peasant became godless, atheist, and threw himself into the
arms of the devil, of socialism. The religion of order had forfeited
him; the Jesuits had forfeited him; Bonaparte had forfeited him.
December 20, 1849, had irrevocably compromised December 20, 1848. The
“nephew of his uncle” was not the first of his family whom the wine tax
defeated, this tax which, in Montalembert’s phrase, heralds the
revolutionary storm. The real, the great Napoleon declared on St. Helena
that the reintroduction of the wine tax had contributed more to his
downfall than all else, since it had alienated from him the peasants of
Southern France. As far back as under Louis XIV the favorite object of
the hatred of the people (see the writings of Boisguillebert and
Vauban), abolished by the first revolution, it was reintroduced by
Napoleon in a modified form in 1808. When the Restoration entered
France, there trotted before it not only the Cossacks,, but also the
promises to abolish the wine tax. The gentilhommerie [gentry] naturally
did not need to keep its word to the gens taillables ŕ merci et
miséricorde [people taxed pitilessly]. The year I830 promised the
abolition of the wine tax. It was not its way to do what it said or say
what it did. The year 1848 promised the abolition of the wine tax, just
as it promised everything. Finally, the Constituent Assembly, which
promised nothing, made, as already mentioned, a testamentary provision
whereby the wine tax was to disappear on January 1, 1850. And just ten
days before January 1, 1850, the Legislative Assembly introduced it once
more, so that the French people perpetually pursued it, and when they
had thrown it out the door saw it come in again through the window.

The popular hatred of the wine tax is explained by the fact that it
unites in itself all the odiousness of the French system of taxation.
The mode of its collection is odious, the mode of its distribution
aristocratic, for the rates of taxation are the same for the commonest
as for the costliest wines; it increases, therefore, in geometrical
progression as the wealth of the consumers decreases, an inverted
progressive tax. It accordingly directly provokes the poisoning of the
laboring classes by putting a premium on adulterated and imitation
wines. It lessens consumption, since it sets up octrois [toll houses]
before the gates of all towns of over four thousand inhabitants and
transforms each such town into a foreign country with a protective
tariff against French wine. The big wine merchants, but still more the
small ones, the marchands de vins, whose livelihood directly depends on
the consumption of wine, are so many avowed enemies of the wine tax. And
finally, by lessening consumption the wine tax curtails the producers’
market. While it renders the urban workers incapable of paying for wine,
it renders the wine growers incapable of selling it. And France has a
wine-growing population of about twelve million. One can therefore
understand the hatred of the people in general; one can in particular
understand the fanaticism of the peasants against the wine tax. And in
addition they saw in its restoration no isolated, more or less
accidental event. The peasants have a kind of historical tradition of
their own, which is handed down from father to son, and in this
historical school it is muttered that whenever any government wants to
dupe the peasants, it promises the abolition of the wine tax, and as
soon as it has duped the peasants, it retains or reintroduces the wine
tax. In the wine tax the peasant tests the bouquet of the government,
its tendency. The restoration of the wine tax on December 20 meant:
Louis Bonaparte is like the rest. But he was not like the rest; he was a
peasant discovery, and in the petitions carrying millions of signatures
against the wine tax they took back the votes that they had given a year
before to the “nephew of his uncle.”

The country folk – over two-thirds of the total French population –
consist for the most part of so-called free landowners. The first
generation, gratuitously freed by the Revolution of 1789 from its feudal
burdens, had paid no price for the soil. But the following generations
paid, under the form of the price of land, what their semi-serf
forefathers had paid in the form of rent, tithes, corvee, _etc._ The
more, on the one hand, the population grew and the more, on the other
hand, the partition of the soil increased, the higher became the price
of the parcels, for the demand for them increased with their smallness.
But in proportion as the price the peasant paid for his parcel rose,
whether he bought it directly or whether he had it accounted as capital
by his co-heirs, necessarily the indebtedness of the peasant, that is,
the mortgage, also rose. The claim to a debt encumbering the land is
termed a mortgage, a pawn ticket in respect of the land. Just as
privileges accumulated on the medieval estate, mortgages accumulate on
the modern small allotment. On the other hand, under the system of
parcelisation the soil is purely an instrument of production for its
proprietor. Now the fruitfulness of land diminishes in the same measure
as land is divided. The application of machinery to the land, the
division of labor, major soil – improvement measures, such as cutting
drainage and irrigation canals and the like, become more and more
impossible, while the unproductive costs of cultivation increase in the
same proportion as the division of the instrument of production itself.
All this, regardless of whether the possessor of the small allotment
possesses capital or not. But the more the division increases, the more
does the parcel of land with its utterly wretched inventory form the
entire capital of the small allotment peasant, the more does investment
of capital in the land diminish, the more does the peasant lack land,
money, and education for making use of the progress in agronomy, and the
more does the cultivation of the soil retrogress. Finally, the net
proceeds diminish in the same proportion as the gross consumption
increases, as the whole family of the peasant is kept back from other
occupations through its holding and yet is not enabled to live by it.

In the measure, therefore, that the population and, with it, the
division of the land increases, does the instrument of production, the
soil, become more expensive and its fertility decrease, does agriculture
decline and the peasant become loaded with debt. And what was the effect
becomes, in its turn, the cause. Each generation leaves behind another
more deeply in debt – each new generation begins under more unfavorable
and more aggravating conditions; mortgaging begets mortgaging, and when
it becomes impossible for the peasant to offer his small holding as
security for new debts, that is, to encumber it with new mortgages, he
falls a direct victim to usury, and usurious interest rates become so
much the more exorbitant.

Thus it came about that the French peasant cedes to the capitalist, in
the form of interest on the mortgages encumbering the soil and in the
form of interest on the advances made by the usurer without mortgages,
not only ground rent, not only the industrial profit – in a word, not
only the whole net profit – but even a part of the wages, and that
therefore he has sunk to the level of the Irish tenant farmer – all
under the pretense of being a private proprietor.

This process was accelerated in France by the ever growing burden of
taxes, by court costs called forth in part directly by the formalities
with which French legislation encumbers the ownership of land, in part
by the innumerable conflicts over parcels everywhere bounding and
crossing each other, and in part by the litigiousness of the peasants,
whose enjoyment of property is limited to the fanatical assertion of
their title to their fancied property, their property rights.

According to a statistical statement of 1840, the gross production of
French agriculture amounted to 5,237,178,000 francs. Of this the costs
of cultivation came to 3,552,000,000 francs, including consumption by
the persons working. There remained a net product of 1,685,178,000
francs, from which 550,000,000 had to be deducted for interest on
mortgages, 100,000,000 for law officials, 350,000,000 for taxes, and
107,000,000 for registration money, stamp duty, mortgage fees, _etc._
There was left one-third of the net product or 538,000,000; when
distributed over the population, not 25 francs per head net
product.[112] Naturally, neither usury outside of mortgage nor lawyers’
fees, etc., are included in this calculation.

The condition of the French peasants, when the republic had added new
burdens to their old ones, is comprehensible. It can be seen that their
exploitation differs only in form from the exploitation of the
industrial proletariat. The exploiter is the same: capital. The
individual capitalists exploit the individual peasants through mortgages
and usury, the capitalist class exploits the peasant class through the
state taxes. The peasant’s title to property is the talisman by which
capital held him hitherto under its spell, the pretext under which it
set him against the industrial proletariat. Only the fall of capital can
raise the peasant; only an anti-capitalist, a proletarian government can
break his economic misery, his social degradation. The constitutional
republic is the dictatorship of his united exploiters; the
social-democratic, the red republic, is the dictatorship of his allies.
And the scale rises or falls according to the votes the peasant casts
into the ballot box. He himself has to decide his fate. So spoke the
socialists in pamphlets, almanacs, calendars, and leaflets of all kinds.
This language became more understandable to him through the
counter-writings of the party of Order, which for its part turned to
him, and which by gross exaggeration, by its brutal conception and
representation of the intentions and ideas of the socialists, struck the
true peasant note and overstimulated his lust after forbidden fruit. But
most understandable was the language of the actual experience that the
peasant class had gained from the use of the suffrage, were the
disillusionments overwhelming him, blow upon blow, with revolutionary
speed. Revolutions are the locomotives of history.

The gradual revolutionizing of the peasants was manifested by various
symptoms. It early revealed itself in the elections to the Legislative
Assembly – it was revealed in the state of siege in the five departments
bordering Lyons; it was revealed a few months after June 13 in the
election of a Montagnard in place of the former president of the Chambre
introuvable[11] by the Department of the Gironde; it was revealed on
December 20, 1849, in the election of a red in place of a deceased
Legitimist deputy[113] in the Department du Gard, that promised land of
the Legitimists, the scene of the most frightful infamies committed
against the republicans in 1794 and 1795 and the center of the white
terror in 1815, when liberals and Protestants were publicly murdered.
This revolutionizing of the most stationary class is most clearly
evident since the reintroduction of the wine tax. The governmental
measures and the laws of January and February, 1850, are directed almost
exclusively against the departments and the peasants. The most striking
proof of their progress.

The Hautpoul circular, by which the gendarme was appointed inquisitor of
the prefect, of the subprefect, and, above all, of the mayor, and by
which espionage was organized even in the hidden corners of the remotest
village community; the law against the schoolteachers, by which they
(the men of talent, the spokesmen, the educators and interpreters of the
peasant class) were subjected to the arbitrary power of the prefect –
they, the proletarians of the learned class, were chased like hunted
beasts from one community to another; the bill against the mayors, by
which the Damocles sword of dismissal was hung over their heads, and
they, the presidents of the peasant communities, were every moment set
in opposition to the President of the Republic and the party of Order;
the ordinance which transformed the seventeen military districts of
France into four pashaliks and forced the barracks and the bivouac on
the French as their national salon; the education law, by which the
party of Order proclaimed unconsciousness and the forcible stupefaction
of France as the condition of its life under the regime of universal
suffrage what were all these laws and measures? Desperate attempts to
reconquer the departments and the peasants of the departments for the
party of Order.

Regarded as repression, they were wretched methods that wrung the neck
of their own purpose. The big measures, like the retention of the wine
tax, of the 45-centime tax, the scornful rejection of peasant petitions
for the repayment of the milliard, etc., all these legislative
thunderbolts struck the peasant class all at once, wholesale, from the
center; the laws and measures cited made attack and resistance general,
the topic of the day in every hut; they inoculated every village with
revolution; they localized and peasantized the revolution.

On the other hand, do not these proposals of Bonaparte and their
acceptance by the National Assembly prove the unity of the two powers of
the constitutional republic, so far as it is a question of repression of
anarchy – that is, of all the classes that rise against the bourgeois
dictatorship? Did not Soulouque [Louis Bonaparte], directly after his
brusque message, assure the Legislative Assembly of his dévouement
[devotion] to order, through the immediately following message of
Carlier,[116] that dirty, mean caricature of Fouché, as Louis Bonaparte
himself was the shallow caricature of Napoleon?

The education law shows us the alliance of the young Catholics with the
old Voltaireans. Could the rule of the united bourgeois be anything else
but the coalesced despotism of the pro-Jesuit Restoration and the
make–believe free–thinking July Monarchy? Had not the weapons that the
one bourgeois faction had distributed among the people against the other
faction, in their mutual struggle for supremacy, again been torn from
it, the people, since the latter was confronting their united
dictatorship? Nothing has aroused the Paris shopkeeper more than this
coquettish étalage [display] of Jesuitism, not even the rejection of the
concordats ŕ l’amiable [friendly agreements].

Meanwhile the collisions between the different factions of the party of
Order, as well as between the National Assembly and Bonaparte,
continued. The National Assembly was far from pleased that Bonaparte,
immediately after his coup d’état, after appointing his own, Bonapartist
ministry, summoned before him the invalids of the monarchy, newly
appointed prefects, and made their unconstitutional agitation for his
reelection as President the condition of their appointment; that Carlier
celebrated his inauguration with the closing of a Legitimist club, or
that Bonaparte founded a journal of his own, Le Napoleon, which betrayed
the secret longings of the President to the public, while his ministers
had to deny them from the tribune of the Legislative Assembly. The
latter was far from pleased by the defiant retention of the ministry,
notwithstanding its various votes of no confidence; far from pleased by
the attempt to win the favor of the noncommissioned officers by an extra
pay of four sous a day and the favor of the proletariat by a
plagiarisation of Eugčne Sue’s Mysteries by an honor loan bank; far from
pleased, finally, by the effrontery with which the ministers were made
to move the deportation of the remaining June insurgents to Algiers, in
order to heap unpopularity on the Legislative Assembly en gros, while
the President reserved popularity for himself en detail, by individual
grants of pardon.Thiers let fall threatening words about coups d’état
and coups de tęte [rash acts], and the Legislative Assembly revenged
itself on Bonaparte by rejecting every proposed law that he put forward
for his own benefit, and by inquiring with noisy mistrust, in every
instance when he made a proposal in the common interest, whether he did
not aspire, through increase of the executive power, to augment the
personal power of Bonaparte. In a word, it revenged itself by a
conspiracy of contempt.

The Legitimist party, on its part, saw with vexation the more capable
Orléanists once more occupying almost all posts and centralization
increasing, while it sought its salvation principally in
decentralization. And so it was. The counterrevolution centralized
forcibly, that is, it prepared the mechanism of the revolution. It even
centralized the gold and silver of France in the Paris Bank through the
compulsory quotation of bank notes, and so created the ready war chest
of the revolution.

Lastly, the Orléanists saw with vexation the emergent principle of
legitimacy contrasted with their bastard principle, and themselves every
moment snubbed and maltreated as the bourgeois misalliance of a noble
spouse.

Little by little we have seen peasants, petty bourgeois, the middle
classes in general, stepping alongside the proletariat, driven into open
antagonism to the official republic and treated by it as antagonists.
Revolt against bourgeois dictatorship, need of a change of society,
adherence to democratic-republican institutions as organs of their
movement, grouping around the proletariat as the decisive revolutionary
power – these are the common characteristics of the so-called party of
social democracy, the party of the red republic. This party of anarchy,
as its opponents christened it, is no less a coalition of different
interests than the party of Order. From the smallest reform of the old
social disorder to the overthrow of the old social order, from bourgeois
liberalism to revolutionary terrorism – as far apart as this lie the
extremes that form the starting point and the finishing point of the
party of “anarchy.”

Abolition of the protective tariff – socialism! For it strikes at the
monopoly of the industrial faction of the party of Order. Regulation of
the state budget – socialism! For it strikes at the monopoly of the
financial faction of the party of Order. Free admission of foreign meat
and corn – socialism! For it strikes at the monopoly of the third
faction of the party of Order, large landed property. The demands of the
free–trade party, that is, of the most advanced English bourgeois party,
appear in France as so many socialist demands. Voltaireanism socialism!
For it strikes at a fourth faction of the party of Order, the Catholic.
Freedom of the press, right of association, universal public education –
socialism, socialism! They strike at the general monopoly of the party
of Order.

So swiftly had the march of the revolution ripened conditions that the
friends of reform of all shades, the most moderate claims of the middle
classes, were compelled to group themselves around the banner of the
most extreme party of revolution, around the red flag.

Yet manifold as the socialism of the different large sections of the
party of anarchy was, according to the economic conditions and the total
revolutionary requirements of the class or fraction of a class arising
out of these, in one point it is in harmony: in proclaiming itself the
means of emancipating the proletariat and the emancipation of the latter
as its object. Deliberate deception on the part of some; self-deception
on the part of the others, who promote the world transformed according
to their own needs as the best world for all, as the realization of all
revolutionary claims and the elimination of all revolutionary
collisions.

Behind the general socialist phrases of the “party of anarchy,” which
sound rather alike, there is concealed the socialism of the National, of
the Presse, and of the Siécle, which more or less consistently wants to
overthrow the rule of the finance aristocracy and to free industry and
trade from their hitherto existing fetters. This is the socialism of
industry, of trade, and of agriculture, whose bosses in the party of
Order deny these interests, insofar as they no longer coincide with
their private monopolies. Petty bourgeois socialism, socialism par
excellence, is distinct from this bourgeois socialism, to which, as to
every variety of socialism, sections of the workers and petty bourgeois
naturally rally. Capital hounds this class chiefly as its creditor, so
it demands credit institutions; capital crushes it by competition, so it
demands associations supported by the state; capital overwhelms it by
concentration, so it demands progressive taxes, limitations on
inheritance, taking over of large construction projects by the state,
and other measures that forcibly stem the growth of capital. Since it
dreams of the peaceful achievement of its socialism – allowing, perhaps,
for a second February Revolution lasting a brief day or so the coming
historical process naturally appears to it as an application of systems
which the thinkers of society, whether in companies or as individual
inventors, devise or have devised. Thus they become the eclectics or
adepts of the existing socialist systems, of doctrinaire socialism,
which was the theoretical expression of the proletariat only as long as
it had not yet developed further into a free historical movement of its
own.

While this utopian doctrinaire socialism, which subordinates the total
movement to one of its stages, which puts in place of common social
production the brainwork of individual pedants and, above all, in
fantasy does away with the revolutionary struggle of the classes and its
requirements by small conjurers’ tricks or great sentimentality, while
this doctrinaire socialism, which at bottom only idealizes present
society, takes a picture of it without shadows, and wants to achieve its
ideal athwart the realities of present society; while the proletariat
surrenders this socialism to the petty bourgeoisie; while the struggle
of the different socialist leaders among themselves sets forth each of
the so-called systems as a pretentious adherence to one of the transit
points of the social revolution as against another – the proletariat
rallies more and more around revolutionary socialism, around communism,
for which the bourgeoisie has itself invented the name of Blanqui. This
socialism is the declaration of the permanence of the revolution, the
class dictatorship of the proletariat as the necessary transit point to
the abolition of class distinctions generally, to the abolition of all
the relations of production on which they rest, to the abolition of all
the social relations that correspond to these relations of production,
to the revolutionizing of all the ideas that result from these social
relations.

The scope of this exposition does not permit of developing the subject
further.

We have seen that just as in the party of Order the finance aristocracy
necessarily took the lead, so in the party of “anarchy” the proletariat.
While the different classes, united in a revolutionary league, grouped
themselves around the proletariat, while the departments became ever
more unsafe and the Legislative Assembly itself ever more morose toward
the pretensions of the French Soulouque, the long deferred and delayed
by–election of substitutes for the Montagnards, proscribed after June
13, drew near.

The government, scorned by its foes, maltreated and daily humiliated by
its alleged friends, saw only one mean of emerging from this repugnant
and untenable position – revolt. A revolt in Paris would have permitted
the proclamation of a state of siege in Paris and the departments and
thus the control of the elections. On the other hand, the friends of
order, in face of a government that had gained victory over anarchy,
were constrained to make concessions, if they did not want to appear as
anarchists themselves.

The government set to work. At the beginning of February, 1850,
provocation of the people by chopping down the trees of liberty. In
vain. If the trees of liberty lost their place, the government itself
lost its head and fell back, frightened by its own provocation. The
National Assembly, however, received this clumsy attempt at emancipation
on the part of Bonaparte with ice-cold mistrust. The removal of the
wreaths of immortelles from the July column[118] was no more successful.
It gave part of the army an opportunity for revolutionary demonstrations
and the National Assembly the occasion for a more or less veiled vote of
no confidence in the ministry. In vain the government press threatened
the abolition of universal suffrage and the invasion of the Cossacks. In
vain was Hautpoul’s direct challenge, issued to the Left in the
Legislative Assembly itself, to betake itself to the streets, and his
declaration that the government was ready to receive it. Hautpoul
received nothing but a call to order from the President, and the party
of Order, with silent, malicious joy, allowed a deputy of the Left to
mock Bonaparte’s usurpatory longings. In vain, finally, was the prophecy
of a revolution on February 24. The government caused February 24 to be
ignored by the people.

The proletariat did not allow itself to be provoked to revolt, because
it was on the point of making a revolution.

Unhindered by the provocations of the government, which only heightened
the general exasperation at the existing situation, the election
committee, wholly under the influence of the workers, put forward three
candidates for Paris: Deflotte, Vidal, and Carnot. Deflotte was a June
deportee, amnestied through one of Bonaparte’s popularity-seeking ideas;
he was a friend of Blanqui and had taken part in the attempt of May 15.
Vidal, known as a communist writer through his book Concerning the
Distribution of Wealth, was formerly secretary to Louis Blanc in the
Luxembourg Commission. Carnot, son of the man of the Convention who had
organized the victory, the least compromised member of the National
party, Minister of Education in the Provisional Government and the
Executive Commission, was through his democratic public education bill a
living protest against the education law of the Jesuits. These three
candidates represented the three allied classes: at the head, the June
insurgent, the representative of the revolutionary proletariat; next to
him the doctrinaire socialist, the representative of the socialist petty
bourgeoisie; finally, the third, the representative of the republican
bourgeois party whose democratic formulas had gained a socialist
significance vis-a-vis the party of Order and had long lost their own
significance. This was a general coalition against the bourgeoisie and
the government, as in February. But this time the proletariat was at the
head of the revolutionary league.

In spite of all efforts the socialist candidates won. The army itself
voted for the June insurgent against its own War Minister La Hitte. The
party of Order was thunderstruck. The elections in the departments did
not solace them; the departments gave a majority to the Montagnards.

The election of March 10, 1850! It was the revocation of June, 1848: the
butchers and deportees of the June insurgents returned to the National
Assembly but returned, bowed down, in the train of the deported, and
with their principles on their lips. It was the revocation of June 13,
1849: the Montagne, proscribed by the National Assembly, returned to the
National Assembly, but as advance trumpeters of the revolution, no
longer as its commanders. It was the revocation of December 10: Napoleon
had lost out with his Minister La Hitte. The parliamentary history of
France knows only one analogy: the rejection of d’Haussez, minister of
Charles X, in 1830. Finally, the election of March 10, 1850, was the
cancellation of the election of May 13, which had given the party of
Order a majority. The election of March 10 protested against the
majority of May 13. March 10 was a revolution. Behind the ballots lie
the paving stones.

“The vote of March 10 means war,” shouted Ségur d’Aguesseau, one of the
most advanced members of the party of Order.

With March 10, 1850, the constitutional republic entered a new phase,
the phase of its dissolution. The different factions of the majority are
again united among themselves and with Bonaparte; they are again the
saviors of order – he is again their neutral man. If they remember that
they are royalists, it happens only from despair of the possibility of a
bourgeois republic; if he remembers that he is a pretender, it happens
only because he despairs of remaining President.

At the command of the party of Order, Bonaparte answers the election of
Deflotte, the June insurgent, by appointing Baroche Minister of Internal
Affairs, Baroche, the accuser of Blanqui and Barbčs, of Ledru-Rollin and
Guinard. The Legislative Assembly answers the election of Carnot by
adopting the education law, the election of Vidal by suppressing the
socialist press. The party of Order seeks to blare away its own fears by
the trumpet blasts of its press. “The sword is holy,” cries one of its
organs; “the defenders of order must take the offensive against the Red
party,” cries another; “between socialism and society there is a duel to
the death, a war without surcease or mercy; in this duel of desperation
one or the other must go under; if society does not annihilate
socialism, socialism will annihilate society,” crows a third cock of
Order. Throw up the barricades of order, the barricades of religion, the
barricades of the family! An end must be made of the 127,000 voters of
Paris! A Bartholomew’s Night for the socialists! And the party of Order
believes for a moment in its own certainty of victory.

Their organs hold forth most fanatically of all against the “boutiquiers
[tradesmen] of Paris.” The June insurgent of Paris elected by the
shopkeepers of Paris as their representative! This means that a second
June, 1848, is impossible; this means that a second June 13, 1849, is
impossible; this means that the moral influence of capital is broken;
this means that the bourgeois assembly now represents only the
bourgeoisie; this means that big property is lost, because its vassal,
small property, seeks its salvation in the camp of the propertyless.

The party of Order naturally returns to its inevitable commonplace.
“More repression,” it cries, “tenfold repression!” But its power of
repression has diminished tenfold, while resistance has increased a
hundredfold. Must not the chief instrument of repression, the army,
itself be repressed? And the party of Order speaks its last word: “The
iron ring of suffocating legality must be broken. The constitutional
republic is impossible. We must fight with our true weapons; since
February, 1848, we have fought the revolution with its weapons and on
its terrain – , we have accepted its institutions; the constitution is a
fortress which safeguards only the besiegers, not the besieged! By
smuggling ourselves into holy Ilion in the belly of the Trojan horse, we
have, unlike our forefathers, the Grecs[12], not conquered the hostile
town, but made prisoners of ourselves.

The foundation of the constitution, however, is universal suffrage.
Annihilation of universal suffrage – such is the last word of the party
of Order, of the bourgeois dictatorship.

On May 4, 1848, on December 20, 1848, on May 13, 1849, and on July 8,
1849, universal suffrage admitted that they were right.[119] On March
10, 1850, universal suffrage admitted that it had itself been wrong.
Bourgeois rule as the outcome and result of universal suffrage, as the
express act of the sovereign will of the people – that is the meaning of
the bourgeois constitution. But has the constitution any further meaning
from the moment that the content of this suffrage, of this sovereign
will, is no longer bourgeois rule? Is it not the duty of the bourgeoisie
so to regulate the suffrage that it wills the reasonable, its rule? By
ever and anon putting an end to the existing state power and creating it
anew out of itself, does not universal suffrage put an end to all
stability, does it not every moment question all the powers that be,
does it not annihilate authority, does it not threaten to elevate
anarchy itself to the position of authority? After March 10, 1850, who
would still doubt it?

By repudiating universal suffrage, with which it hitherto draped itself
and from which it sucked its omnipotence, the bourgeoisie openly
confesses, “Our dictatorship has hitherto existed by the will of the
people; it must now be consolidated against the will of the people.”
And, consistently, it seeks its props no longer within France, but
without, in foreign countries, in invasion.

With the invasion, this second Coblenz[13], its seat established in
France itself, rouses all the national passions against itself. With the
attack on universal suffrage it provides a general pretext for the new
revolution, and the revolution requires such a pretext. Every special
pretext would divide the factions of the revolutionary league, and give
prominence to their differences. The general pretext stuns the
semirevolutionary classes; it permits them to deceive themselves
concerning the definite character of the coming revolution, concerning
the consequences of their own act. Every revolution requires a question
for discussion at banquets. Universal suffrage is the banquet question
of the new revolution.

The bourgeois factions in coalition, however, are already condemned,
since they take flight from the only possible form of their united
power, from the most potent and complete form of their class rule, the
constitutional republic, back to the subordinate, incomplete, weaker
form of monarchy. They resemble the old man who in order to regain his
youthful strength fetched out his boyhood garments and suffered torment
trying to get his withered limbs into them. Their republic had the sole
merit of being the hothouse of the revolution.

March 10, 1850, bears the inscription:

Aprčs moi le déluge! After me the deluge![14]

 

Notes

7. How great the change since then (Virgil, Aeneid).

8. Either Caesar or Clichy. Clichy was a debtors’ prison in Paris.

9. From Georg Herwegh, “Aus den Bergen” (“From the Mountains”).

10. Note by Engels to the 1895 edition: On July 8, 1847, before the
Chamber of Peers in Paris, began the trial of Parmentier and General
Cubičres for bribery of officials with a view to obtaining a salt works
concession, and of the then Minister of Public Works, Teste, for
accepting such money bribes. The latter, during the trial, attempted to
commit suicide. All were sentenced to pay heavy fines, Teste, in
addition, to three years’ imprisonment.

11. Note by Engels to the 1895 edition: This is the name given by
history to the fanatically ultraroyalist and reactionary Chamber of
Deputies elected immediately after the second overthrow of Napoleon, in
1815.

12. Note by Engels to the 1895 edition: A play on words: Greeks, but
also professional cheats.

13. Coblenz was the center of the counterrevolutionary emigres during
the French Revolution.

14. Words attributed to Louis XV.

 

Contents | Part IV: The Abolition of Universal Suffrage in 1850 |
Marx/Engels Archive

The Class Struggles in France, 1848 to 1850


Part IV

The Abolition of Universal Suffrage in 1850[14]

The same symptoms have shown themselves in France since 1849, and
particularly since the beginning of 1850. The Parisian industries are
abundantly employed and the cotton factories of Rouen and Mulhouse are
also doing pretty well, although here, as in England, the high prices of
the raw material have exercised a retarding influence. The development
of prosperity in France was, in addition, especially promoted by the
comprehensive tariff reform in Spain and by the reduction of the duties
on various luxury articles in Mexico; the export of French commodities
to both markets has considerably increased. The growth of capital in
France led to a series of speculations, for which the exploitation of
the California gold mines on a large scale served as a pretext.[121] A
swarm of companies have sprung up; the low denomination of their shares
and their socialist-colored prospectuses appeal directly to the purses
of the petty bourgeois and the workers, but all and sundry result in
that sheer swindling which is characteristic of the French and Chinese
alone. One of these companies is even patronized directly by the
government. The import duties in France during the first nine months of
1848 amounted to 63,000,000 francs, of 1849 to 95,000,000 francs, and of
1850 to 93,000,000 francs. Moreover, in the month of September, 1850,
they again rose by more than a million compared with the same month of
1849. Exports also rose in 1849, and still more in 1850.

The most striking proof of restored prosperity is the Bank’s
reintroduction of specie payment by the law of August 6, 1850. On March
15, 1848, the Bank had been authorized to suspend specie payment. Its
note circulation, including that of the provincial banks, amounted at
that time to 373,000,000 francs (14,920,000 pounds). On November 2,
1849, this circulation amounted to 482,000,000 francs, or 19,280,000, an
increase of 4,360,000 pounds, and on September 2, 1850, to 496,000,000
francs, or 19,840,000 pounds, an increase of about 5,000,000 pounds.
This was not accompanied by any depreciation of the notes; on the
contrary , the increased circulation of the notes was accompanied by the
steadily increasing accumulation of gold and silver in the vaults of the
Bank, so that in the summer of 1850 its metallic reserve amounted to
about 141,000,000 pounds, an unprecedented sum in France. That the Bank
was thus placed in a position to increase its circulation and therewith
its active capital by 123,000,000 francs, or 5,000,000 pounds, is
striking proof of the correctness of our assertion in an earlier issue
that the finance aristocracy has not only not been overthrown by the
revolution, but has even been strengthened. This result becomes still
more evident from the following survey of French bank legislation during
the last few years. On June 10, 1847, the Bank was authorized to issue
notes of 200 francs; hitherto the smallest denomination had been 500
francs. A decree of March 15, 1848, declared the notes of the Bank of
France legal tender and relieved it of the obligation of redeeming them
in specie. Its note issue was limited to 350,000,000 francs. It was
simultaneously authorized to issue notes of 100 francs. A decree of
April 27 prescribed the merging of the departmental banks in the Bank of
France; another decree, of May 2, 1848, increased the latter’s note
issue to 442,000,000 francs. A decree of December 22, 1849, raised the
maximum of the note issue to 525,000,000 francs. Finally, the law of
August 6, 1850, reestablished the exchangeability of notes for specie.
These facts, the continual increase in the circulation, the
concentration of the whole of French credit in the hands of the Bank,
and the accumulation of all French gold and silver in the Bank’s vaults
led M. Proudhon to the conclusion that the Bank must now shed its old
snakeskin and metamorphose itself into a Proudhonist people’s bank.[122]
He did not even need to know the history of the English bank restriction
from 1797 to 1819;[123] he only needed to direct his glance across the
Channel to see that this fact, for him unprecedented in the history of
bourgeois society, was nothing more than a very normal bourgeois event,
which only now occurred in France for the first time. One sees that the
allegedly revolutionary theoreticians who, after the Provisional
Government, talked big in Paris were just as ignorant of the nature and
the results of the measures taken as the gentlemen of the Provisional
Government themselves.

In spite of the industrial and commercial prosperity that France
momentarily enjoys, the mass of the people, the twenty-five million
peasants, suffer from a great depression. The good harvests of the past
few years have forced the prices of corn much lower even than in
England, and the position of the peasants under such circumstances, in
debt, sucked dry by usury and crushed by taxes, must be anything but
splendid. The history of the past three years has, however, provided
sufficient proof that this class of the population is absolutely
incapable of any revolutionary initiative.

Just as the period of crisis began later on the Continent than in
England, so also did prosperity. The process originated in England,
which is the demiurge of the bourgeois cosmos. On the Continent the
various phases of the cycle repeatedly experienced by bourgeois society
assume a secondary and tertiary form. First, the Continent exports to
England disproportionately more than to any other country. This export
to England, however, depends on the latter’s position, especially in
regard to the overseas market. England exports disproportionately more
to overseas countries than to the whole Continent, so that the quantity
of continental exports to those countries is always dependent on
England’s foreign trade. Hence when crises on the Continent produce
revolutions there first, the bases for them are always laid in England.
Violent outbreaks naturally erupt sooner at the extremities of the
bourgeois body than in its heart, because in the latter the
possibilities of accommodation are greater than in the former. On the
other hand, the degree to which continental revolutions affect England
is at the same time the thermometer that indicates to what extent these
revolutions really put into question bourgeois life conditions, and to
what extent they touch only their political formations.

Given this general prosperity, wherein the productive forces of
bourgeois society are developing as luxuriantly as it is possible for
them to do within bourgeois relationships, a real revolution is out of
the question. Such a revolution is possible only in periods when both of
these factors — the modern forces of production and the bourgeois forms
of production — come into opposition with each other. The various
bickerings in which representatives of the individual factions of the
continental party of Order presently engage and compromise each other,
far from providing an occasion for revolution, are, on the contrary,
possible only because the bases of relationships are momentarily so
secure and — what the reactionaries do not know — so bourgeois. On this
all the reactionary attempts to hold back bourgeois development will
rebound just as much as will all the ethical indignation and all the
enraptured proclamations of the democrats. A new revolution is only a
consequence of a new crisis. The one, however, is as sure to come as the
other.

Let us now turn to France.

The victory that the people, in conjunction with the petty bourgeois,
had won in the elections of March 10 was annulled by the people itself
when it provoked the new election of April 28. Vidal was elected not
only in Paris, but also in the Lower Rhine. The Paris Committee, in
which the Montagne and the petty bourgeoisie were strongly represented,
induced him to accept for the Lower Rhine. The victory of March 10
ceased to be a decisive one; the date of the decision was once more
postponed; the tension of the people was relaxed; it became accustomed
to legal triumphs instead of revolutionary ones. The revolutionary
meaning of March 10, the rehabilitation of the June insurrection, was
finally completely annihilated by the candidature of Eugene Sue, the
sentimental petty-bourgeois social-fantast, which the proletariat could
at best accept as a joke to please the grisettes. As against this
well-meaning candidature, the party of Order, emboldened by the
vacillating policy of its opponents, put up a candidate who was to
represent the June victory. This comic candidate was the Spartan
paterfamilias Leclerc, from whose person, however, the heroic armor was
torn piece by piece by the press, and who experienced a brilliant defeat
in the election. The new election victory on April 28 put the Montagne
and the petty bourgeoisie in high feather. They already exulted in the
thought of being able to arrive at the goal of their wishes in a purely
legal way and without again pushing the proletariat into the foreground
through a new revolution; they reckoned positively on bringing
Ledru-Rollin into the presidential chair and a majority of Montagnards
into the Assembly through universal suffrage in the new elections of
1852. The party of Order, rendered perfectly certain by the prospective
elections, by Sue’s candidature, and by the mood of the Montagne and the
petty bourgeoisie, that the latter were resolved to remain quiet no
matter what happened, answered the two election victories with an
election law which abolished universal suffrage.

The government took good care not to make this legislative proposal on
its own responsibility. It made an apparent concession to the majority
by entrusting the working out of the bill to the high dignitaries of
this majority, the seventeen burgraves.[125] Thus it was not the
government that proposed the repeal of universal suffrage to the
Assembly; the majority of the Assembly proposed it to itself.

On May 8 the project was brought into the Chamber. The entire
Social-Democratic press rose as one man in order to preach to the people
dignified bearing, calme majestueux, passivity, and trust in its
representatives. Every article of these journals was a confession that a
revolution would, above all, annihilate the so-called revolutionary
press, and that therefore it was now a question of its
self-preservation. The allegedly revolutionary press betrayed its whole
secret. It signed its own death warrant.

On May 21 the Montagne put the preliminary question to debate and moved
the rejection of the whole project on the ground that it violated the
constitution. The party of Order answered that the constitution would be
violated if it were necessary; there was, however, no need for this at
present, because the constitution was capable of every interpretation,
and because the majority alone was competent to decide on the correct
interpretation. To the unbridled, savage attacks of Thiers and
Montalembert the Montagne opposed a decorous and refined humanism. It
took its stand on the ground of law; the party of Order referred it to
the ground on which the law grows, to bourgeois property. The Montagne
whimpered: Did they really want, then, to conjure up revolutions by main
force? The party of Order replied: One would await them.

On May 22 the preliminary question was settled by 462 votes to 227. The
same men who had proved with such solemn profundity that the National
Assembly and every individual deputy would be renouncing his mandate if
he renounced the people, his mandatory, now stuck to their seats and
suddenly sought to let the country act, through petitions at that,
instead of acting themselves, and still sat there unmoved when, on May
31, the law went through in splendid fashion. They sought to revenge
themselves by a protest in which they recorded their innocence of the
rape of the constitution, a protest which they did not even submit
openly, but smuggled into the President’s pocket from the rear.

An army of 150,000 men in Paris, the long deferment of the decision, the
appeasing attitude of the press, the pusillanimity of the Montagne and
of the newly elected representatives, the majestic calm of the petty
bourgeois, but above all, the commercial and industrial prosperity,
prevented any attempt at revolution on the part of the proletariat.

Universal suffrage had fulfilled its mission. The majority of the people
had passed through the school of development, which is all that
universal suffrage can serve for in a revolutionary period. It had to be
set aside by a revolution or by the reaction.

The Montagne developed a still greater display of energy on an occasion
that arose soon afterward. From the tribune War Minister Hautpoul had
termed the February Revolution a baneful catastrophe. The orators of the
Montagne, who, as always, distinguished themselves by their morally
indignant bluster, were not allowed by the President, Dupin, to speak.
Girardin proposed to the Montagne that it should walk out at once en
masse. Result: The Montagne remained seated, but Girardin was cast out
from its midst as unworthy.

The election law still needed one thing to complete it, a new press law.
This was not long in coming. A proposal of the government, made many
times more drastic by amendments of the party of Order, increased the
caution money, put an extra stamp on feuilleton fiction (answer to the
election of Eugčne Sue), taxed all publications appearing weekly or
monthly up to a certain number of sheets, and finally provided that
every article of a journal must bear the signature of the author. The
provisions concerning the caution money killed the so-called
revolutionary press; the people regarded its extinction as satisfaction
for the abolition of universal suffrage. However, neither the tendency
nor the effect of the new law extended only to this section of the
press. As long as the newspaper press was anonymous, it appeared as the
organ of a numberless and nameless public opinion; it was the third
power in the state. Through the signature of every article, a newspaper
became a mere collection of literary contributions from more or less
known individuals. Every article sank to the level of an advertisement.
Hitherto the newspapers had circulated as the paper money of public
opinion; now they were resolved into more or less bad solo bills, whose
worth and circulation depended on the credit not only of the drawer but
also of the endorser. The press of the party of Order had incited not
only for the repeal of universal suffrage but also for the most extreme
measures against the bad press. However, in its sinister anonymity even
the good press was irksome to the party of Order and still more to its
individual provincial representatives. As for itself, it demanded only
the paid writer, with name, address, and description. In vain the good
press bemoaned the ingratitude with which its services were rewarded.
The law went through; the provision about the giving of names hit it
hardest of all. The names of republican journalists were rather well
known; but the respectable firms of the “Journal des Débats”, the
“Assemblée Nationale”, the “Constitutionnel”, etc., etc., cut a sorry
figure in their high protestations of state wisdom when the mysterious
company all at once disintegrated into purchasable penny-a-liners of
long practice, who had defended all possible causes for cash, like
Granier de Cassagnac, or into old milksops who called themselves
statesmen, like Capefigue, or into coquettish fops, like M. Lemoinne of
the Débats.

In the debate on the press law the Montagne had already sunk to such a
level of moral degeneracy that it had to confine itself to applauding
the brilliant tirades of an old notable of Louis Philippe’s time, M.
Victor Hugo.

With the election law and the press law the revolutionary and democratic
party exits from the official stage. Before their departure home,
shortly after the end of the session, the two factions of the Montagne,
the socialist democrats and the democratic socialists, issued two
manifestoes, two testimonia paupertatis [certificates of pauperism] in
which they proved that while power and success were never on their side,
they nonetheless had ever been on the side of eternal justice and all
the other eternal truths.

Let us now consider the party of Order. The “Neue Rheinische Zeitung”
had said: “As against the hankering for restoration on the part of the
united Orléanists and Legitimists, Bonaparte defends his title to his
actual power, the republic; as against the hankering for restoration on
the part of Bonaparte, the party of Order defends its title to its
common rule, the republic; as against the Orléanists, the Legitimists,
and as against the Legitimists, the Orléanists, defend the status quo,
the republic. All these factions of the party of Order, each of which
has its own king and its own restoration in petto, mutually enforce, as
against their rivals’ hankering for usurpation and revolt, the common
rule of the bourgeoisie, the form in which the special claims remain
neutralized and reserved — the republic…. And Thiers spoke more truly
than he suspects when he said: ‘We, the royalists, are the true pillars
of the constitutional republic’.”

This comedy of the républicains malgré eux [republicans in spite of
themselves], the antipathy to the status quo and the constant
consolidation of it; the incessant friction between Bonaparte and the
National Assembly; the ever renewed threat of the party of Order to
split into its separate component parts, and the ever repeated
conjugation of its factions; the attempt of each faction to transform
each victory over the common foe into a defeat for its temporary allies;
the mutual petty jealousy, chicanery, harassment, the tireless drawing
of swords that ever and again ends with a baiser Lamourette[15] — this
whole unedifying comedy of errors never developed more classically than
during the past six months.

The party of Order regarded the election law at the same time as a
victory over Bonaparte. Had not the government abdicated when it handed
over the editing of and responsibility for its own proposal to the
Commission of Seventeen? And did not the chief strength of Bonaparte as
against the Assembly lie in the fact that he was the chosen of six
millions? Bonaparte, on his part, treated the election law as a
concession to the Assembly, with which he claimed to have purchased
harmony between the legislative and executive powers. As reward, the
vulgar adventurer demanded an increase of three millions in his civil
list. Dared the National Assembly enter into a conflict with the
executive at a moment when it had excommunicated the great majority of
Frenchmen? It was roused to anger; it appeared to want to go to
extremes; its commission rejected the motion; the Bonapartist press
threatened, and referred to the disinherited people, deprived of its
franchise; numerous noisy attempts at an arrangement took place, and the
Assembly finally gave way in fact, but at the same time revenged itself
in principle. Instead of increasing the civil list in principle by three
millions per annum, it granted Bonaparte an accommodation of 2,160,000
francs. Not satisfied with this, it made even this concession only after
it had been supported by Changarnier, the general of the party of Order
and the protector thrust upon Bonaparte. Therefore it really granted the
two millions not to Bonaparte, but to Changarnier.

This sop, thrown to him de mauvaise grâce [with bad grace], was accepted
by Bonaparte quite in the spirit of the donor. The Bonapartist press
blustered anew against the National Assembly. When in the debate on the
press law the amendment was made on the signing of names — which, in
turn, was directed especially against the less important papers — the
representatives of the private interests of Bonaparte, the principal
Bonapartist paper, the Pouvoir, published an open and vehement attack on
the National Assembly. The ministers had to disavow the paper before the
Assembly; the girant [manager] of the Pouvoir was summoned before the
bar of the National Assembly and sentenced to pay the highest fine,
5,000 francs. Next day the Pouvoir published a still more insolent
article against the Assembly, and as the revenge of the government, the
public prosecutor promptly prosecuted a number of Legitimist journals
for violating the constitution.

Finally there came the question of proroguing the Assembly. Bonaparte
desired this in order to be able to operate unhindered by the Assembly.
The party of Order desired it partly for the purpose of carrying on its
factional intrigues, partly for the pursuit of the private interests of
the individual deputies. Both needed it in order to consolidate and push
further the victories of reaction in the provinces. The Assembly
therefore adjourned from August 11 until November 11. Since, however,
Bonaparte in no way concealed that his only concern was to get rid of
the irksome surveillance of the National Assembly, the Assembly
imprinted on the vote of confidence itself the stamp of lack of
confidence in the President. All Bonapartists were kept off the
permanent commission of twenty-eight members who stayed on during the
recess as guardians of the virtue of the republic.[129] In their stead,
even some republicans of the Sičcle and the National were elected to it,
in order to prove to the President the attachment of the majority to the
constitutional republic.

Shortly before, and especially immediately after the recess, the two big
factions of the party of Order, the Orléanists and the Legitimists,
appeared to want to be reconciled, and this by a fusion of the two royal
houses under whose flags they were fighting. The papers were full of
reconciliation proposals that were said to have been discussed at the
sickbed of Louis Philippe at St. Leonards, when the death of Louis
Philippe suddenly simplified the situation. Louis Philippe was the
usurper, Henry V the dispossessed; the Count of Paris, on the other
hand, owing to the childlessness of Henry V, was his lawful heir to the
throne. Every pretext for objecting to a fusion of the two dynastic
interests was now removed. But precisely now the two factions of the
bourgeoisie first discovered that it was not zeal for a definite royal
house that divided them, but that it was rather their divided class
interests that kept the two dynasties apart. The Legitimists, who had
made a pilgrimage to the residence of Henry V at Wiesbaden just as their
competitors had to St. Leonards, received there the news of Louis
Philippe’s death. Forthwith they formed a ministry in partibus
infidelium[16], which consisted mostly of members of that commission of
guardians of the virtue of the republic and which on the occasion of a
squabble in the bosom of the party came out with the most outspoken
proclamation of right by the grace of God. The Orléanists rejoiced over
the compromising scandal that this manifesto[130] called forth in the
press, and did not conceal for a moment their open enmity to the
Legitimists.

During the adjournment of the National Assembly, the Councils of the
departments met. The majority of them declared for a more or less
qualified revision of the constitution; that is, they declared for a not
definitely specified monarchist restoration, for a “solution”, and
confessed at the same time that they were too incompetent and too
cowardly to find this solution. The Bonapartist faction at once
construed this desire for revision in the sense of a prolongation of
Bonaparte’s presidency.

The constitutional solution, the retirement of Bonaparte in May,
1852,[131] the simultaneous election of a new President by all the
electors of the land, the revision of the constitution by a Chamber of
Revision during the first months of the new presidency, is utterly
inadmissible for the ruling class. The day of the new presidential
election would be the day of rendezvous for all the hostile parties, the
Legitimists, the Orléanists, the bourgeois republicans, the
revolutionists. It would have to come to a violent decision between the
different factions. Even if the party of Order should succeed in uniting
around the candidature of a neutral person outside the dynastic
families, he would still be opposed by Bonaparte. In its struggle with
the people, the party of Order is compelled constantly to increase the
power of the executive. Every increase of the executive’s power
increases the power of its bearer, Bonaparte. In the same measure,
therefore, as the party of Order strengthens its joint might, it
strengthens the fighting resources of Bonaparte’s dynastic pretensions,
it strengthens his chance of frustrating a constitutional solution by
force on the day of the decision. He will then have, as against the
party of Order, no more scruples about the one pillar of the
constitution than that party had, as against the people, about the other
pillar in the matter of the election law. He would, seemingly even
against the Assembly, appeal to universal suffrage. In a word, the
constitutional solution questions the entire political status quo and
behind the jeopardizing of the status quo the bourgeois sees chaos,
anarchy, civil war. He sees his purchases and sales, his promissory
notes, his marriages, his agreements duly acknowledged before a notary,
his mortgages, his ground rents, house rents, profits, all his contracts
and sources of income called in question on the first Sunday in May,
1852, and he cannot expose himself to this risk. Behind the jeopardizing
of the political status quo lurks the danger of the collapse of the
entire bourgeois society. The only possible solution in the framework of
the bourgeoisie is the postponement of the solution. It can save the
constitutional republic only by a violation of the constitution, by the
prolongation of the power of the President. This is also the last word
of the press of Order, after the protracted and profound debates on the
“solutions” in which it indulged after the session of the general
councils. The high and mighty party of Order thus finds itself, to its
shame, compelled to take seriously the ridiculous, commonplace, and, to
it, odious person of the pseudo Bonaparte.

This dirty figure likewise deceived himself about the causes that
clothed him more and more with the character of the indispensable man.
While his party had sufficient insight to ascribe the growing importance
of Bonaparte to circumstances, he believed that he owed it solely to the
magic power of his name and his continual caricaturing of Napoleon. He
became more enterprising every day. To offset the pilgrimages to St.
Leonards and Wiesbaden, he made his round trips through France. The
Bonapartists had so little faith in the magic effect of his personality
that they sent with him everywhere as claquers people from the Society
of December 10,[132] that organization of the Paris lumpen proletariat,
packed en masse into railway trains and post chaises. They put speeches
into the mouth of their marionette which, according to the reception in
the different towns, proclaimed republican resignation or perennial
tenacity as the keynote of the President’s policy. In spite of all
maneuvers these journeys were anything but triumphal processions.

When Bonaparte believed he had thus made the people enthusiastic, he set
out to win the army. He caused great reviews to be held on the plain of
Satory, near Versailles, at which he sought to buy the soldiers with
garlic sausages, champagne, and cigars. Whereas the genuine Napoleon,
amid the hardships of his campaigns of conquest, knew how to cheer up
his weary soldiers with outbursts of patriarchal familiarity, the pseudo
Napoleon believed it was in gratitude that the troops shouted: Vive
Napoleon, vive le saucisson! [Long live Napoleon, long live the
sausage!] that is, Hurrah for the Wurst [sausage], hurrah for the
Hanswurst [buffoon]!

These reviews led to the outbreak of the long suppressed dissension
between Bonaparte and his War Minister Hautpoul, on the one hand, and
Changarnier, on the other. In Changarnier the party of Order had found
its real neutral man, in whose case there could be no question of his
own dynastic claims. It had designated him Bonaparte’s successor. In
addition, Changarnier had become the great general of the party of Order
through his conduct on January 29 and June 13, 1849, the modern
Alexander whose brutal intervention had, in the eyes of the timid
bourgeois, cut the Gordian knot of the revolution. At bottom just as
ridiculous as Bonaparte, he had thus become a power in the very cheapest
manner and was set up by the National Assembly to watch the President.
He himself coquetted, for example, in the matter of the salary grant,
with the protection that he gave Bonaparte, and rose up ever more
overpoweringly against him and the ministers. When, on the occasion of
the election law, an insurrection was expected, he forbade his officers
to take any orders whatever from the War Minister or the President. The
press was also instrumental in magnifying the figure of Changarnier.
With the complete absence of great personalities, the party of Order
naturally found itself compelled to endow a single individual with the
strength lacking in its class as a whole and so puff up this individual
to a prodigy. Thus arose the myth of Changarnier, the “bulwark of
society.” The arrogant charlatanry, the secretive air of importance with
which Changarnier condescended to carry the world on his shoulders,
forms the most ridiculous contrast to the events during and after the
[last] Satory review, which irrefutably proved that it needed only a
stroke of the pen by Bonaparte, the infinitely little, to bring this
fantastic offspring of bourgeois fear, the colossus Changarnier, back to
the dimensions of mediocrity and transform him, society’s heroic savior,
into a pensioned general.

Bonaparte had for some time been revenging himself on Changarnier by
provoking the War Minister to disputes in matters of discipline with the
irksome protector. The last review at Satory finally brought the old
animosity to a climax. The constitutional indignation of Changarnier
knew no bounds when he saw the cavalry regiments file past with the
unconstitutional cry: Vive l’Empereur! [Long live the Emperor!] In order
to forestall any unpleasant debate on this cry in the coming session of
the Chamber, Bonaparte removed War Minister Hautpoul by appointing him
governor of Algiers. In his place he put a reliable old general of the
time of the Empire, one who was fully a match for Changarnier in
brutality. But so that the dismissal of Hautpoul might not appear as a
concession to Changarnier, he simultaneously transferred General
Neumayer, the right hand of the great savior of society, from Paris to
Nantes. It was Neumayer who at the last review had induced the whole of
the infantry to file past the successor of Napoleon in icy silence.
Changarnier, himself attacked in the person of Neumayer, protested and
threatened. To no purpose. After two days’ negotiations, the decree
transferring Neumayer appeared in the Moniteur, and there was nothing
left for the hero of Order but to submit to discipline or resign.

Bonaparte’s struggle with Changarnier is the continuation of his
struggle with the party of Order. The reopening of the National Assembly
on November 11 will therefore take place under threatening auspices. It
will be a storm in a teacup. In essence the old game must go on.
Meanwhile the majority of the party of Order will, despite the clamor of
the sticklers for principle in its different factions, be compelled to
prolong the power of the President. Similarly, Bonaparte, already
humbled by lack of money, will, despite all preliminary protestations,
accept this prolongation of power from the hands of the National
Assembly as simply delegated to him. Thus the solution is postponed; the
status quo continued; one faction of the party of Order compromised,
weakened, made unworkable by the other; the repression of the common
enemy, the mass of the nation, extended and exhausted — until the
economic relations themselves have again reached the point of
development where a new explosion blows into the air all these
squabbling parties with their constitutional republic.

For the peace of mind of the bourgeois it must be said, however, that
the scandal between Bonaparte and the party of Order has the result of
ruining a multitude of small capitalists on the Bourse and putting their
assets into the pockets of the big wolves of the Bourse.

 

Notes

14. The continuation of the three foregoing chapters is found in the
Revue in the fifth and sixth double issue of the Neue Rheinische
Zeitung, the last to appear. Here, after the great commercial crisis
that broke out in England in 1847 had first been described and the
coming to a head of the political complications on the European
continent in the revolutions of February and March, 1848, had been
explained by its reactions there, it is then shown how the prosperity of
trade and industry that again set in during the course of 1848 and
increased still further in 1849 paralyzed the revolutionary upsurge and
made possible the simultaneous victories of the reaction. With special
reference to France, it is then said: — Written by Engels for the 1895
edition, as an introductory paragraph to Section IV.

15. Lamourette’s kiss. On July 7, 1792, Bishop Adrien Lamourette, a
deputy in the Legislative Assembly, proposed that party dissensions be
ended with a fraternal kiss. The deputies enthusiastically embraced each
other then, but the fraternal embrace was soon forgotten. French wits
came to use the expression to denote a trivial love affair.

16. In the realms of the unbelievers; referring to the non-Christian
dioceses to which Catholic bishops were assigned by the Early Church.

 

Contents | Marx/Engels Archive
